#译者前言
- 标题：Book One "Every day like the last"
- 需要更新斜体字。
- 删节了附录和图书信息。
- 部分字体缺失，变成「?」：
1. Uunil-Y?r
2. In?l
3. M?adira
4. V?a
5. P?pa
6. M?mah
7. Mel?yan

#Prologue - My Judgment Is
#序幕——我的判决
*“Do you know why you are here?”*

　　SILENCE FILLED THE COURTROOM. All eyes were on Jespar: judge, jury, and spectators. Arched windows lined each of the side walls, allowing slivers of S evening sunlight to fall into the otherwise dark hall.
　　“...I’m not here.”
　　“Speak louder, boy,” the Corpse on the judge’s bench said.
　　“I’m not here,” Jespar repeated, his voice trembling. He forced himself to meet the Corpse’s eyes. “This is a dream.”
　　The Corpse smiled faintly. A maggot crawled out of his right ear, disappearing down the side of his neck. “It seems you’re as cunning as rumored. Yes, boy, you are in a dream. Does it matter?”
　　Cold spread in Jespar’s gut, worms of ice hatching from their eggs.
　　A little taste of what’s to come, a voice in his head said. The narrator—he knew him well.
　　Like most recurring dreams, this one had a structure. Jespar thought of it as an abandoned theater, showing the play the recesses of his mind had written for him. In this place, however, “him” was a loose term, since his consciousness had split from his body the moment he entered the dream. Within it, Jespar was a puppet, with no control over his physical actions, but still he felt it all: every emotion, every sensation, from the steel shackles cutting into the puppet’s ankles to the horror that would inevitably follow.
　　Second was the narrator, a voice that commented on the events as they unfolded, speaking all the truths and thoughts that, in waking life, his mind tried to bury. Finally, there was the prisoner—the fragment of himself that remained aware throughout it all, knowing it was a dream but unable to change its course.
　　“Why does it matter?” the Corpse repeated.
　　Jespar swallowed. “Because it’s not- Because it’s not real. None of you are real.”
　　The audience chuckled.
　　“Is that so? Then tell me, why don’t you leave? Why don’t you simply snap your fingers and propel yourself back into the reality you came from?” He snapped his fingers to illustrate the point. His nails were so long they curled.
　　Jespar tried to reply, but all that came out was a croak. This evoked more laughter from the audience.
　　Even here, you’re making a fool of yourself.
　　“Correct,” the Corpse said. “Because you can’t.” His gaze drifted as he rubbed his chin with thumb and index finger. Though everything else about his appearance suggested rot—the greasy hair, the snot and dirt in his beard, the flies circling about him—his skin was strangely intact, clean and smooth except for the deep frown lines. And still, something about it was off, wrong, as if some madman had dug his skull from a grave and stretched someone else’s face over it in a bad attempt to disguise what was beneath.
　　As if to underline the thought, the Corpse’s fingertips left dents in his face when he withdrew them, like they would have on a warm candle.
　　“Our minds decide what’s real, boy,” he said. “That is why we love, hate, hope, why we believe in gods that do not exist. So, Jespar Mitumial Dal’Varek, let me repeat my question: Do you know why you’re here?”
　　“You’re not—”
　　He didn’t finish the sentence, as suddenly the cold shot up his esophagus, into his chest, his neck, the bones of his skull. Suddenly, everything seemed too bright, too loud, too intense. Bile rose in his throat at the ubiquitous stench of decay; the sunlight through the windows burnt his cheeks, the stares of the audience bore into his back.
　　Pathetic.
　　Gods, you’re so pathetic.
　　With a sob, he covered his head with his hands and shut his eyes, waiting for the feeling to subside. When it finally did and he dared to look up again, the Corpse’s eyes, the color of dirty ice, were locked with his.
　　The Corpse shook his head.
　　His expression had changed—the disgust was still there, but there was now something else. Disappointment. Shame. Contempt.
　　“It appears you need a reminder,” he said, gesturing to the guards at Jespar’s sides, both of them spitting images of the Corpse. The left one drew a blue piece of cloth from under his armor and tossed it at Jespar’s knees.
　　Look at that.
　　“What do you see?” the Corpse asked.
　　The only memory you didn’t bury.
　　“Not real,” Jespar whispered, his breath coming in fits. “You’re not real.”
　　The Corpse’s mouth smiled, but his eyes didn’t. “Maybe not. But my judgment is.” He pointed at the cloth. “This, boy, is a scarf ... as you well know. It’s the one she gave you only months before you abandoned her. Was it easy for you, I wonder? Turning your back on her only a year after you found her in those bloodstained sheets, the knife still in her hands? Yes, I suppose it was—you’ve done it before, as we all can testify.”
　　The audience booed. Someone from the jury spit on Jespar, the spittle hitting his left cheek. His throat drew tighter, the cold sunk deeper. It paralyzed him now, his neck, his lungs, his tongue. He tried to speak, but the words wouldn’t come. When Jespar glanced up at the judge’s bench again, something was happening to the Corpse’s skin, something that changed the way it stretched and contracted over the muscles of his face.
　　Softer, Jespar realized. It grew softer.
　　Malleable.
　　“Well, it seems like this is going nowhere,” said the Corpse when the noise had finally abated. “You leave me no choice.” He turned to the two juries, seven Corpses each, sitting on two raised aisles perpendicular to the dais. They all looked like him.
　　“Guilty or not?”
　　“Guilty!” they shouted. The audience joined in, all of them sharing the Corpse’s face, repeating the word over and over. Their voices filled the temple-like hall with an incantation.
　　The Corpse stood. The skin on his cheeks had now begun to melt, oozing down his face like wax. “Jespar Dal’Varek!” he shouted, his voice drowning the chanting. “You are hereby found guilty! Guilty of being a coward! Guilty of being a failure! Guilty of being a traitor to your own flesh and blood!”
　　He slammed his gavel onto the stone bench.
　　The crowd went mad. Deafening cheers shook the hall; people jumped up from their seats, applauded, screamed, hurled insults like stones.
　　No, he tried to whisper, but his vocal cords, frozen stiff, wouldn’t oblige. He pressed his hands against his temples and shut his eyes like a child wishing the monsters away.
　　Please, no.
　　Yes, Jespar.
　　This is how it ends.
　　How it has to.
　　When the cheers died down, the Corpse slowly descended the dais, the skin still dripping from his face. “As punishment,” he said, “your body will serve to carry out the justice you’ve denied us.”
　　He halted only a few steps from Jespar and studied him for a breath. Then he stooped down and grabbed him by the hair, yanking his head up so their eyes were level. By now, half the Corpse’s face had dissolved, leaving behind a mask of muscle and bone, droplets of skin gathering on his jawline like mildew.
　　“Do you know what that means, boy?”
　　You’re not real, Jespar tried to say. You’re dead.
　　Though he hadn’t spoken, the Corpse frowned. “Well, that is precisely the point, isn’t it? We are dead, so we can’t carry out the justice you’ve denied us. We can’t because our bodies are useless.”
　　There was a long pause.
　　“Unlike yours.”
　　In a sudden motion, he drew a knife from under his robes, and sliced off a patch of skin from Jespar’s face. Jespar screamed, kicked, convulsed, but the two guards pinned him down, their grip ironclad. The Corpse held up the bloody piece of skin in triumph, then slapped it onto his cheek where it stuck and conformed to his flesh like paper pulp. The Corpse smiled.
　　This is how it ends.
　　“See? It’s simple. If you won’t do your duty, then we will just borrow your useless skin and do it ourselves.”
　　How it has to.
　　He turned to the rest of the room. “He’s all yours.”
　　With his last word, everyone leaped to their feet, and barged towards Jespar. Knives flashed in their hands.

　　Because you deserve it.
#Chapter One - Golden Soil
　　AMONG POVERTY, WARS, AND BAD WINE, Jespar had always considered low-hanging ceiling beams over beds one of the worst inventions of mankind. He A was also one of those unfortunate few whose subconscious minds didn’t remind them of the danger looming above them on their way up—which is why reality greeted him with an explosion of pain when he jerked awake and slammed his forehead right into thirty pounds of house support.
　　He cried out and fell back into bed, hands pressed against the point of impact. When the pain finally subsided, memories of his nightmare returned.
　　Again.
　　He had never been what one might call a sound sleeper—five hours counted as a good night’s rest—but recently, things had gone from potty to shithouse. Jespar exhaled and massaged his eyeballs. They always stung when he had slept badly.
　　“I’m awake,” he said. “I’m awake.”
　　When his mind finally accepted this statement as truth, it realized something else: he had no idea where he was. He blinked again to ease the burning, then looked around.
　　He was in a stuffy room, one whose poor condition its owner had tried to conceal with an abundance of furniture. Somehow, each piece managed to look cheap despite its curvy design and red upholstery. Jespar’s bed was no exception: though wide and with wooden snake carvings for bedposts, peeling paint and dried stains of dubious origin on the bedding thwarted any flair of elegance.
　　Where the hell am—
　　The door burst open. A mountain of fat and muscle in screaming green clothes stood in the doorframe, head ducking under the lintel.
　　“That the kazuum?” he asked someone in the hallway behind him.
　　Muttered agreement.
　　Jespar barely had time to get out of bed and raise his hands before the mountain was in front of him, and a fist came flying towards him. Instinctively, Jespar attempted a dodge.
　　It might have succeeded if a headache hadn’t decided to flare up that very moment. The fist sunk into his gut and hurled him back onto the bed.
　　Gasping, Jespar shielded his face and looked for the next blow, but it never came.
　　Instead, the man loomed over him, his tree-trunk arms crossed over his chest.
　　“That was for scaring the girls with your godsdamned screaming.” He held out his hand, palm open. “Now, pay up.” His In?l had the typical accent of his country: Stretching the vowels and softening the consonants. Pey awp.
　　“What—”
　　“You paid for an evening, not a sleepover... that’s fifty sêr extra. Now pay up and get your face out of here before I stuff it up your ass, curl you into a ball, and make you leave through the window.” Weenduw.
　　Girls? Jespar wanted to ask, but at last, things fell into place. He glanced at the stains on the bed. Noticed the sweet smell of ammoniac in the air.
　　Cringed.
　　“Okay,” he said. “Sure, I’ll pay.” He rummaged his pockets for coins. Counted them.
　　Thirty-two. “That’s all I—”
　　The next punch knocked him flat.
　　Two minutes later, he was on his ass in the mud of an alley. Something splashed into a puddle beside him, spraying brown water all over his clothes. The door of the brothel slammed shut.
　　For a moment, Jespar didn’t move. The alley was empty except for a woman carrying a basket, and a fat cat, both of which eyed him suspiciously. With a groan and as much dignity as he could muster, Jespar picked himself up and gathered his belongings. The woman cast him a pitying glance, then went about her way; the cat studied him a little longer.
　　“What are you looking at?” Jespar said.
　　If cats could shrug, this one would have. Instead, it scurried away.
　　“Right.” Jespar sighed into the empty alley. As if headache and bruises weren’t enough, an itch flared up between his shoulders. He scratched it.
　　“Right,” he repeated.
　　Judging by the color of the sky, it would be at least two hours before the sun came up, and he wouldn’t meet his employer until noon—plenty of time to get ready and explore this strange and wonderful city around him. But somehow, the enthusiasm failed to materialize. Why? After all, an adventure was what he’d come here for.
　　Wasn’t it?
　　He wiped sweat off his forehead and looked up. Even from here, cramped between the buildings of a coastal town’s alley, he could see the colossal white walls of his destination rising in the distance.
　　Uunil-Y?r. The Golden City, heart of the Kiléan archipelago, and richest metropolis in the Civilized World.
　　Jespar adjusted his blue scarf and started walking. In the half-light of dawn, the island slowly woke from its slumber.
---
　　After roaming the alleys for a while, Jespar finally found his way back to the marina. He sat down on an abandoned crate and took a moment to calm his post-inebrious headache and appreciate the view. The sun had just begun to rise, tinting the morning fog above the ocean a pale orange.
　　Pretty.
　　When Uunil-Y?r itself had denied Jespar’s ship entry due to an overcrowded harbor, the captain anchored in Port Vaju, one of the coastal towns, nestled in an idyllic cove just a few miles from the capital. Though this was his first day in Kilé and he hadn’t even reached the city yet, he already understood why Kilé found mention in so many stories and songs.
　　First, there was the landscape: White beaches that stretched for miles, speckled with palm trees and shrubs flowing into the jungle further inland; the turquoise ocean; Green mountains rising in the distance.
　　Second: the city.
　　Even from Port Vaju, what Jespar could see of Uunil-Y?r in the distance was breathtaking. The metropolis was built around its namesake, Mount Uunil, and while the walls obscured its lower parts, the districts built around the mountain’s slopes spoke for themselves: masterworks of whitewashed stone, growing bigger and bigger as they scaled the mountain. Palaces towered around the peak, and though only four of them were on the side facing Port Vaju, Jespar knew there were seven in total. The ziggurats. Homes of the seven Magnates, the richest and most powerful merchants of the archipelago.
　　The writers and poets might have used more colorful descriptions to describe the distinct style of Kiléan architecture, but the term that came to Jespar’s mind when he studied the buildings was “blocky pyramids.” While the smaller houses simply seemed like differently sized blocks of stone stacked upon and into one another, the mansions further up the mountain and the ziggurats beyond were piles of square platforms where each story was smaller than the one below. Rows of pillars and greenery framed each stage, and gardens adorned the flat rooftops.
　　The Golden City. It was beautiful, no point denying it.
　　Jespar scratched his back. There was a foul taste in his mouth, so he took a swig from his water flask, gurgled, then spit it out. Down by the harbor promenade, three kids were playing some kind of game that involved tossing colored stones into a chalk circle they had drawn on the cobblestone. They were so tanned their brown skin was almost black.
　　Little by little, his memories of the previous night returned. He remembered fetching drinks with a couple of sailors from his ship, which explained the headache. He remembered a Kiléan betting game and a bar fight, which explained his empty purse and the bruises on his ribs that weren’t the bouncer’s doing. He remembered two whores, a young man with thinning hair and a woman with a heavily painted face, who had both probably looked better when he’d been drunk.
　　Jespar sighed.
　　Wasn’t it supposed to be different this time? If that mysterious contact of his didn’t turn out to be a fraud, the job would pay enough for him to afford passage back to Enderal and rebuild his life there.
　　Yours and hers.
　　A virtuous undertaking, no doubt. With moderate success, Jespar tried to imagine a tale starting with the hero getting shit-faced with two Kiléan whores.
　　He stood up and searched each of his pockets for coin. Thankfully, he found some in the inside pockets of his leather armor that the bouncer hadn’t noticed. Twenty-one sêr.
　　Just about enough for a breakfast, a bath, and a handful of nightflower leaves. The former two he needed, the latter he wanted. He decided to start with the bath.
---
　　As he sauntered down the pier in search of a bathing house, he let his new impressions of the city settle in. It confirmed many of the preconceptions he’d had about Kilé, but disproved others. As he had suspected, the contrast between the haves and have-nots was stark, even in a town like Port Vaju: While frescoes and statues adorned the Blue Islands Coalition’s trading office, makeshift posts and scaffolding kept the back-alley houses from falling apart.
　　As he had suspected, no one paid him much attention, despite the color of his skin making him stick out like a pigeon among blackbirds. Just another traveler. On the other hand, he was surprised to see many people wearing copper rings around their upper arms, symbols of religious devotion—even though the Kiléans were considered godless by the more pious countries. When he reached the market square, he saw a priestess in orange robes kneeling in its center, in front of a statue that depicted a middle-aged woman in robes. In her right hand, the statue held a sheaf of wheat, in her left, a basket. Stone scarabs scuttled at her feet.
　　Morala, Jespar thought as the smell of burnt herbs wafted towards him. The Light-Born of Trade, Fertility, and Cunning, and the Goddess of Kilé.
　　Arms crossed, Jespar watched the priestess perform her ritual. While the wreath of herbs burnt away, she first touched her forehead, then her temples, then her heart. She sprinkled water over the wreath, remained until the flames had died, then finally stood and went about her way.
　　Interesting.
　　Despite being Endralean, Jespar held little love for the Light-Born. That hadn’t always been the case; when he’d learned about them as a boy, they had enthralled him. How could they not? Seven mages had transcended their humanity to become gods and pursue the goal of uniting the fractured world Vyn had become since Starfall. As he grew up, he’d realized that the Light-Born faced the same problems most idealists do eventually: the world is a muddle of discord that doesn’t necessarily want to be united. And even eternal life, powerful magic, and pretty scepters don’t always cut it.
　　Yes, these gods did actually exist, observing humankind and passing judgment from a city in the clouds, led by Tyr, their eldest. Yes, each of them reigned over one of the Civilized continents. And yet, nowadays these gods were little more than symbols. Why?
　　Two reasons. One, each of these gods relied on a mundane faction or sovereign to carry out its will, and, naturally, most of these factions or sovereigns had wills of their own.
　　Two, they rarely ever intervened or showed themselves, and “rarely” meant maybe once in a hundred years. Even then it was mostly the Holy Order, their army which ruled over Enderal and dished out the beatings when conflict arose that was too severe for even the Light-Born to ignore.
　　Gods?
　　Or just immortal sovereigns?
　　To Jespar, the answer was clear. When he had voiced the idea to his tutor, wondering aloud if the Light-Born had perhaps grown bored of mankind’s perpetual stupidity, the tutor had answered with a beating. Nowadays, he thought there was more truth to the thought than his morose tutor had been willing to admit, the man whose face always looked like he suffered from volatile bowel movements. If even the most steadfast of human souls wearied after decades of politics, why should the immortal mind be any different? Probably, young Jespar had figured, they had turned towards the more pleasant aspects of life. He knew he would have. Preferably those involving wine, food, and lots of naked skin.
　　What set Kilé apart from the other countries was that its rulers, the Blue Islands Coalition, didn’t even bother feigning devoutness. Of course, they were all terribly afraid of Light-Born Morala’s judgment, but even the most pious of minds couldn’t deny that the latter shared her throne with at least seven other pairs of divine buttocks: The Magnates.
　　And yet there they were—prayer rings, priestesses, statues. Probably, Jespar decided, it was ultimately about making sure. You revered the Magnates and strove for their wealth, but said your prayers just in case the Light-Born did in fact have a say in your afterlife experience.
　　I confess, now pass me the wine.
　　Grinning, Jespar went on. The sun was now fully up, the last tinge of red gone blue. It was getting hot, and he really needed that bath.
　　When he arrived in the bathhouse, he was greeted by a porcelain-skinned young clerk with a daring chin beard.
　　“May you prosper, ma’sao” he said. “Have you come to indulge in the divine waters of our humble establishment?”
　　Jespar tried a winning smile. “Indeed, I have.”
　　The clerk folded his hands just above his waist. “Very well.” Veel.
　　Five minutes later, Jespar was back on the streets. Divine waters or not, thirty sêr for an hour was more than he could afford or was willing to part with. He decided to find a natural pond or river instead and went up to a vegetable vendor at the market square who told him about a natural pool two miles out of town. When Jespar offered him fifty caya, half a sêr, in return, the merchant declined. “Keep it, my friend. You’ll need it.”
　　“What do you mean?”
　　The merchant smiled, but his eyes remained empty. “You’ll see, ma’sao. You’ll see.”
　　In the outer parts of town, the cobblestone gave way to gravel, the stone and wood houses to adobe huts. Half an hour later, Jespar walked down an unpaved path lined by bushes and palms, a banana plantation to his left, the jungle sloping down into the ocean to his right. Birds twittered, insects chirped, waves broke in the distance. Had it not been for the continuous worsening of his itch, Jespar would have marveled at the sight.
　　Finally, the road forked, one way continuing along the shoreline, the other one flowing into a path that cut into the jungle. When Jespar finally heard the sound of a waterfall, sweat was streaming down his face in rivulets.
　　He stopped when he heard talking.
　　No, Jespar thought, not talking. Arguing. Down the path from the pool, several people shouted and hurled insults at each other. Hesitating, he walked on. The path wound its way through the jungle a little longer, then went down a steep slope. Jespar stopped.
　　“Wow.”
　　At the foot of the hill lay a bright blue pool, nestled in a natural rock basin. Bushes and trees flourished on its terrace, where a river from the mountains poured over its edge in a curtain of water. Vines and lianas climbed down the sand-colored stone.
　　He licked his lips, uncorked his bottle, and drank the last of his water. The shouting went on.
　　Jespar began the descent. Only when he had almost reached the basin did he see who the voices belonged to. Four people stood on the shingle of the pond, two men, a woman, and a child. One of the men did most of the insult-hurling, which was directed at the woman. Her answers were calm but underpinned by aggression. The woman and the second man belonged to the Blue Guard, as their indigo-dyed leather armor testified.
　　All the way out here?
　　Jespar looked for a spot to observe the situation from afar and found it behind a large rhododendron bush. The shouting man, who appeared to be the father of the girl, had a broad back and dark skin and wore his salt-and-pepper hair tied into a ponytail. With his round face, broad lips, and bamboo-leaf eyes, he looked different than most Kiléans, but when Jespar saw the tattoos around his eyes, he realized the man and the child were Makehu—archipelago natives.
　　“...been using this place for generations,” the man said. “Kweh, we have a right to be here!”
　　“Yuz, and no one is denying you that right, as we’ve told you ten times in the past fifteen minutes,” the guardswoman answered. “Maybe I need to write it down for you?
　　Or say it in your language?”
　　The other guard winced. “Veena...”
　　“What? He obviously doesn’t understand In?l.”
　　The man’s fists clenched. “This is because we’re Makehu, isn’t it? Some new scheme you Wakhem came up with.”
　　The guardswoman rolled her eyes. “Don’t be silly. The decree applies to everyone, Makehu, Kiléan, or unicorn.”
　　“Look, ma’sao,” the guardsman joined in. “We’re sorry for the inconvenience, but we’re just following orders. By the rules of the Golden Soil Decree, these waters belong to Magnate Vel’Nyx now, and she decided everybody who wants to use them has to pay.
　　Makehu, Kiléan, outsider. So, unless you’re able to do so, I suggest you—”
　　The man shoved him. Eyes and mouth wide open, the guard flailed his arms for a moment, then fell down hard on the shingle. The girl let out a scream.
　　“Fuck your suggestions!” the Makehu said. “Kweh, I was working for the Coalition when you were still shitting in your mothers’ laps! Do you really think this godsdamned uniform gives you the right to order me around? You?”
　　The guardswoman drew her scimitar. “All right, you coinless piece of shit, that cuts it.
　　You’re going to jail.”
　　The Makehu took a step towards her, jaw flexed. His daughter pulled at his woven skirt, but he ignored it. “Make me.”
　　Even though a good ten arm-lengths separated them and Jespar, something about the way the man moved made the hair on Jespar’s neck stand up.
　　Hatred.
　　Jespar could imagine the man’s irises, fire blazing on a soil that had been sucked dry by years of drought and had only been waiting for the decisive spark. Just when Jespar considered intervening, the girl began to cry.
　　The situation changed at once. The peasant froze. His eyes flicked to his daughter, to the guardswoman, and back to his daughter again. The corners of his mouth twitched.
　　At last, his muscles relaxed, though the contempt in his eyes stayed. “Times are changing,” he said. “Mark my words, ma’saa. Times are changing.” He glanced at the downed guard, who looked at him with a mixture of concern and wariness. Then he took his daughter by her hand. She was still sobbing. “Come, vaota. We’re leaving.”
　　They left, walking right past where Jespar was hiding. He held his breath. Once they were out of sight, the guardswoman turned to her comrade, scimitar still in hand. “What the hell was that?”
　　“If you want to kill or arrest a man in front of his own daughter, go ahead,” the guard said, patting dirt off his armor. “I won’t.”
　　The guardswoman stared at him. Then she slammed her weapon back into its sheath.
　　“Whatever. I have to take a piss.”
　　With that, she disappeared in the bushes. Her comrade looked after her, then sat down on a rock near the water.
　　Jespar seized the chance. The guard didn’t notice him until he was on the shingles. A weary frown on his face, he stood up.
　　“I’m sorry, ma’sao, but–“
　　“It costs... I know.”
　　“Huh.” The guard tilted his head. “You’re an outlander, aren’t you? Where from, Nehrim? I can’t place the accent.”
　　“Enderal.” Jespar nodded towards the pool. “So, did I understand correctly? This magnificent piece of nature is private property now?”
　　The guard averted his eyes, rubbed the bridge of his nose. “This ‘magnificent piece of nature’ and the entire eastern coast of the island, yuz. Magnate Vel’Nyx bought it two moons ago, right after the Coalition issued the Golden Soil Decree.” He patted the embroidered crest on his armor, a scarab over two crossed scimitars. The symbol of the Coalition.
　　“In essence, the Blue Island Coalition put the entire archipelago up for sale. Every forest, every beach, every grain of sand that doesn’t already have an owner can now be bought.” He jerked a thumb over his shoulder. “Such as this pool here. It’s now Magnate Vel’Nyx’s property, just like the beach further up north now belongs to Magnate Kuura.”
　　“And this Vel’Mix decided everybody who wants to take a dip now has to pay?”
　　“Vel’Nyx is her name, and yes. That’s why we’re here, fulfilling our glorious duty to the Coalition by telling people who barely have enough money to feed their kids to go bathe somewhere else. I guess you overheard our little argument before?”
　　“Yeah.”
　　“Well, I don’t blame the man, you know? Our country has always been run by those with the fattest purses, but charging a working man for wanting to take a godsdamned bath or pick a fruit from some tree out in the wilderness?” He exhaled. “This won’t end well, ma’sao. It won’t end well.”
　　The guardswoman reappeared from the bushes. Deep wrinkles on her forehead contrasted her soft face.
　　“Anyway,” the guard said, patting a pouch tethered to his belt. “For only six sêr, you can splash about in the water like a mermaid. What do you say?”
---
　　After Jespar had paid, the guards went off for a patrol. Though he wasn’t prudish, Jespar appreciated the privacy. He undressed and stashed his few belongings under a little precipice next to the waterfall. Then he walked waist-deep into the pool, cupped his hands, and splashed water in his face.
　　Divine.
　　Funny. Bathing was as mundane an act as it could get, but the little pleasures were always where Jespar felt the most at peace. A cup of water after hours of thirst; sun on his eyelids. A fire after a day out in the cold.
　　You’re right, father, he thought. I’ve never been a true Dal’Varek.
　　Though it had been twelve years, he still vividly remembered his father’s lectures about how it was adherence to principles that made a person, his monologues about injustice, righteousness, and the workings of the world. And yet Jespar had never seen him smile—not when he’d eaten the delicacies their chefs conjured up each night, not when he took his evening tea in his wingback chair facing the hearth, not even when Jespar’s middle brother had used his entire savings to get Damean Dal’Varek a Starling hunting bow for his name-day.
　　Maybe that’s just the nature of righteousness. It only comes with a steel rod shoved all the way up your ass.
　　Jespar waited for the ripples to calm.
　　Ma’sao Dal’Varek, he thought, you look like shit.
　　The face that stared back at him from the reflection looked worse than he had anticipated. His stubble, scarce on his cheeks, dense on chin and upper lip, was too short to pass as a beard and too long to pass as the dashing adventurer’s trademark. Bags hung under his eyes, his hair was an unkempt shock of blond bristles.
　　And the grey had multiplied. He couldn’t tell it from the reflection, but he remembered the whore from the previous night joking about it when he’d told her he was only twenty-eight years old.
　　“I like it,” the balding boy had said, tracing his fingers up the inside of Jespar’s thigh.
　　“I bet he knows what he’s doing.”
　　To his inebriated mind, the comment had been the pinnacle of erotic banter. Now, he cringed at the memory.
　　He dove under the water.
---
　　Jespar left the basin feeling rejuvenated. His drowsiness had washed off along with the dirt and the sweat, and the rash between his shoulders—it was a rash, as he’d felt with his fingers—had also gotten better. Jespar gave himself a rudimentary shave with his dagger, using the water’s reflection to guide him. Then he changed into his second set of clothes and, after a moment’s consideration, put the blue scarf into his backpack. He returned to Port Vaju.
　　Two of his remaining fifteen sêr went to a washerwoman to clean his muddy clothes, two to a shoeshine to polish his boots, and four to a baker for breakfast. Around noon, he made for Uunil-Y?r.
　　There was no need to ask for directions this time. All he had to do was follow the great road that led to the city’s gates, trodding along with the stream of travelers, peasants, and fortune-seekers. Trees lined the roadside, surrounded by waist-high grass and myriads of shrubbery. While the coastal breeze remedied the worst of the morning heat, Jespar wondered what it was like behind the walls. The picture of a basket full of crabs rose to mind, scuttling and sizzling under the tropical sun.
　　He listened as the people chattered about their work, their hopes and worries, and the latest news. While the Kiléan accent gave him some trouble, the Golden Soil Decree came up often, and it seemed the Makehu man at the pool was not the only one enraged about it. There was also talk of a new underground movement that claimed to fight injustice in the country, a trade embargo by Arazeal that threatened many jobs, and some nobleman who had mysteriously disappeared from the public eye. The people suspected kidnapping.
　　When Jespar reached the eastern gate, his clothes were again drenched in sweat. There was a queue in front of the gatehouse next to the gargantuan white gate that marked the city’s entrance, where a burly man either waved the peasants through or denied them entry. When it was Jespar’s turn, he braced himself for a volley of questions.
　　“Papers, pig-skin,” the guard greeted him and extended a gloved hand, palm up. Jespar gave him the letter of passage that had come with the invitation. The guard read it a total of three times, his face changing a little more each time, from frown to confusion to bewilderment.
　　“Where ... where did you get this?”
　　Jespar started to respond, but he stopped. The letter had come with strict instructions: total secrecy.
　　“I can’t tell. I’m sorry.”
　　The guard eyed him a moment longer, then gave him a tense smile and returned the paper. He bowed deeply. “Thank you, ma’sao. Forgive me for keeping you.”
　　You’re scared.
　　Why?
　　Jespar smiled back. “No sweat.” He tucked the letter back into his chest pocket and passed through the gate. From pig-skin to ma’sao, he thought. And all it had taken was a letter.
　　He was starting to get curious.
---
　　A sailor’s song claimed that Morala was secretly also the goddess of beauty. It also claimed that the Golden City was her favorite mistress, and that it had been Morala’s kisses that had transformed it into the wonder it was.
　　If that was the case, Jespar decided as Uunil-Y?r unfolded around him, Morala must have preferred some body parts over others. While the districts around the mountain certainly looked magnificent—lots of tongue—the city further down shifted its focus from beauty to function—a kiss on each cheek—while the outer rings seemed designed for the sole purpose of fitting as many people into as little space as possible. Peck on the forehead, let’s just be friends.
　　The songs spoke of the palaces but left out the ramshackle buildings, fainted after the bosoms of Kiléan women but overlooked the beggars cowering on the roadside, rhapsodized over the city’s unique scent of spices, perfume, and ocean water but failed to mention how it mingled with shit, sweat, and piss.
　　There were people everywhere, an endless stream drifting through the many streets, alleys, and plazas, people of all colors, shapes and sizes that melted and flowed like an ever-changing kaleidoscope. An incessant din of talking, laughing, and shouting filled the air, mixing with the sounds of shuffling feet, clanging anvils, barking dogs, and braying donkeys. And as Jespar maneuvered his way through the crowd, he came to a realization.
　　If the city was a lover, she was a volatile one.
　　One day, she’d be your wings to the sky, the next, the riptide that drowned you. Her promise was tempting, but her hunger voracious; her lips invited, but her teeth bit hard.
　　There was simply something in the air, a sense of motion both intoxicating and invigorating—and Jespar liked it.
　　He also noticed something else, hidden in the details: how there were more patrols than there should have been in bright daylight, the way the guards’ eyes darted about, or the peasants glared at them.
　　Tension. The city was a fabric stretched to the breaking point.
　　After getting lost several times, Jespar finally found his destination: the Great Bazaar.
　　As the name suggested, it was a marketplace in the merchant’s quarter, the so-called Steel District. A giant stone pavilion sheltered it, allowing the vendors and customers to do business without being cooked alive by the sun, which was now an angry, white disk bearing down from its zenith. Square openings in the pavilion’s roof allowed air to circulate and light to illuminate the countless stalls and tables.
　　When Jespar finally succeeded in squeezing himself through the throng of bodies that clustered at the entrance area, he was stunned.
　　The assortment was endless. Farmers sold food, blacksmiths tools, and weapons, tailors a multitude of clothes with their trademark lurid colors. A woman with snakelike hair sat behind a table full of gems and pendants and offered to read Jespar’s fortune; a bald man in a jade green tunic waved a bottle in his face and promised the concoction it contained would grow his manhood to inconceivable dimensions.
　　He was making his way down the main aisle when a voice cut through the din.
　　“Make way! Make way for Third Magnate Vel’Nyx!”
　　The people in Jespar’s aisle obliged immediately and stepped aside to clear a lane in the middle. Jespar followed suit. An armed escort came into sight, at least fifteen Blue Guards protecting a blue and gold palanquin. “Make way for Third Magnate Vel’Nyx!”
　　the front guard repeated unnecessarily, banging the hilt of his scimitar on his shield at regular intervals. “Make way!”
　　Necks craned and people stood on their toes as the palanquin passed them by, but since a curtain blocked most of the view inside the palanquin, all Jespar could make out were two people sitting across from each other. Judging by their hands and painted fingernails, both were women, one older than the other. When the escort was through, the lane closed as fast as it had formed and people resumed their business.
---
　　The meeting point was a sa’nuu in a hidden corner of the bazaar. Roughly translating as “tent of dreams,” a sa’nuu was an establishment where customers could consume a variety of drogae, from tobacco to alcohol, from opium to nightflower. Screens covered with rugs dulled the noise and light from the market while blue and violet paper lanterns immersed the place in a dreamy gloom. For two sêr, Jespar ordered a pipe of nightflower and sat down on a chaise in a corner. As he waited for attendant to bring his pipe, he observed a young couple in the opposite corner kissing vigorously. The boy clearly lacked experience, which he tried to compensate by slobbering all over his sweetheart’s face and passionately massaging her left breast. Jespar grinned.
　　The attendant brought Jespar’s pipe and offered it to him, bowl first. Jespar smelled the petals, nodded. The attendant lit the coals and left.
　　Jespar took a deep drag. He reclined against the cushions and took another. When the droga kicked in, warmth rose in his chest, spread into his head and into his limbs. His sight blurred slightly, then sharpened again, the colors now stronger but softer around the edges, like an aquarelle painting. Jespar smiled and closed his eyes. He felt at ease.
　　An hour passed.
　　Two.
　　Jespar left the sa’nuu. Ate something. Came back and ordered another pipe.
　　Four hours.
　　When a man and two guards finally entered the establishment, Jespar was drowsy but serene. Both guards wore a full suit of armor fashioned from interlinked steel scales that emitted a subtle turquoise glow. Jespar recognized it as nuvium, an ore as durable at steel while almost as light as leather. Expensive, he thought. Back in Enderal, one of these suits would have cost more than a farmer would make in three years of work. The man they escorted wore sapphire robes, and something about his features and skin made Jespar think of a black fox. There wasn’t a single hair on his face or scalp.
　　The man surveyed the room, spotted Jespar, and walked over. There was something slightly off about his gait, but Jespar couldn’t put his finger on what it was.
　　“Ma’sao Dal’Varek, I assume?” He spoke flawless In?l, without a trace of an accent.
　　Jespar stood and held out his hand. “Yes. You are—”
　　“Zagash Enkshi, Counselor of your employer,” the man replied, ignoring the outstretched hand. “Show me the proof.”
　　Jespar hesitated. Then he reached into his pocket and took out a coin.
　　When he had first been contacted in Nehrim, his letter had contained instructions to meet with another contact who would verify his identity. They had met in a tavern, where the contact harried him with a barrage of questions. After Jespar had answered to her satisfaction, she passed him an antique-looking coin, along with the letter of passage that had gotten him through the gates earlier.
　　Enkshi took the coin with a ring-adorned hand, scrutinized it, then dropped it into his pocket. He glanced at the pipe in Jespar’s hand. “You were instructed to wait, not to ...
　　indulge.”
　　Jespar smiled apologetically. “I tend to miss that part.”
　　Not even a chuckle. “Follow me.”
　　Without awaiting an answer, Enkshi left. Jespar sighed, then took a last pull at his pipe and followed.
---
　　Almost immediately after they returned into the heat of the open, Jespar’s rash flared up again. The air had cooled a little under the now westering sun but was still stifling. He cursed and scratched himself, which Enkshi observed with a frown. Walking at a brisk pace, he led Jespar through the crowd and several streets, until they arrived in a garden behind an imposing building of the Coalition. A palanquin stood in the shadow of two phoenix palms, backdropped by black and blue rhododendrons. It looked similar to the one that had carried Vel’Nyx in the Bazaar, only it was painted blue and large enough to carry four people. Gold ornaments adorned each side, and dark blue curtains separated the interior from the stifling heat. A uniformed woman with short black hair and shoulders wide enough to rival a woodcutter approached them. Like their escort, she wore nuvium armor.
　　“Counselor Enkshi,” she said, bowing deeply.
　　“Sergeant M?adira. Are we ready to leave?” he said.
　　No introduction. The sergeant gave Jespar an uncertain nod, which he returned.
　　“Of course,” M?adira said at last, signaling to four bare-breasted men and six guards lounging in the shade. All got up at once.
---
　　Since the sergeant walked with the guards, Jespar and Enkshi spent the next hours alone in the palanquin. The elegant man with the blue-black skin met every attempt by Jespar to strike up a conversation with one-syllable answers, so Jespar eventually wrote him off as a prick and focused on the surroundings instead. Lulled by the aftereffects of the nightflower and the gentle sway of the palanquin, he had to keep himself from dozing off.
　　A broad road connected the different districts of the Golden City, meandering all the way up to the top of Mount Uunil. According to the historian on the ship, it went by the name of V?a Neya—Fortune Road—and was not just the city’s main surface of transport, but also a symbol.
　　“Just look at your feet and you know where you’re at,” the historian had said.
　　It was true. In the Stone District, the outermost ring of the city where the laborers lived, Fortune Road had barely been more than a stretch of dirt framed by run-down buildings and shops whose colorfully painted walls did little to hide their poor condition.
　　In the Steel District, where the middle class lived and the city slowly adapted its trademark blocky style of architecture, the dirt changed into cobblestone. As the bearers carried the palanquin through the ornamented white gate that marked entrance of the Jade District, the paving turned into flagstone.
　　The Jade District.
　　As they went further in, Jespar couldn’t help but stare at the display of luxury. To whoever lived here, he concluded, “modesty” was merely seven strangely arranged letters. Even the smallest abodes were so lavish they reduced the sumptuous homes of the lower districts to puppet-houses, featuring multiple storeys, sweeping gardens, and frescoes that adorned the facades. Around every corner, it seemed, was a park with fountains and statues, some of Morala, some of other Light-Born, some of people who had simply reached the point of wealth where rubbing it in everybody’s faces became part of the etiquette.
　　The poor at the bottom, the rich at the peak, Jespar thought. And Fortune Road leads from one to the other. Not a very imaginative concept, granted, but honest enough. On the Blue Islands, “working one’s way to the top” wasn’t just a figure of speech. It was reality.
---
　　As the escort proceeded further up the mountain, laughter and music became audible in the distance. Jespar squinted, but as the sun was setting in the direction of the noise, it was hard to recognize anything.
　　“A festivity,” Enkshi said. “Magnate Vel’Tuul is celebrating his name-day.”
　　Surprised, Jespar looked up. “Should ... I know him?”
　　“I’d be surprised. He’s the least influential of the Magnates.” Touching his upper lip with his thumb, Enkshi twitched his mouth. “Frankly, he’s a simpleton who owes his position solely to his parents’ hard work. Now that they’re dead, all he does is waste their wealth on banquets. If the other nobles didn’t enjoy this debauchery so much, I doubt he’d still be in the Coalition.”
　　“I think I know the type,” Jespar said, daring a smile.
　　To his surprise, the Counselor returned it, if only for a flicker. “Every country has its share.”
　　There was a long silence.
　　Just when Jespar was ready to resume window-staring, Enkshi sighed. “You must understand my reservations, Ma’sao Dal’Varek. The mission you were brought here for, it’s ... Well; it would be an understatement to call it important. I have gone over the reports on you and, honestly, fail to understand what it is that makes you better than any other contractor here in Uunil-Y?r.” He studied his hands. “In fact, I don’t see how a mercenary would be able to help us at all.”
　　“For what it’s worth,” Jespar said, “neither do I.”
　　Another pause. Again, Enkshi touched his upper lip with his thumb. Sunlight reflected on the gold ring that adorned it. When he spoke again, his voice was changed. Flat. Hard.
　　“Jespar Mitumial Dal’Varek,” he said. “Born in Enderal, 8198 after Starfall. You’re the last male heir of the Dal’Varek family, most of which perished in a tragic accident twelve years ago. Seven years following said accident, you left your homeland for Nehrim, where you spent the past five years, first as a day laborer, then as a mercenary.” He leaned forward, elbows resting on his knees. “So, here’s my first question. Why?
　　According to my sources, the Dal’Vareks were highly respected. As their only heir, you must have had an excellent outlook in Ark’s nobility, not to mention the wealth your father probably left behind. Why throw it all away for a life as a...” His nostrils twitched.
　　“A vagrant?”
　　Jespar hesitated. “How do you know all that?”
　　Enkshi scoffed. “Did you really think we’d have hired you without checking your background first? Now answer the question: Why did you leave your life in Enderal behind?”
　　He thought: Because that godsdamned city would have smothered me if I’d stayed.
　　He said: “I just wanted to see the world.”
　　“See the world,” Enkshi echoed. “And that was reason enough for you to leave your own s—”
　　“Counselor,” Jespar said, “would you mind telling me what my teenage years and my motivations for traveling have to do with this mission?”
　　For a breath, the Enkshi frowned. He evidently wasn’t used to being interrupted, that much was clear. Jespar held his gaze.
　　Finally, Enkshi sighed. “Well, I suppose you are right, your adolescence doesn’t concern me. What happened afterward, however, does.
　　“Over the course of these five years, you worked for a variety of employers, from private individuals to guilds and even entire governments. You also participated in the Nehrimese war between the South- and Middlerealm as a member of the Gallowmen—a mercenary corps hired by the Creator’s Temple itself. Four years later, you left them without even collecting the money they still owed you. Why?”
　　Jespar sighed. Rubbed his throat. “Because I didn’t agree with some of the things they did.”
　　“Pillaging?”
　　“That and more. Look, Counselor, let me be straight with you: If you want me to tell you why someone as obviously influential as your master would ship a no-name mercenary like me all the way to the Blue Islands, I don’t know. I’m many things, but I’m certainly not a hero. However, I’m also not a murderer. Yes, I did some things I’m not proud of, but nothing I can’t live with—”
　　Really?
　　“—which, again, you probably already know, else I wouldn’t be here. So, how about we skip the interrogation and you simply tell me what I’m here for? As long as it doesn’t involve the kinds of things I left the Gallowmen for and the pay is right, I promise I’ll do all I can to help.”
　　Silence stretched out in the cabin.
　　The hard look on Enkshi’s face disappeared, and he suddenly looked old and very tired. “Tell me, Jespar Dal’Varek: What do you know about dreams?”
　　Before Jespar could reply, a scream cut through the silence.
#Interlude - Thirty-Nine Years Before
　　IT’S ONE OF the bad days. The catch in the morning: bad. The mood at first meal: bad. Sales at the market: bad. One look at the way P?pa’s jaws work as he stands I behind the market stall with his arms crossed is enough to tell the Boy there will be no laughter at dinner tonight. If there’ll even be dinner, he thinks.
　　Shortly before midday, a woman approaches them — not a noble, but she wears good clothes. She asks if they have lobsters, which they don’t.
　　“Saaras’Jodule,” the woman says. “Ten stinking fish merchants on this market and not a single one has lobsters? No wonder you’re coinless.”
　　She stalks off. P?pa stares after her, on his face that look the Boy has come to detest: anger and defeat, united in the same expression.
　　An hour later, they are dismantling the stall. A man hurries towards him, his hair windblown. Do they sell lobsters? The price doesn’t matter.
　　“I’m sorry, ma’sao,” P?pa says. Though the man is nicer than the woman, he still walks away visibly disappointed.
　　On the way back, the Boy asks his father the question that has been bothering him ever since the well-dressed woman came: Why indeed is no one selling lobsters? He remembers they used to.
　　P?pa stifles a laugh. “Because them kazuum nobles have done nothing but gorge themselves on them things in the past two years, and now all the grounds have been fished clear.”
　　“They’re all gone?” the Boy asks.
　　“Well, not all. There are a couple of colonies left up near Kiia island, apparently, but the Coalition, of course, forbids fishing them to prevent them from going ixeent.” He spits. “‘Free trade my kazuum.”
　　Extinct, the Boy thinks but doesn’t say. Not today. It’s one of the bad days.
　　So, he nods and thinks on it.
　　The rest of the day passes as expected. M?mah makes dinner, but it’s just rice and plantains again, like the days and weeks before. They have leftover dried fish from the market, but P?pa wants to keep it for tomorrow. The Boy thinks it’s stupid. No one will buy old fish. No one ever does. He knows better than to tell P?pa this.
　　After he is done eating, P?pa stands and leaves without a word. M?mah looks after him and sighs. The Boy helps her clean up, then goes outside to play.
　　He finds P?pa on his wicker chair in front of the house. The sun has just disappeared behind the tree line, sending scattered slivers of light through the palm fronds and the pink myrtles. There’s a bottle in P?pa’s hand. “Rice drink” is what he calls it, but the Boy isn’t stupid. He knows the name other people use.
　　“P?pa?”
　　P?pa looks up. “What?”
　　The Boy tells him. There are no lobsters left to catch, he understands that. But what if they could sell them without actually having to catch them first?
　　P?pa shakes his head. “You’re not making sense, son. Go to bed.”
　　But the Boy continues talking. When you cut away the shell, he explains, lobster meat is white with a tinge of red, and it tastes mild and a little sweet, almost like emperor shrimps. With a bit of red salt for the color and some cane sugar for the taste, who’d know the difference?
　　“Hold on—are you suggesting we sell shrimps as lobsters?”
　　The Boy shrugs.
　　“You’re a fool,” P?pa says. “The people want the whole thing, shell and feelers and all, alive if possible. No way they’re going to buy chunks of strange-looking meat.”
　　“But what if we’re the only ones selling it?” the Boy argues. “And when they ask why we don’t sell them whole, well, couldn’t we just tell them that they’re from up north and that we need to cut them up and salt them so they don’t go foul during transport?”
　　Long pause.
　　“What if anyone finds out?” P?pa asks. “The Coalition’s going to whip our backs till we bleed.”
　　The Boy allows himself a grin. “Why, then we just tell the Coalition the truth: they aren’t real lobsters, so we’re innocent. We’ll just pay everyone a game penny and that’s it.”
　　“They won’t never buy from us again.”
　　“Why not? ‘If you signed the deal, don’t whine if they steal.’ It’s not like we’d be poisoning them, is it? They wanted lobster, so we gave them something that looks and tastes just like it. And even if they do figure it out, they’ll probably just compliment us on our wit. I mean, isn’t that precisely what makes our country greater than others? That Morala favors the bold, the cunning, and those who create their own fortune? We wouldn’t be committing a crime, P?pa. We’d only be playing the game the way the winners do.”
　　He copied the last two sentences almost word for word from two merchants he had overheard at the market earlier this week. He likes how they sound.
　　Silence. A mantis hops onto the armrest of the wicker chair. Inside, dishes clatter.
　　M?mah.
　　At last, P?pa’s lips curl in a grin, and for a breath, the Boy is the proudest child on Kilé. Patting his thigh, P?pa says. “Come here, son.”
　　The Boy does as asked. P?pa’s breath smells of “rice drink,” but today, the Boy doesn’t mind.
　　P?pa begins to massage the Boy’s right shoulder, the way he always does when the Boy has done something right. It’s all he ever does—no kind words, no hugs, no kisses.
　　When the Boy once saw Ruuke’s father give him a kiss on the forehead, he was surprised. Ruuke is the kid from the plantain farm further up the jungle, and the Boy doesn’t care much for him, not just because his father is a sissy who pecks his kids the way only mothers should, but because Ruuke’s a simpleton, a kazuum, whose horizon starts at playing Wadwê with the other boys and ends at Vareena’s “raven-black hair.” He actually thinks that comparison makes him sound smart. The Boy is too young to realize that for most people of his village, including his parents, it probably does.
　　“Bright child . . . such a bright child,” P?pa says, continuing to knead the Boy’s shoulder. “You always were. Gods, how happy I am to have you. After all, I’m just a simple, coinless kazuum, right? A simple, coinless kazuum who’s too stupid to understand the way smart people like you think. How happy I am to have you.” He kneads harder, digs his thumb into the flesh of the Boy’s shoulder.
　　The Boy’s smile falters. “P?pa—”
　　“You know what I think, son? I think you need a lesson.” The Boy tries to get up, but P?pa wraps his arm around his chest and keeps him in place. “I thought I taught you this already, but I guess I was wrong.”
　　With that, he stands and yanks the Boy up by his neck. The Boy isn’t smiling now—he is grimacing, kicking and trying to break free, but it’s pointless. P?pa drags him over to a nearby barrel. There was a constant downpour last night, so it’s filled to the brim with rainwater.
　　“P?pa—”
　　P?pa pushes the Boy’s head into the barrel. The world goes dark. Warm water burns his eyeballs, floods his mouth. Instinctively, the Boy screams, letting water into his larynx; coughs, sucks in more.
　　He can’t, the Boy thinks. He can’t.
　　Harsh words, yuz. Clouts to the ear, yuz. Two strikes on his thighs with the cane that time the Boy broke the fishing rod, yuz.
　　But this? No.
　　It’s a lesson, he somehow manages to think through the panic, while his lungs fill with fire. It’s a lesson, and any moment now, he’ll pull me up. He has to.
　　He doesn’t.
　　He has to, the Boy thinks again and again, while his survival instincts kick in, while he flails his arms and struggles as his lungs fill with water.
　　He has to.
　　He doesn’t.
　　His sight blackens. His muscles weaken.
　　Air.
　　He is back above the water now, his lungs aflame, his throat filled with coals, and his heart racing. He gasps for air, sucking more water into his windpipe, coughs it out, wheezes, coughs out more. His head spins, the evening sun stings on his skin. P?pa still has him by the neck, holding his face just above the water.
　　“Are you listening, son?”
　　The Boy wants to answer, but all he manages is another cough. P?pa presses his head back towards the water. A finger-length before the surface, the Boy manages a croak.
　　“What was that?”
　　“Yuz,” the Boy coughs. “Yuz, P?pa, I’m . . . I’m listening.”
　　P?pa yanks him up.
　　Never, the Boy thinks. He’d never do this.
　　He was a sad man, an angry man at times, but he loved him. All this . . . it just doesn’t make any sense.
　　And yet it happened.
　　P?pa stoops so their faces are level. His breath still smells like “rice drink,” but now it makes the Boy nauseous.
　　“Now let me ask you a question, son. If Morala favors them who create their own fortune, then why are we here? Why do we eat the same shit every night, why was there no money to pay the medicus when you got that bad cough last year, why do we always have less than all them others? Don’t you think I’ve tried? Don’t you think I’ve tried to give you and M?mah the life you deserve? Don’t you think I worked until my fingers bled and my fucking back broke?” Briefly, his eyes glaze over and he looks away, but they snap back a second later, now harder than before. “Yuz, son, I have. I have tried, over and over, but it just didn’t help! And do you want to know why?”
　　Not realizing P?pa wants an actual answer, the Boy says nothing, just stares into this man’s eyes that look amber in the evening light. He doesn’t recognize them.
　　P?pa slaps him across the face. Blood wells up in the Boy’s mouth as he bites down hard on his tongue. Stars dance before his eyes.
　　“Fucking answer the question! Do you know why?!”
　　“No!” the Boy manages. “Gods, no, I don’t!”
　　“Because we don’t all start with the same tools! Because this cunt of a Goddess did not make us all equal! Some are born smart, some are born dumb, some rich, some poor, some beautiful, some ugly, and if you’re born at the bottom, that’s where you’ll stay!
　　Gods, son, lobsters? Are you really that stupid? We’re not like them! We’re not made for greatness! We’re too dumb, too poor, too ugly, and there’s nothing, absolutely nothing, we can do to make up for that. Trust me, I’ve tried! I’ve fucking tried!” His eyes sheen.
　　Snot runs from his nose.
　　He lets go. The Boy sinks down against the side of the barrel like a wet cloth.
　　Something flickers across P?pa’s face, and suddenly, he’s P?pa again, the man the Boy loves and looks up to despite his bad temper and sadness. P?pa stares at his hands. Water drips from his callused fingers. He opens his mouth as if to say something, as if to apologize, to tell the Boy he’s sorry, to hug him, to go back inside and play a round of Vuua with him, but then he doesn’t.
　　When he speaks again, he says, “There’s a place for people like us, son. Always remember that. Sometimes you just have to accept the hand life dealt you.”
　　And he leaves.
　　This night, he hears M?mah and P?pa argue as he lies on his hay bed in the cramped sleeping room he shares with them. They do that often, but usually their fights are short and explosive and end with M?mah falling into line, but not this time. It goes on and on.
　　Until something shatters. And the door slams shut.
　　For several minutes, he can hear M?mah sob from behind the bamboo screens that serve as walls. Then she stops, and suddenly, she’s by his bedroll.
　　“We’re leaving,” she says. Her right eye is swollen. There’s a gash on her lip.
　　The Boy doesn’t argue. Once they’re past the village, he asks, “What about P?pa?”
　　There’s a long silence, so long the Boy is surprised when M?mah finally answers.
　　“We’re better off without him.”
#Chapter Two - Scythe
　　THE ATTACK CAME fast and without mercy.
　　Before Jespar even realized what was happening, the bearers had already T dropped the palanquin. It crashed down on the flagstone. Jespar managed to steady himself, but the Counselor fell over forwards and hit his head hard on the edge of Jespar’s bench. Outside, there was another scream and the sounds of swords being drawn.
　　An ambush, Jespar thought as his mind finally caught up with the events.
　　Then: Fuck.
　　He snapped out of his stupor, stood, and yanked the door open.
　　They were on some kind of town square, framed by palm trees and flowerbeds, surrounded by villas. A fountain flaunted in its center, crowned by a statue of a bearded man wearing a horned crown. The sun set behind the greened rooftops.
　　Whatever was happening had reduced the escort to a confused mess. While two of the palanquin bearers were nowhere to be seen, the other two cowered behind the fountain, arms clasped around their chest and trembling all over.
　　“Outlander!”
　　Sergeant M?adira. Like the other guards, she had her shield raised, but seemed uncertain which side to cover. A guard lay motionless at her feet, a bolt sticking out between the slit of her visor. Another was in front of the palanquin, still alive and clutching at the tiny twig sticking from his throat. For some reason, he didn’t scream. He just muttered, blood welling up from between his lips.
　　“Outlander!” M?adira shouted again. “Get b—”
　　Wood exploded.
　　The bolt had hit the doorjamb only finger-lengths from where Jespar stood, the fletching still quivering from the impact. For a heartbeat, the shock rooted him to the spot. Then he leaped out of the palanquin and ran for cover behind the fountain. While one of the bearers hiding there looked at Jespar almost pleadingly, the other one kept staring up ahead, his body pressed against the basin stone as if he could meld with it if only he tried hard enough.
　　M?adira cursed. “Formation! Now!”
　　Finally, the confusion broke. Within seconds, the remaining guards formed a crescent around the palanquin, crouching and their shields raised slightly tilted above their heads like protective awnings. The next bolt came flying, aimed at a young man who, for some reason, wasn’t wearing a helmet. It ricocheted off the nuvium with such force that it bounced back several arm-lengths.
　　Crossbows, Jespar realized.
　　And they’re good.
　　As if to confirm his thought, another bolt struck. Despite the formation, it hit a guardswoman right in the fold between arm and breast where neither armor nor shields protect. She cried out and almost dropped the shield, but the adjacent guard managed to steady her in time.
　　No. Not just good.
　　They were exceptional. Five bolts, and three of them had hit home with scalpel-like precision. That the one aimed at Jespar hadn’t pierced his skull had been nothing but a fluke. His chest tightened. He drew a deep breath and tried to calm the panic threatening to take over. As a young mercenary, he had thought the fear got better the more fights you fought. It didn’t.
　　Gripping the hilts of his daggers, he peeked over the rim of the basin. In formation and hidden behind their nuvium shields, they seemed safe enough, but equally helpless, like a tortoise flipped onto its back.
　　“Outlander!”
　　M?adira. She was glaring at him from between her visor. When their eyes met, she nodded her chin at a villa on the northern side of the square. At first, Jespar saw nothing.
　　Then he recognized a figure hidden behind curtains of hanging ivy on the building’s balcony. He held a big crossbow tucked between his knees, turning a little crank on its bridge.
　　Something cut through the air and missed Jespar by finger-lengths. Jespar immediately dropped back behind the basin.
　　Close. Too godsdamned close.
　　Blood throbbed in his temples; his heart hammered against the inside of his chest. He drew another breath to calm himself.
　　Two marksmen, he thought. One on the balcony, the other one, judging by the direction of the bolt, somewhere to the western side of the square. With his heart still racing, Jespar forced himself to take another look, tracing the supposed trajectory of the shot. This time, it was the marksman herself who gave her location away. She sneezed. Immediately, Jespar looked at where he thought the sound had come from. Another villa, this one three storeys high. He ran his eyes up and down the fa?ade. At last, he spotted a silhouette behind a window. The shadows partially obscured her, but there was no mistaking the weapon whose tip rested on the windowsill.
　　Two assassins—one north, one west.
　　What now?
　　They could wait it out.
　　“Bad idea,” Jespar mumbled. The ambush had been going on for several minutes, and not a soul had come to the square since then. Why?
　　The feast.
　　Of course. What better time for an assassination attempt than while most residents were getting drunk and the guards were busy acting as their chaperones? No. They couldn’t count on help, and as much as patience was a virtue, its effectiveness against crossbow fire was debatable, leaving only one option: a counterattack.
　　They had to neutralize the marksmen, then deal with the other assassins who were undoubtedly waiting in some house or alley to come charging and finish the job once the escort was weakened enough.
　　Jespar glanced at Sergeant M?adira. She had also noticed the second marksman and had exchanged her scimitar for a pistol crossbow while her left hand held the shield in position. However, she seemed to be the only one in possession of a ranged weapon; the other guards still clutched their scimitars.
　　The markswoman from the western building loosed another shot. The bolt bounced off M?adira’s shield, not leaving as much as a dent. M?adira turned her face at Jespar, her eyes a silent question. Jespar nodded in the direction the bolt had just come from. Then, he drew his two throwing knives, one from the sheath sewn to his right boot, the other from his belt. He shut his eyes. Steadied his breath.
　　A window.
　　All he needed was a window.
　　Fate or chance, it came the moment he opened his eyes again. Just as the assassin on the balcony had finished winding up his crossbow and prepared another shot, a woman in a purple dress appeared in the opening of the southern alley. When she noticed the chaos, she froze.
　　The marksman raised the crossbow and aimed at the escort.
　　The woman screamed.
　　It was only a second of hesitation on the assassin’s end, but that was all Jespar needed.
　　Sending a prayer to chance that the other one hadn’t finished reloading, he leapt to his feet, aimed, and hurled his knife. It cut through the air, made a full spin, and hit the marksman clean in the chest...
　　Hilt first.
　　Shit.
　　For a breath, the assassin seemed unable to move. He touched the point where the knife had hit, mouth agape in a way Jespar might have found comical had his life not been at stake. Then, his eyes snapped to Jespar, and the tip of the crossbow along with them.
　　The shot never came. Instead, the marksman collapsed, a black dart sticking from his neck.
　　Multiple things happened at once: The woman in the alley awoke from her stupor, whirled around, and ran. A scream came from the western building, followed shortly by a shot aimed at M?adira, whose pistol crossbow had fired the dart that had saved Jespar’s life. Lacking the cover of her shield, the crossbow bolt hit her in the shoulder. Without thinking, Jespar spun ninety degrees and flung his second throwing knife towards the second assassin.
　　Jespar was a good shot.
　　Good, but not masterful—which was why, given the rules of probability, the angle, and the distance, his throw should have missed by arm-lengths. Since Jespar also believed omnipotent deities had better things to do than correcting the course of badly aimed throwing knives, the only explanation for why this one hit nonetheless was simple: he had a shit-ton of luck.
　　With uncanny precision, the knife sank into the markswoman’s right eye. There was not even a scream. She simply dropped her crossbow and collapsed like a puppet rid of its strings.
　　It worked.
　　A breath passed.
　　It actually worked.
　　Three.
　　Slowly, Jespar turned his head. The palanquin was still there, as were the remaining guards. Some of them stared at Jespar with expressions of confusion or disbelief. M?adira was back behind her shield, her free hand pressed against her injured shoulder. Blood poured through the turquoise nuvium plates.
　　There was no time to congratulate themselves. Just when Jespar finally realized his throw had not just been some battle fervor-induced illusion, he noticed something odd about the helmet-less guard with the young face. Like all the others, he looked at Jespar, but something about him was. . . off. When Jespar realized what it was, his throat tightened.
　　The guard was changing.
　　It was the only word his mind offered. Bit by bit, the guard’s limbs transformed, shrunk, while his joints swelled and became more pronounced. The guard himself seemed unaware of it, at least until one of his comrades said something. He raised his gloved hand so it was level with his face. Its bones morphed and cracked under the leather.
　　He dropped his shield and began to wail.
　　Petrified, Jespar watched the man scream and kick and flail as if his clothes had caught fire, and only after the transformation had gone on for a number of seconds did he grasp what was happening.
　　The guard was aging.
　　Minutes ago, he had been at the cusp of his prime. Now he was an old man. Within heartbeats, his hair parched and fell out in strands; his skin thinned and stretched tight over his skull; his bones grew sharp and gnarled. No one in the escort reacted. They all simply stood there, watching their comrade wither away under their eyes. And when the guard went limp, Jespar became aware of the figures that had gathered in the mouth of the eastern alley.
　　The rest.
　　They wore civilians’ clothes, but their weapons left no doubt as to their intentions.
　　Assassins. Two of them stood out—a man and a woman, both tall, with skin and hair white as ivory. Their pointed ears marked them as Aeterna, and even though they were of different sexes, they looked alike to the point of mistaking one for the other. Twins. The woman held a staff, the man a double-bladed polearm.
　　It happened fast from there.
　　The female twin slammed the hilt of her staff into the ground and focused on M?adira.
　　A green glimmer appeared around her, flickering and distorting the air. Simultaneously, her brother raised his weapon.
　　He pointed it at the palanquin. “Kill the leeches.”
　　The assassins charged.
　　Two went for Jespar, the others for the guards.
　　His instincts kicked in. Jespar drew his daggers, set his feet apart to steady himself.
　　One of the attackers, a bald man with a bull’s neck, had a two-handed saber, the other one, equally thickset but barely a man, a spear. Bad, Jespar thought. This is bad.
　　Using the momentum of his sprint, the Bull swung his scimitar in a wide arc. Jespar ducked it, feeling the steel cut through the air above his head with a force that would have taken his head clean off his shoulders. Before he could attempt a counterattack, the Young One rammed his spear at Jespar’s chest. He parried the blow, diverting the thrust so it hit the flagstone. Uttering a curse, the Young One stumbled and tried to keep his balance. Jespar brought his right dagger up and drove it into the man’s throat. There was a gasp. The spear dropped to the ground. Blood gushed, some of it spraying Jespar’s face.
　　Briefly, the young man remained on his feet. Then he collapsed.
　　Screaming, the Bull swung his scimitar again. Jespar dodged it and lunged forward with both daggers extended, but the Bull sidestepped him, then flung himself forward, shoving his entire weight into Jespar’s side. A second later, they were on the flagstone, the Bull on top, his knees on Jespar’s arms, his hands around his throat. Jespar struggled, tried to wrench free, but it was pointless. The man was just too heavy. “Fucking leech,”
　　the Bull said through clenched teeth. “You fucking leech!”
　　Panic took over. No longer did Jespar try to free his arms. He simply kicked and convulsed as his lungs grew hotter and hotter, his windpipe sealed shut. Tears ran down his cheeks. Sweat broke from every pore.
　　The man let go.
　　Jespar didn’t think. Like a drowning man breaking through the surface, he gasped for air, then used all the strength he had left to tear his hand free from under the Bull’s knee and drive his dagger towards the side of his neck. The steel hadn’t even entered the Bull’s flesh when he toppled over sideways.
　　For a moment, Jespar did nothing but wheeze and cough. Then, he pushed the man’s convulsing body off of him and scrambled to his feet. One of the palanquin bearers stood in front of him, his trembling hands holding the end of the spear the young assassin had dropped. Its tip was buried in the dying man’s back. He had saved him.
　　They exchanged a glance, but neither of them spoke.
　　The mage, Jespar thought.
　　Behind them, swords clashed against shields as the assassins harried the escort with blows. The guards still kept formation, but if the attackers’ tenacity didn’t break it soon, whatever spell the woman was about to cast would.
　　No choice.
　　Both daggers drawn, Jespar ran for the Aeterna.
　　He had almost closed the distance when he realized she was not submerged in her magic to notice him, as he had supposed. She did see him coming, but she simply didn’t care.
　　Something hit him.
　　It was as if he had run into an invisible fog—it flooded his lungs; froze his muscles; blurred his sight. From the corner of his eye, he saw the Aeterna flick him a disinterested glance.
　　He buckled. The world went dark.
---
　　When Jespar opened his eyes, he looked into the face of a woman. She was pretty—
　　round face, rosy cheeks, chocolate hair. One of her hands was on Jespar’s forehead, the other on his chest, and her eyes were half shut as if lost in some kind of trance. If this was the afterlife, he decided, he was happy.
　　She slapped him.
　　He jolted up. “What the—”
　　The woman opened her eyes. “Oh,” she said. “You’re awake. I’m sorry.” It sounded genuine enough, but there was the trace of a smile on her lips.
　　“... I am now,” Jespar said, rubbing his cheek. “What . . . what was that about?”
　　“A stimulus,” she replied, as if that answered all questions. “How are you feeling?”
　　Jespar hesitated. “I don’t know. Woozy, I guess.”
　　The woman nodded. “That’s normal. You ran into a fairly powerful spell there, but it seems like your body fended off the worst of it.” She looked over her shoulder and her smile faltered. “Luckier than most. Now, if you’ll excuse me.”
　　She stood, smoothed her orange robes, and made to leave.
　　Jespar got up. “Wait—what the hell happened? Did we—”
　　Fight them back, he had wanted to say, but a look at his surroundings gave him the answer. Yes—somehow, they had fought the assassins back. But at a price.
　　People crowded the square. Most of them were Blue Guards, but there were also civilians and a handful of priests dressed like the woman who had woken him. While the guards did their best to look stoic, the civilians talked, gestured, and scurried about, agitations written all over their faces. Jespar couldn’t blame them.
　　The place was a battlefield.
　　Corpses lay scattered around the palanquin, the pavement covered with blood.
　　Mounted torches tinted the scene in an amber light, drawing flickering shadows across the bodies as priests and guards moved around them. Jespar’s eyes flicked to the spot where he had fought the Bull and the Young One. Both still lay there, the Bull’s face blood-smeared, the Young One’s eyes wide open as if staring at some horror descending from the sky. Jespar looked away.
　　“You should probably talk to the Counselor or the General,” the priestess said. With that, she left.
　　Jespar heeded her advice and went looking for Enkshi. At first, he had to pause after every couple of steps when his stomach would randomly lurch and his muscles go numb.
　　By the time he found him, however, he almost felt normal again. His throat was still aching from when the assassin had choked him.
　　Enkshi sat on a bench facing the fountain. There was a bandage on his forehead, and he was talking to Sergeant M?adira and another officer in a decorated uniform. When the decorated guard noticed Jespar’s approach, he frowned.
　　“No onlookers this close to the scene, ma’sao,” he said. “Go back.” He had cropped silver hair and a neatly shaved face that matched his perfectly pressed uniform.
　　“He’s not an onlooker,” Enkshi said. “That’s the mercenary who saved us. Dal’Varek -
　　I’m glad to see you well. I sent a healer to treat you.”
　　“She did,” Jespar said, passing M?adira a nod. She returned it. A bandage covered the wound on her left shoulder, stained with dried blood.
　　“If that’s the case,” the decorated guard said and extended his hand, “Then may you prosper. I’m Major General Owe Duul - pleased to meet you.”
　　They shook.
　　“They say you’re quite the hero,” the General said.
　　“Do they? I almost died.”
　　Duul smiled wanly. “That’s not the way the Sergeant tells it.”
　　“Don’t sell yourself short, Dal’Varek,” M?adira said. “If you hadn’t neutralized that other marksman, we would have never kept up until the reinforcements came. None of us would be sitting here if it weren’t for you.”
　　For the first time, Jespar noticed M?adira had a slight Kiléan working-class accent. It was subtle, probably because she tried to conceal it, yet it was there.
　　“Well,” Jespar said, “glad to be of service then.” He rubbed his throat. Over by the palanquin, the young priestess who had woken him now knelt over the corpse of the young guard the Aeterna’s magic had targeted first. Only he wasn’t young anymore, not even in death. The body lying between the palanquin’s mahogany carrying poles looked like that of an elderly man who someone had forced into an oversized nuvium armor.
　　Jespar’s stomach contracted.
　　“So, we won, huh?”
　　“We did,” Enkshi said. He sounded tired. “They almost had us when the patrol came.
　　When they realized they were about to lose, they took to their heels.”
　　“Just what you’d expect from this coinless scum,” the General added. He spat, a breach in his otherwise impeccable appearance and demeanor.
　　“I see.” Jespar crossed his arms. “So . . . do we know who they are and why they attacked us?”
　　Enkshi said, “Oh, yuz, we know. They were from the Scythe.”
　　“Scythe,” Jespar echoed.
　　“A bunch of terrorists. Those two albino Aeterna who coordinated the attack are their leaders.” Frowning, he formed air quotes. “The White Twins—that’s what they call themselves. Apparently, they think this is some kind of fairytale.”
　　White Twins, Jespar thought. “They definitely knew what they were doing. One of them was a mage, right? A Sinistrope?”
　　“She is,” General Duul said. “Before this ‘White Twins’ nonsense, they went by the names of Cara and Vyrias Zeevarin. Both were soldiers of the Jade Shell, the elite unit of the Blue Guard. Until, suddenly, they decided to break with everything we stand for, went underground, and started infecting people with their nonsense ideas.”
　　“Hm.” A mosquito landed on the side of Jespar’s neck. He squatted it. “What ideas, exactly? If I may ask?”
　　Enkshi made a vague hand gesture. “Oh, the usual coinless kazuum nonsense,” he said.
　　“The system is unjust, the Coalition is evil, and the ‘workers’ should rule the country instead. Kilé has had its share of them over the centuries . . . they are like a wart that always comes back. But we’ll deal with them.” He paused, then added, “Soon.”
　　Their eyes met for a moment, Jespar’s unspoken question almost tangible between them: And just who exactly are we ?
　　Enkshi dropped his gaze and studied his rings. “Either way, we should go. It’s about time.” He turned to the General. “See that the wounded guards get the best medici and the fallen ones a worthy burial. Their families each get three years’ worth of their pay.”
　　The General raised an eyebrow. “Three years?”
　　“My master will cover the expenses. Also, search the bodies of the dead terrorists and see if you can track down their families. If you do, lock them away.”
　　“Understood. Do you want us to question them?”
　　“Yuz—find out when and where and how they joined the Scythe. There have to be nests in the city, and we need to find them. Ah, and General?”
　　“Counselor?”
　　“Gut their corpses and hang them from the walls. I want everyone to know what awaits those who join them.”
---
　　They exchanged the palanquin for two horses and their fallen escort for sixteen new guards. Only M?adira remained—as Jespar learned, she was personally responsible for Enkshi’s and his employer’s safety. When Jespar dared to once again ask who this employer was, Enkshi simply shook his head. “Soon.”
　　They resumed their journey under the star-speckled sky.
　　As it turned out, Enkshi’s newly discovered loquacity didn’t last long. When Jespar tried to find out more about the attackers and the “White Twins,” the Counselor’s answers got shorter with every mile, until he was back to his tight-lipped silence. Jespar stopped trying. He didn’t mind, anyway. He could use a break to think.
　　Run, a part of his mind said. This is too dangerous.
　　And do what? another part replied. Wind up penniless in the most expensive city of the Civilized World, without any prospect or contacts?
　　Better penniless than dead, was the first voice’s answer. This isn’t worth it.
　　Jespar scratched the rash. It had gotten worse with nightfall.
　　“Hypocrite,” he muttered. Of course, he would stay—not for the money, not for the thrills, but because a mission meant a purpose, a purpose meant being busy, and being busy meant less time to think.
　　He didn’t want to think.
　　The further up the mountain they went, the quieter it became. Areas of green broke up the spaces between the manors, growing larger and larger until the Jade District was but a sequence of villas in the rainforest, each surrounded by a humongous property and framed by high walls. Somehow, whenever one villa appeared at the end of a path branching off of Fortune Road, it managed to look even more luxurious than the last. It was as though they’d entered another world, and only on the rare occasions when the canopy thinned out enough to allow Jespar a glimpse down the mountain did he remember he was still in the same city that housed the dirty, overcrowded streets he had sauntered through this very morning.
　　The same city that had almost killed him.
　　Eventually, they passed the first ziggurat, a ridiculously sprawling palace complex enthroned on a precipice jutting out of the mountain. Jespar’s hunch had been right: Not only was his employer powerful, but he or she also sat on one of the seven thrones of the Coalition. But which one?
　　Each time they passed another ziggurat, he expected Sergeant M?adira, who rode up front, to make a signal and direct the escort to its gates, but she didn’t. They rode on and on, following Fortune Road’s never-ending twists and turns, the chirping of the cicadas, the sound of the cool coastal wind rustling the leaves, and the horses’ breaths their only company. After the fifth ziggurat, they crossed a bridge over a river spawned by a roaring waterfall not far away. After the sixth, a wide meadow.
　　They had almost reached the top of the mountain when, behind a steep slope, the road came to a stop before a towering stone wall. A portcullis sealed the entrance, backdropped by a large steel portal adorned with an embossing of Swords and the Scarab.
　　In either direction, the wall stretched on for leagues.
　　Enkshi and M?adira dismounted. The soldiers followed their example.
　　“Open!” the Sergeant shouted.
　　A man appeared atop the zig-zag parapet and briefly studied the arrivals.
　　“Open!” he shouted to someone behind the wall. Feet shuffled, a crank groaned, chains rattled. The portcullis rose while the Scarab on the gate split at its center and the door slowly opened.
　　From the first manors of the Jade District to the ziggurats of the Magnates, every structure, every road and every garden in the higher parts of the city had been part of a race for extravagance. Ever since they had passed the First ziggurat, the size and splendor of the buildings had become so detached from the reality Jespar knew that at one point he had started to absorb his surroundings with the numb awe of a man reacting to colors he hadn’t known existed.
　　And yet the sight of the First Ziggurat left him speechless.
　　Beyond the gate, at the end of a long avenue lined by palms and rhododendrons, stood a giant pyramid. Cut from white stone that glowed like alabaster, it towered high into the sky, at least two dozen tiers that, altogether, amounted to the size of two temples. Strips of lapis lazuli tiles adorned with golden mosaics accented the walls, galleries, colonnades, and gardens framed the platforms. A statue of a bearded man wearing a horned crown enthroned atop the ziggurat’s peak, arms raised like a god basking in prayer.
　　“Welcome to the ziggurat of Jaaros Ismiraael Oonai,” Enkshi said. “First Magnate of the Blue Islands Coalition, Chosen of Morala, and the most powerful man of the Archipelago. Your employer.”
#Chapter Three - Uunil-Y?r’s Slumber
　　There was silence in the antechamber. Not the sleepy silence of a walk at night; not the dreamy silence of an opium den—the ziggurat’s walls simply blocked T out all the noise from the outside. Even the two guards left and right of the portal stood as still as statues, and, as Jespar’s previous attempts to strike up a conversation had proved, they were as loquacious.
　　Jespar sighed. He ruffled his hair, and, for the fifth time ever since Enkshi had left him here, let his eyes wander over his surroundings.
　　As would be expected, the hall was wide and high enough to house another building.
　　Two rows of square pillars supported the ceilings, benches, and planters ran along the walls. A blue carpet extended all the way from the portal to the far end of the hall, at which towered another statue of the man with the horned crown—who was, as Jespar had learned, none other than the First Magnate himself, Jaaros Ismiraael Oonai. If the man had a thing for dramatic pacing, Jespar concluded, this place certainly provided the perfect location.
　　Jespar stifled a yawn and scratched his rash. Since he’d first noticed it this morning, it had spread up to the base of his neck, and the itch had gotten worse with every passing hour. No more sleepovers in brothels, he resolved. At least not cheap ones. He decided to see a medicus tomorrow.
　　He was just about to stand and stretch his legs a little when Counselor Enkshi at last emerged from a hallway on the left side of the hall. He had traded his dirty sapphire robe for a crimson one. At the same time, the entrance swung open and an old man appeared.
　　Weather-beaten skin and an eyepatch contrasted his pressed clothes, his trimmed white beard, and his neatly combed-back hair. Despite his age—Jespar guessed he was at least sixty winters—his posture and gait could have rivaled any twenty-year-old. Upon spotting Enkshi, the old man bowed deeply.
　　“Ma’sao Enkshi. May you prosper.”
　　Enkshi’s eyes crinkled. “Agaam. How have you been?”
　　“As well as can be expected under the circumstances, ma’sao. Thank you for asking.”
　　He turned to Jespar. “Ma’sao Dal’Varek, I assume?”
　　“Yes.”
　　He bowed again. “Then I am honored to meet you. I am Xeelo Agaam, head servant of Master and Ma’saa Oonai, and I kindly welcome you to this humble abode.”
　　As humble as relieving yourself on a golden toilet in the middle of a slum, Jespar thought. He nodded and smiled, pretending to even remotely understand why he was being treated like a noble.
　　“Is she ready to see us?” Enkshi asked.
　　“She is.”
　　The old servant showed them outside, where they began ascending the monumental, straight stair that ran from the ziggurat’s base to its summit. Throughout the climb, two Blue Guards stuck to Jespar’s heels like shepherds driving a sheep. With every step, the breeze got colder, until goosebumps formed on Jespar’s arms and neck. On each tier they passed, he spotted at least a handful of Blue Guards patrolling up and down the colonnades and pathways, disappearing in and emerging from the doors and portals that led inside the massive palace complex. As sprawling and sumptuous the First Magnate’s property was, privacy apparently wasn’t one of its perks. Jespar wondered how many guards in total the ziggurat housed and how much money their pay and room and board alone must have required each week. Probably enough to buy the “divine bathing house”
　　in the Steel District and its personnel along with it.
　　At half the ziggurat’s height—probably the thirteenth or fourteenth tier, Jespar hadn’t counted—Agaam left the stairs to the right, onto a colonnade that extended along the platform’s edge. After a while, it branched off into a secluded garden. They’d been going for at least fifteen minutes now. They followed a gravel path lined by junipers, many-colored rhododendrons, and palms for a while, until the old servant finally stopped in front of a small, white stone house. Surrounded by green—there was even a little creek—
　　Jespar almost forgot that they were still on the ziggurat and not in some fairy tale tropical forest. Wind rustled the fronds and leaves. Insects chirped.
　　Agaam told the two guards that had been following them to wait farther back. They hesitated briefly then withdrew into the garden. The old servant was about to open the door of the house, but Enkshi raised a hand. “Wait.”
　　They halted.
　　“Two more things, Dal’Varek. First, Ma’saa Oonai, who you’re about to meet, doesn’t yet know about the incident that took place in the Jade District. I’d prefer to keep it that way, at least for now.”
　　“The ambush,” Jespar said.
　　“Indeed. It... Let’s put it this way: It wouldn’t be beneficial to her current state of mind.
　　Second, while you convinced me of your skills in combat, I am still skeptical as to how a simple mercenary like you is supposed to help us.”
　　Jespar nodded. That makes two of us.
　　“However,” he continued, “Ma’saa Oonai has a different view on the matter, for reasons she has not yet revealed to me. Now, all I ask of you is...” He paused as if looking for the right words. Finally, he sighed and ran a hand over his bald head. “Well, frankly, I don’t know what I ask of you. Probably to be aware that Ma’saa Oonai has been through a lot lately. Just... try not to be yet another disappointment. Can you promise me that?”
　　Briefly, Jespar’s ankles felt cold. An invisible weight formed on his neck, like a steel palm trying to press him down.
　　“I’ll do what I can.”
---
　　The house’s interior turned out to be a study. A woman sat at a table that ran along its center, cluttered with books, scrolls, and odd devices. The ceiling was low and the walls narrow, contrasting the sumptuous architecture of the rest of the ziggurat. Soft amber light reflected off the marble tiles, cast by two sconces on the side walls. There were more, but they weren’t lit. The woman looked up.
　　Even well into her forties, there was no denying that Ma’saa Nayima Oonai was a beautiful woman. And yet, as Jespar watched her rise from her chair, he couldn’t help but notice something odd about her. No, he thought. Not odd.
　　Unapproachable.
　　There was something in her appearance and demeanor that Jespar could only describe as ethereal, something that made him think of the painting of a saint, with all the good and bad that came with it. Noble, beautiful—distant, melancholic. She wore a purple dress and a variety of necklaces, rings, and bracelets. Slim gold chains adorned her black hair and connected to a tiara around her forehead. Deep, black-blue shadows underlined her eyes.
　　Captivated by her presence, Jespar took a while to realize she wasn’t alone. A woman stood at the far end of the room, running her fingers along the top row of a bookshelf.
　　When Enkshi, Agaam, and Jespar entered, she turned to them, but the shadows that filled the back of the study obscured her features.
　　“Ma’saa Oonai,” Enkshi said, bowing. “Nayima.”
　　“Zagash.”
　　Before Enkshi could say anything else, Ma’saa Oonai had already stood up and approached them. She stopped only a step from Jespar.
　　“You’re Jespar, aren’t you? Jespar Dal’Varek?”
　　Jespar hesitated. “Yeah—Yes.”
　　She took his hands and bowed deeply. Jespar tensed, half surprised, half confused.
　　“You’re here,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “Thank Morala. You’re finally here.”
　　For a moment, no one said anything.
　　Enkshi cleared his throat. “You... are acquainted?”
　　“Not exactly,” Ma’saa Oonai said. She lightly squeezed Jespar’s hands, her palms warm and dry. “But I’ve seen him.”
　　You have?
　　“ In my vision.”
　　Enkshi frowned. “I don’t understand,”
　　The mistress of the house let go of Jespar’s hands. “It’s hard to explain.” She returned to her chair. “I know you’re not a man of the Gods, Zagash. You’re loyal, yuz, and you’re an invaluable friend to my husband and me, but, just like him, you never believed in what the eyes couldn’t see. That’s why I didn’t tell you why I believe we need this man.”
　　Enkshi crossed his arms behind his back. The old servant had stepped into a shadowy corner. “You think I would have disobeyed you?” Enkshi asked.
　　Ma’saa Oonai flicked her hand. Her bracelets clinked softly. “Probably not. Still, I couldn’t take the risk.”
　　A frown formed on Enkshi’s face. He said nothing.
　　“Please, sit,” Ma’saa Oonai said.
　　Jespar took the hardwood chair across her. Enkshi sat down next to him. The woman remained where she was.
　　“Five moons ago,” Ma’saa Oonai began, “before all this started, I fell asleep during my nighttime prayer in the raawa. ” She turned her face to Enkshi. “Now, you know me, Zagash—this never happens to be, but that night, it did. One moment, I was wide awake; the next, I was asleep. And I had a dream.” She paused, as if to prepare her words.
　　“In that dream, I lay in our bed and had just awoken. It was in the middle of the night, and Jaaros wasn’t there, so I got up and went to look for him. Just when I had made it out of the sleeping chamber, I heard someone scream.”
　　“Your husband?” Jespar asked.
　　“Yuz. But something about his voice sounded different. It was... muffled, you might say, and echoed, as if he were trapped at the bottom of a lake.”
　　“At the bottom of a lake?” Enkshi asked.
　　Ma’saa Oonai nodded. “I know it sounds... strange, but it’s the only way I can describe it.
　　Either way, I began to follow the voice, looking for Jaaros in the entire ziggurat. Every hallway, every chamber, every garden. But it was pointless. No matter where I went, the screams stayed the same, getting neither louder nor quieter, as if the voice only existed in my head. And, with every minute that passed, that fear I felt became stronger. But, then, it happened.” She paused.
　　Her eyes fixed on Jespar’s. ““I went back to the grand stairs, and, there, I saw a man at the foot of the ziggurat. And he looked just like you.”
　　Jespar blinked. “... Like me?”
　　“Yuz. Before I could approach him, however, the dream ended and I was back in the raawa seconds after you appeared. Of course, I initially brushed this off as just some peculiar nightmare, but then it happened, and I began to understand that there had been more to that dream than meets the eye. Not merely because of what happened to Jaaros in it, but also because I realized that the man at the bottom of the stairs was in fact a real person—a man by the name of Jespar Dal’Varek.”
　　The woman in the back of the room shifted, crossed her arms and leaned against the shelf.
　　“Hold on,” Jespar said, “How did you get from seeing someone who ‘looked like me’ to knowing it was me? I mean, there must be millions of people with a similar appearance.”
　　“I’m wondering the same thing,” Enkshi said.
　　Ma’saa Oonai laced her fingers. “In order to explain that, I should first tell you the conclusion I came to. I believe that this dream was a vision sent to me by Morala herself. And your appearance in it is her way of telling us that you’re the only one who can help us.”
　　After a long pause, Jespar said, “You think I’m a messenger of Morala.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai smiled. “Maybe ‘messenger’ is a bit of an overstatement. No, Dal’Varek, I don’t think you’re a messenger of the Gods. But I do think Morala intended for us to meet in this trying time. Which also brings me back to your first question: I know it was you out of all people in the world because of your father. My fate was intertwined with his the same way it is now intertwined with yours now.”
　　Suddenly, Jespar’s throat felt dry and tight. He loosened his scarf. “Did you just say
　　‘my father’?”
　　“Damean Dal’Varek, former High Judge of the Endralean Tribunal, yuz.” She looked at Enkshi. “Zagash—you remember what happened before the Gods brought Jaaros and me together, don’t you?”
　　“Of course, I do. The marriage.”
　　“Marriage?” the woman at the bookshelf asked. Her voice was both smooth and husky, like fine leather coarsened by years of wear. There was no discernible accent in her In?l, but there was a singsong quality in how she pronounced the syllables.
　　“Yuz.” Ma’saa Oonai said. “That was twenty-seven years ago, just a year after you were born, and there was animosity between our country and yours. It was a silly affair, really—petty political quarrels between the Magnates and Enderal’s Holy Order that spiraled out of control.
　　“What matters is that I ended up as a chess piece in that conflict. I was still a maid at that time, who had just turned sixteen. You probably don’t know this, but I come from an old and respectable bloodline of the Archipelago, so that’s why the Coalition, with the permission of my mother, decided to betroth me to an Endralean noble.”
　　“An olive branch,” Jespar said.
　　“Correct. The man was old and cruel, and, from the moment I met him, I wanted nothing more than to turn around and run. But I couldn’t... it was my duty to my country, so I didn’t have a choice.”
　　She picked a fruit from a bowl on the table, round like a gooseberry but bright orange.
　　Instead of eating it, she turned it around between thumb and index finger and studied it for a while as if it held the answer to an unasked question.
　　Then she put it on the table in front of her, looked at Jespar, and said, “To make a long story short: Your father saved me. He investigated that nobleman’s past and revealed that his previous wife had killed herself after he severely abused and beat her for years. And though these things are not uncommon, he made an appeal to the Holy Order and argued that it was too dangerous to put me at such a risk, and that the consequences would be disastrous if anything were to happen to me.”
　　“And he succeeded?” the woman at the bookshelf asked.
　　“Yuz. He convinced the Holy Order and the Blue Islands Coalition that there was another solution. And that’s how the free trade agreement came into existence—a true olive branch from which both our countries still benefit to this day.”
　　Enkshi arched his eyebrows. “You’re saying this man’s father is the reason for our free trade agreement?”
　　“I am, Zagash. I was allowed to return to Kilé and, only moons later, met Jaaros.”
　　Enkshi flicked Jespar a sidelong glance. Then he clicked his tongue and nodded, as if to congratulate Jespar on his father’s success. For an instant, Jespar felt the urge to leap up and tell Ma’saa Oonai that his father probably couldn’t have cared less about her life and her marriage, but had simply wanted to prove a point, to bask in his righteousness, which was all the emotion Damean Dal’Varek had ever been capable of. Jespar didn’t.
　　Instead, he studied his fingernails and waited for the conversation to continue.
　　The woman stepped into the light. She was young, maybe Jespar’s age, slim and tall, and wore her chestnut hair tied back in a ponytail. A scar in the shape of a tree root ran down the entire left side of her face and into her collar. “Visions and an honorable father aside, I’m not entirely sure I understood what Ma’sao Del’Verriks’s qualifications are.
　　From what I gathered, he’s a sell-sword, so how do you think he can help with your husband’s condition? No offense, Dal’Verrik. I’m just... curious.”
　　“We’ll come to that later,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “First, I need to know that you’ll help us. Call me superstitious, Dal’Varek, but I firmly believe there’s a reason you’re here. All that has happened... it’s a trial imposed upon me by the Gods, and you’re playing a part in it. The question is: Will you accept it? Will you help me pass this trial as the Gods intend you to? Because I know you’re the key—I simply do.”
　　Nonsense.
　　This is nonsense.
　　But lucrative nonsense at that. Dangerous, fair enough—a game with poison-coated cards where one bad draw could kill the player—but not only did he need the money, he doubted folding his hand was really an option. Ma’saa Oonai might accept it if he bailed out, but Counselor Zagash Enkshi? Ma’sao “Gut-them-and-hang-them-from-the-walls? ”
　　Unlikely.
　　I’ll do it, he thought.
　　For the money.
　　He was just about to speak when he noticed the expression on Ma’saa Oonai’s face.
　　Dignified. But pleading. Remembering the last time someone had looked at him this way, he dropped his gaze. The back of his eyes burned.
　　He thought: Coward.
　　He thought: Failure.
　　Jespar licked his lips. “All right. Tell us what happened.”
---
　　“Light,” Ma’saa Oonai said.
　　They were in the little vestibule preceding Jaaros and Ma’saa Oonai’s sleeping chamber in the top tier of the ziggurat. Outside, the wind whipped against the walls.
　　Agaam, the old servant, nodded and disappeared into the darkness that stretched out before them. A moment later, two sconces lit up. Orange light poured into the room.
　　The first thing that came to Jespar’s mind as he saw the chamber was that it lacked warmth. Not for a lack of luxury: Paintings adorned the walls, gold lined the pillars that rose in each corner, and a frieze embellished the stone wainscoting, depicting naked-breasted men hunting lions. Exquisite tables, vases, cabinets, and chairs filled the empty spaces. No, there was simply something bleak about it, an anonymity that made Jespar think of the courtrooms where his father had passed judgment.
　　They entered.
　　Only when they had almost crossed the room, Jespar noticed the man lying in the enormous canopy bed at the opposite side of the room, submerged in an abundance of pillows and blankets.
　　“Jaaros Ismiraael Oonai,” Zagash said as they stopped at the foot of bed. “The First Magnate of Kilé.”
　　Even though Jaaros Oonai was dressed in a plain blue sleeping robe and didn’t wear the horned crown the statues depicted him with, Jespar understood at once why he was a man worshipped, envied, or hated by many. Power and influence didn’t always reflect in appearance—Jespar had lived long enough to know that. For the First Magnate, however, it did.
　　Oonai’s face was clear-cut, with a wide forehead, a pronounced nose, and two slightly slanted eyes. His hair began in a widow’s peak then went down to his shoulders, and his dense beard grew down his neck, plaited into five braids fixed by golden rings.
　　Even if Jespar hadn’t already known that something was wrong with him, he would have noticed it by now. To the distant eye, it might have seemed as though Oonai was merely asleep—up close, one noticed the unsettling details. How still he was, for one.
　　Immobile except for the subtle up-and-down movements of his chest. Or the sickly pallor of his skin.
　　Ma’saa Oonai eased herself down by the bedside and held her cupped hand to her husband’s forehead. Closed her eyes. Drew a breath. When she opened them, she seemed to have aged.
　　She looked at the young woman with the scar. “I wasn’t quite honest with you, Varroy.
　　My husband isn’t merely ill. He’s cursed.”
　　“What do you mean?” Varroy asked.
　　There was a long pause, then, “He doesn’t wake up.”
---
　　“His coma started two moons ago,” Ma’saa Oonai said, “but the curse had started earlier than that. He just... changed. Everything about him.”
　　“How?” Jespar asked.
　　“His personality. You see, Jaaros was always known for his... presence. When he laughed, people laughed with him. When he was angry, no one dared to speak, and no one could match his eloquence in the conclaves. But then, slowly, it began to wither. He became distant, cold, and spent hours in his study, doing nothing... and whenever I, or Zagash, asked why, he’d either change the subject or deny that anything was out of the ordinary.”
　　Varroy arched her eyebrows. “And what makes you think that change of personality had a supernatural origin? Sounds like melancholia to me.”
　　“That was our first thought, of course. So we asked ourselves what could have caused it,” Ekshi said. “But we found nothing, and still can’t. It had been a relatively quiet year, the Golden Soil Decree aside... but that happened well after his ‘melancholia’ started.
　　And as he would deny anything was happening at all, all we could do was stand by and watch.”
　　Varroy made a pensive noise. “What happened then?”
　　“Well,” Ma’saa Oonai said, “with every day that passed, his condition grew worse. The hours he spent alone in his study became days, and he lost all appetite. At night, he couldn’t sleep, so he started going on these long walks through the gardens instead, which he forbade us to join. It all came to a head when, one day, he ordered Agaam to call in a conference with the other six Magnates and Sergeant M?adira to escort him down into the city.”
　　Jespar shifted his weight from one leg to the other. “A conference? What for?”
　　Ma’saa Oonai glanced at Enkshi. He hesitated. “The Golden Soil Decree. He wanted to revoke it.”
　　“You mentioned that before. What is that Decree?” Varroy asked.
　　Jespar answered. “An edict that the Coalition issued some weeks back. In essence, it put every strip of land in the Archipelago up for sale.”
　　“You mean...?”
　　“Every beach, every river, and every tree in the country can now be bought, yeah, and its owner can charge people if they want to use it. From what I’ve heard, it’s got the commoners up in arms.”
　　Enkshi waved his hand. “The commoners are always upset about something. All the decree does is tear down another legislative barrier standing in the way of progress and our country’s greatness.”
　　Also known as the old money’s interests.
　　Jespar shrugged. “All the same to me. But how come Oonai wanted to revoke it? Did he have second thoughts about it?”
　　Enkshi locked his hands behind his back. “He never explained his motives, but yuz, it seems to. And I know what you’re about to say next: that his wish to revoke the Decree and his melancholia are connected. Am I right?”
　　“It’s not that far off,” Jespar said.
　　“True enough. But as I told you—the Coalition issued the decree nine weeks ago, well after Jaaros’s melancholia started. Not to mention the fact that he had proposed it in the first place.”
　　“Then why did he try to revoke it?”
　　“Because of the curse,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “I told you—nothing he has done or said since his change began makes any sense. If he really had second thoughts about the decree, and there’s no rational reason he should have, he would have found a different way to revoke it—a plan, a strategy, persuasion, the tools he usually employed to realize an idea. But he didn’t. He didn’t even bathe before attending the conclave, didn’t comb his hair, just stormed into the Coalition Chamber and barked orders.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai paused. Shook her head. “No. The Jaaros I knew would have never acted this way. These were the actions of a man under some strange, malicious influence.”
　　There was a short silence.
　　“Okay,” Jespar said after a while. “So, the curse drove him to behave irrationally. And as the Golden Soil Decree is still in practice, I assume the other Magnates turned him down?”
　　“Of course they did,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “And that was when it all got truly dire.
　　What little strength Jaaros had left simply left him. He didn’t even go on his nightly walks anymore, he’d simply lie in bed all day, staring at the ceiling. It was as though the man I was married to had just... disappeared, and all he’d left behind was this empty shell that looked and sounded like him but was really just—”she broke off—“a puppet.”
　　Enkshi put a hand on her shoulder. “Would you care for a drink, Nayima?”
　　Nayima nodded. Her eyes sheened, reflecting the flames in the sconces. Facing Jespar and Varroy, Enkshi asked, “You? Water or wine?”
　　“Water,” said Varroy.
　　“Wine,” said Jespar.
　　Enkshi gestured to Agaam, who once again stood in a half-dark corner next to the door.
　　He left the antechamber.
　　“Do you want me to continue?” Enkshi asked Ma’saa Oonai.
　　“I’m fine,” she replied. “The strangest thing of all was that shortly before the coma happened, Jaaros seemed to be getting better—not much, but a little. We even walked through the orchard the day before, and he told me all about his plans for the coming weeks. And then, when he fell asleep that same night, he simply didn’t wake the morning after.”
　　Varroy raised an eyebrow. She was leaning against the wall by the bedside, one boot propped up against the frieze. She either didn’t notice or didn’t care. “Just like that?” he asked.
　　“Yuz, just like that,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “And he’s been this way ever since. We tried everything we could, but it was pointless—even the medici have absolutely no explanation for what has happened to him.”
　　“What did they say?” Varroy asked.
　　“Beneath the verbiage?” Enkshi said. “That they’ve never seen anything like it and are clueless. They did, however, notice something else, and that is also what first made us suspect that his affliction has a magical or supernatural origin.
　　“Whatever had caused the coma and, they suspected, his change of personality, had also altered the way Jaaros Oonai’s organs functioned. While the liquefied food and water the medici tried to feed him simply passed his kidneys and digestive tract unprocessed, at the same time he showed no signs of starvation or dehydration. No weight loss, no hair loss, no muscular atrophy.”
　　“That’s impossible,” Varroy said. She stood closer to the bed now, studying the First Magnate. Her arms were crossed but she leaned slightly forward, as if inspecting a strange, yet fascinating, animal.
　　“That’s what the medici said, too,” Enkshi replied. “And yet there was no denying it: The coma protected Oonai, locked him in a supernatural stasis that prevents his body from wasting away. At the same time, however, it drained him. May I show them, Nayima?”
　　Ma’saa Oonai nodded.
　　Enkshi knelt by the bedside, level with the First Magnate’s head. With thumb and forefinger, he opened Jaaros Oonai’s eyelids. “What do you see?”
　　What the hell?
　　A milky glaze covered Jaaros Oonai’s eyes, like warm breath on a cold window. Tiny swirls of vapor danced from it, dissolved in the air a finger-length from the First Magnate’s face. His irises were two faded brown orbs under a layer of white. Ma’saa Oonai sighed wearily. She averted her eyes.
　　Gingerly, Enkshi withdrew his fingers.
　　“Feel his forehead,” he said to Varroy.
　　She did. Like her voice, her hands painted a contrast—slender fingers and delicate wrists, but deeply tanned skin covered with scabs. Her nails were trimmed short.
　　“... Stars burn me.”
　　“What?” Jespar asked.
　　Varroy turned to look at him. “His skin is like ice.”
　　“Exactly,” Enkshi said. “And like his eyes, this cold is getting worse with every passing day. Along with the clouding of his eyes and the gradual decline in body temperature, Jaaros Oonai’s heart beats slower and slower, and his breaths grow shallower.”
　　Varroy put her hand on his chest, then on his wrists. Her frown deepened. “This doesn’t make any sense. He shouldn’t even be alive anymore.”
　　“And yet he is,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “Still. Probably not for much longer.”
　　Enkshi put a hand on Nayima’s shoulder. “We don’t know—”
　　“We do, Zagash. If it goes on like this, and there’s no rational reason it shouldn’t, his heart will stop beating in a few weeks. There’s no point in deluding ourselves.”
　　An uncomfortable silence followed. It ended when the old servant returned with a tray of goblets, handed one to each of them, then withdrew back into his corner. They drank, the muffled wind outside the only sound in the expansive chamber. Though the wine was perhaps the best Jespar had ever tasted, he was unable to enjoy it. He glanced at the First Magnate. Cold crept up his ankles. When he glanced up, he noticed Varroy was studying him. She sat on a chair, one ankle on the opposite knee, elbow propped on the armrest, head resting in her palm. When their eyes met, she held Jespar’s gaze for a moment then returned her attention to her drink.
　　Who are you?
　　Varroy broke the silence. “All right, let me summarize: Three moons ago, Ma’saa Oonai, your husband started acting peculiar, became inexplicably withdrawn and distant, as if ‘something had poisoned his mind’ and produced a change in his personality. About a moon later, just when it seemed like he was getting better, he fell into some kind of supernatural coma that, even though it stops him from starving, slowly eats him up from the inside. And you want me to heal him.” She glanced at Jespar. “Us.”
　　There was a brief pause before Ma’saa Oonai answered. “Yuz.”
　　“But not by conventional means, right?” Varroy asked. “Don’t get me wrong, I’m willing to take a look at him, but I doubt there’s anything I could tell you that your medici haven’t already.”
　　“You’re a priestess of the White Leaf. And the people in the slums say you perform miracles.”
　　Interesting.
　　“There’s nothing miraculous about my work,” Varroy said. “I only help those who can’t afford a healer otherwise, and they tend to be very outspoken in their gratitude.”
　　Jespar joined in. “They don’t expect us to heal him through medicine or treatment. If they did, I wouldn’t be here, would I?” He looked at Enkshi, then at Ma’saa Oonai. “You have some kind of plan, and we’re the ones supposed to carry it out.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai didn’t reply. She drank the last of her wine, then put the goblet down on the bedside table, next to the horned crown. “You’re right, Dal’Varek—we do have a plan. We don’t believe that this curse came out of nowhere, but that someone inflicted it upon him—someone who wants to see Jaaros suffer and die, slowly and painfully. Your task is to find who it was, and, thus, how to heal my husband. It’s a shot in the dark, I know that, but we’re out of options.”
　　She focused on Varroy and said, “You are here because you’re a master of your craft, regardless of what you say. And this mission requires an able healer, one capable of thinking outside the box, unlike most of the medici here.”
　　Enkshi frowned almost imperceptibly at this, but said nothing.
　　“And you, Dal’Varek,” she continued, “you know why you’re here—because I believe you play a role in this. What connects the two of you is that you’re both outsiders.
　　However, before we take this any farther, we should get the formalities out of the way.
　　Zagash?”
　　Enkshi nodded, and produced two scrolls from the depths of his robes. He gave one to Jespar, the other to Varroy.
　　“Can you read and write?” he asked.
　　Both said yes.
　　To call the contracts generous would have been an understatement. They assured each of them ten thousand sêr upon success of the mission, enough to buy a small house on Enderal. Jespar read his thoroughly. When he didn’t find a catch, he signed it with a charcoal-tipped stylus. Enkshi did the same, then handed Varroy and Jespar duplicates for them to keep. How civil, Jespar thought. His contract with the Gallowmen had been sealed by Jespar and the captain spitting into their own hands and shaking, a practice he was in no hurry to introduce to the Archipelago.
　　Just when they were done, a medicus appeared in the chamber to check on the First Magnate’s health. Ma’saa Oonai sent Varroy, Enkshi, and Jespar back down to the study, telling them she’d join shortly. Following the old servant’s lead, they heeded her wish.
　　Back in the study, there was more wine for Jespar and Enkshi, and more water for Varroy. After some moments of silence, the counselor adjusted the jeweled rings on his fingers.
　　“So, while we’re waiting for Ma’saa Oonai, three more things you should know before we go into the details of your mission.” He unfolded his index finger. “One: While the contract already binds you to silence, I will be extremely clear about this. From the moment you leave this building, you will not say a single word about your mission or my master’s condition to anyone but the people directly involved. Do you understand?”
　　Both nodded.
　　“Good.” He ticked off his middle finger. “Two: Even though you’re essentially sellswords, I want you to understand that this is about more than ‘just’ my master’s health.
　　When Ma’saa Oonai said that Master Oonai has enemies, she was unintentionally understating the severity of the matter. There are hundreds of people out there who want to see my master dead or suffer, and it wouldn’t be the first time one of them decided to give fate a helping hand.”
　　“The Scythe,” Jespar said.
　　Varroy wrinkled her forehead. “Who?”
　　“A group of terrorists who attacked us on the way here,” Enkshi said. “And, yuz, they are among his enemies. But they aren’t the only ones I’m talking about... there are a least as many smiling sycophants in the Coalition who want to see him dead as there are pitchfork-wielding idiots. That brings me to my final point.” Ring finger. “It’s already been two moons since my master disappeared from the public eye due to the coma.
　　People are already talking, friends and enemies alike. If they were to find out about his condition, or worse, if he were to die...”
　　“He’d leave a power void,” Jespar said.
　　“Precisely,” Enkshi said. “And as you might have figured out by now, the political situation in Kilé is far from stable at this moment. The Scythe, power-hungry nobles, plain commoners enraged by the decree... take your pick. If word gets out that the First Magnate is unable to act or is dead, one of those powder kegs is invariably going to explode. Worst case scenario, all of them at once. So, you see why it’s extremely important that Oonai recovers. If it had been up to me, a group of Jade Shell soldiers would be on that ‘plan’ now, but Ma’saa Oonai insists that it has to be the two of you, so my hands are tied.” He emptied the rest of his wine. “To speak plain In?l: Don’t fuck this up. ”
　　For a while, no one spoke.
　　No pressure, Jespar thought.
　　Agaam walked over and offered refills. Jespar accepted.
　　No pressure.
　　He downed his wine.
　　“Why don’t you revoke the decree?” Varroy said at last. “Wouldn’t that at least take care of the common folk and those terrorists?”
　　Enkshi scoffed. “The Scythe doesn’t care about the Golden Soil Decree; they’re only using it to feed their agenda. Even if we were to revoke it tomorrow morning, they’d still be out there killing nobles and burning down trading posts. What they want is a new order.”
　　“But they’d have a harder time recruiting followers willing to throw themselves into a hail of arrows for them.”
　　“Maybe,” Enkshi said. “But the Coalition isn’t going to negotiate with terrorists, and an existing legislation can’t be revoked until at least four of the Magnates approve.
　　Which they won’t.” He frowned, shook his head. “Not to mention the fact that we’re not going to sabotage our own country simply because a few coinless kazuums are too intellectually limited to see that the decree is actually good for them.”
　　Varroy made an amused noise. “I can’t believe you just said that.”
　　“What?”
　　“That the Golden Soil Decree is good for them. Look, I may not be a wealthy merchant or, stars burn me, a noble, but if somebody were to tell me I have to bloody pay to take a dip in the ocean all of a sudden, you bet I’d tell them to shove their stupid decrees where the sun doesn’t shine. And I’d have all the right to do so.”
　　Enkshi studied Varroy, head tilted, one corner of his mouth twitching down. She held his gaze. Then the counselor surprised Jespar. He smiled. “You think like a pawn.”
　　“What?”
　　“You heard me. I know people like you... you think you have it all figured out. You surround yourself with have-nots, so you naturally turn us into the enemy... the wealthy, the nobles, the oppressors. Tell me, Varroy, did you know that the First Magnate was born poor? That he had to eat roots and bugs as a child because there was never enough food?”
　　Varroy rolled her eyes. “And yet he worked his way up through tenacity and effort alone. Yeah, yeah, I know the bloody story.”
　　“Tenacity and effort are only two parts of the mosaic. The third, and the most important, is a... how should I say? A mentality.” He leaned back, hands folded across his stomach. “You see, if life has taught me anything, it’s that there are two kinds of people in this world: those who see obstacles and those who see chances. The former complain and wallow in their supposed helplessness. The latter take a step back and observe their predicament from afar. And then, eventually, they come to realize that almost every obstacle also has a loophole they can use to their advantage. Like all successful people, Oonai belonged to the latter group.”
　　“How so?” Jespar asked.
　　“By using his poverty as an advantage. Half of what it means to be a wealthy merchant in Kilé is succeeding in spite of the massive competition trying to shut you down.
　　Knowing the chicanery, seeing through the intrigue, and bribing the right people takes up considerable amounts of money and time. Unless,” raising his index finger, “people don’t know you exist. By the time the elite realized that this young fisherman was actually a threat, Oonai had had enough time to sharpen his daggers. He knew them all by heart, all their hopes, all their fears, all their dirty little secrets, and he played them like puppets.
　　Ten years later, by the age of thirty-five, he had accumulated his first million and became the youngest Magnate in the Coalition. And why? Because he chose to see chances rather than obstacles.” Enkshi nodded at the open door, where the moon fell on the dark green foliage. “Kilé is a free country. There’s no limit to what you can achieve, and my master is the living proof of it. Of course, however, the overwhelming majority of people refuse to see it that way, especially those who failed. So instead of changing the way they are, they grab the pitchforks and scream, ‘Injustice!’ at those they blame for their own weakness. And, you know, it’s not like I can’t understand them. Surrendering to your fate is easier than creating your own.” He paused. “The Golden Soil Decree is no different.
　　The whingers complain, the cunning scrap together their savings and buy a pond a little farther out of the city that hasn’t been sold yet. Then they spread the word and charge just three sêr less than the competition—and, oh, marvel, you have a merchant.
　　Opportunities... not obstacles.”
　　Varroy’s eyes didn’t leave his. “And what about you, Counselor Enkshi? According to my research, you were not born in the Stone District; rather, you were the son of a wealthy cloth trader from Qyra. Did you ever have to ‘see chances,’ or did your parents do that part for you?”
　　Enkshi’s smile didn’t fade. He pushed back his chair, pulled up the hem of his robe, and knocked his legs together.
　　Metal.
　　“To my wealthy, cloth-trading parents, I was mostly a cripple, and to the other children my age, I was a cripple, an outlander, and a coalman from Qyra. Not the best hand to start with, don’t you think? First, I cursed the Light-Born for my misery, but then I realized they couldn’t care less and turned to a Starling tinkerer instead. Now, I have my legs back, own the largest manufactory of prostheses in all Vyn, and am the counselor and closest friend of the most powerful man in all of Kilé.”
　　There was a short pause. Just when Varroy seemed about to reply, she shrugged instead. “Well,” she said. “It’s not like I’m going to convince you anyway.”
　　“No,” Enkshi said. “Probably not.”
---
　　When Ma’saa Oonai joined them fifteen minutes of uncomfortable conversation later, she looked better. The fatigue was still visible, but something else had joined it: Resolve. She had tied her hair back into a tight knot and removed the jewelry.
　　“We have kept you in suspense long enough,” she said, sitting down. “So, I’ll come straight to the point. Do you know what a ‘dreamwalker’ is?”
　　A vague memory stirred at the bottom of Jespar’s mind, a conversation he’d had with a sailor during the passage. “Isn’t that some kind of... indigenous shaman?”
　　“Yuz,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “They are shamans of the Makehu who possess the ability to traverse the world of dreams.”
　　“‘Traverse’?” Varroy said.
　　“To remain aware when they dream. Think of it this way: When we, as normal people, dream, we don’t question the nature of our experience, do we? Until we wake up or until the dream ends, we think of the dream as reality, no matter how absurd it is.
　　Dreamwalkers, on the other hand, don’t experience that suspension of disbelief when they dream. Their minds stay completely lucid throughout their sleep, from the moment they’re born.”
　　“That’s... fascinating,” Varroy said.
　　And terrifying, Jespar thought, thinking about the courtroom. He unfastened his scarf.
　　His throat felt tight.
　　“It is,” Ma’saa Oonai said, “though the Makehu themselves consider it both a blessing and a curse. You have to understand that dreamwalkers never truly sleep: Their entire life is one continuous experience, a story that takes place on two different planes: dream and reality. They never rest, which makes them extremely susceptible to melancholia and madness.”
　　She took a sip of her wine then signaled for Agaam to close the door. The wind had died down a little, but the tropical midnight cold was now in full bloom.
　　“However,” she continued, “staying lucid during their dreams is only one of their abilities, and it’s something even normal people can do with enough practice. Have you ever heard the story of the Childsnatcher?”
　　Jespar and Varroy shook their heads.
　　“It’s an old Kiléan children’s story about an ancient Makehu shaman who lives in a cave deep in the rainforest and found a way to extend his life by stealing the souls of children—Kiléan children, in particular. In order to do that, he waits until they fall asleep and then enters their dreams in the form of a kind old man who carries a red sack over his shoulder, from which he offers the most beautiful presents.”
　　“I have a hunch where this is going,” Jespar said.
　　Ma’saa Oonai nodded. “As soon as the child reaches out to receive its gift, the Childsnatcher grabs the child instead and shoves it into the sack—which is, in truth, a portal into a nightmare world constructed by the Childsnatcher where the child will suffer forever, along with the million other souls he has stolen.”
　　“That’s a pretty messed-up way of teaching children not to take presents from strangers,” Jespar said, and Varroy gave him a faint smile.
　　“I agree. And most of the story is nonsense, as the dreamwalkers are healers, not killers. One part, however, is true. They do have the ability to enter other people’s dreams and even force them into their own. According to the Makehu lore, that’s how they did their healing—by entering other people’s dreams and altering them. Apparently, a lot of diseases, especially those affecting the mind, could be cured this way. Grief, melancholia, trauma... everything.”
　　“Hold on,” Varroy said. “If all this is true, how come I’ve never heard about it? I’m a scholar.”
　　“Probably, because the golden age of the dreamwalkers is long past... even during their height, in the days long before the colonization of Kilé, only one in a thousand people had the ability to dreamwalk, which is very little in a culture as small as the Makehu were back then. After the colonization, fewer and fewer children with the gift were born.
　　Nowadays, there are not even a handful of dreamwalkers left, and their gift is only a fraction of what the dreamwalkers of the old days could do. Nevertheless, I believe they are our chance to heal Jaaros.”
　　Jespar blew air through his lips. “You’re hoping a dreamwalker can help us understand the curse, don’t you? By entering your husband’s dreams.”
　　“Correct, Jespar Dal’Varek, that is what I hope. You will find a dreamwalker, convince him to help us, and accompany him into the mind of my husband.” Before Jespar or Varroy could reply, she raised a hand. “Trust me, I understand how mad all this must sound to you. But I told you before, and I’ll tell you again: I know that someone did this to Jaaros, that someone cursed him and rotted his spirits, and the first step in healing him is to find out who this someone was. And I believe that information lies hidden somewhere inside my husband’s mind. It has to.”
　　With that, she took a scroll and smoothed it out on the table. It was a map. “Now, according to our sources, there are three dreamwalkers left on Kilè. One is too old and, another, we weren’t able to find, but the third one, we did. She is a woman by the name of Takana, and you will travel to where she lives and convince her to help us.”
　　They went over the details.
　　Takana lived on Yuva, the south-easternmost island of the Archipelago, that enjoyed the questionable reputation of being the haven of the destitute and the lawless.
　　“Once this conversation is over, and after you, Varroy, have examined my husband, Agaam will take the two of you back down into the city harbor and take you to Yuva by ship. It’s a good six-hour journey, so you’ll be there by the morrow and should be able to return the same day.”
　　Varroy glanced at Agaam. “You’re a sailor?”
　　The old servant smiled politely. “Yuz, ma’saa. In fact, my father was a ferryman, so I probably spent as much time sailing around the Archipelago as a child as I spent on the mainland.”
　　“Huh. I see.”
　　“You’re in good hands,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “Trust me. Agaam has served my husband for over twenty-five years, and has never let him down.”
　　“Fair enough,” Jespar said. “And what exactly are we supposed to tell this Takana when we find her? What if she doesn’t want to come with us?”
　　“You’re free to tell her everything—as soon as she has signed the agreement that binds her to silence. As for your second question,” the counselor continued, rummaging through his pockets and procuring a sachet, “this should do the trick.”
　　He tossed it over. Jespar caught it and looked inside. It contained a small stone that glittered in every color.
　　A skystone.
　　I’ll be damned.
　　“That’s... this is worth a fortune.”
　　“One more reason to keep it close to you.”
　　After all necessary arrangements had been made, Enkshi gave them each a purse with enough money to account for food and unexpected expenses. When Jespar bowed before Ma’saa Oonai, she again took Jespar by both his hands. “Heal him,” she said. “Zagash doesn’t believe me, but I know you’re the only one who can. I simply do.”
　　Jespar tried to offer a reassuring smile. He didn’t know who he was trying to convince—her or himself.
---
　　It was well past midnight and Jespar sat on a stone bench near the stables. Two soldiers stood near their horses, knapsacks with food and water strapped to the saddles. From the bench, Jespar had an excellent view of the island and the city that stretched out beneath the ziggurat, a million lights in an ocean of green. He tried to remember what it had been like to scurry through the crowded streets just this morning—the smells, the din, the ubiquitous pulse of life and motion—but he couldn’t.
　　With a sigh, Jespar let his eyes wander up the pyramid behind him, over its countless terraces, stairways, arches, and doors. In the milky light of the moon, it more than ever seemed like the abode of a god.
　　A dying one, Jespar thought.
　　What had happened?
　　What kind of curse had caused the spirits of the Archipelago’s most powerful man to
　　“rot”?
　　What kind of curse had caused him to fall into eternal sleep?
　　And who had done it?
　　Enter his dreams, he thought, and a familiar cold settled in his stomach. In a way, he was an expert in nightmares, too. Maybe that was why Morala had “picked him” for the mission. He tried to smile at the absurdity of the thought, but his lips didn’t move.
　　“Deep thinking? Or is that your normal face?”
　　Varroy had changed into a fresh set of clothes, leather pants and a dark brown tunic with woolen padding that went well with her eyes. A rod with a handle perpendicular to its length dangled from her belt.
　　Jespar smiled. This time it worked. “I’m a profound man. So, how did the examination go? Any miracle healings?”
　　With an absentminded smile, Varroy sat next to him. “Don’t ask. Frankly, I have no bloody idea what to make of all this.” She sighed, rubbed the bridge of her nose. “Crazy as it sounds, I actually think finding that dreamwalker is our best shot.”
　　“Well, then dreamwalking it is.” He nodded in the direction of the rod she wore at her belt. “Is that your magic healing wand?”
　　Varroy grinned. “Only for the knock-your-lights-out kind of healing. Actually, it’s a baton, the traditional weapon of my order.”
　　“Huh. The White Leaf, wasn’t it? Never heard that name before. Where are you from?”
　　“Why don’t you guess?”
　　“... That’s a tough one. I can’t place your accent.”
　　“Try.”
　　Jespar gave it some thought. “Nehrim?”
　　“No.”
　　“Uhm... Arazeal?”
　　“Far off.”
　　“Well, you’re too light to be from Qyra.”
　　“That’s correct.”
　　He raised his hands. “Fair lady, I surrender.”
　　“What, already? All right,” she said. “I’m from Mel?y.”
　　Jespar furrowed his eyebrows. “Really? I never met a—”
　　Agaam interrupted him. Jespar hadn’t seen him coming. “Ma’saa, ma’sao, I’m sorry to disturb you, but we’re ready to set out.”
　　“All right. We’ll be with you in a moment,” Varroy said.
　　The old servant nodded and walked back over to the horses.
　　“Mind if we continue this conversation later?” Varroy asked. “I could really do with a rest, but since we won’t get that until we’re on the boat, a bit of silence will have to do.”
　　“Sure. There’s just one more thing we have to do—I couldn’t forgive myself if we didn’t.”
　　“Yeah? What’s that?”
　　Jespar offered his hand. “We never got a proper introduction. I’m Jespar Dal’Varek—
　　pleasure to meet you.”
　　Varroy hesitated. An untrained observer might have attributed this to her exhaustion, but Jespar recognized it as the wariness of someone who couldn’t afford to trust freely.
　　Finally, she smiled and shook his hand.
　　“Varroy. Lysia Varroy.”
#Chapter Four - Understanding the Ocean
　　JESPAR’S INSOMNIA HAD STARTED a moon after the “tragic incident.”
　　“It will get better,” his foster father had promised. “With time.”
　　J When, after a year, it still hadn’t, Jespar stopped desperately trying to fall asleep and began to use the nights differently instead. Some of them, he spent reading in the big library of that cavernous house that was supposed to be his new home. Other nights, he went for long walks. And, as much as he hated the reason, he did it, something about pacing down those empty, quiet alleys stayed with him even long after he left Enderal and dreamed of the Corpse for the first time.
　　What was it?
　　Hard to say. Maybe that haunting yet strangely beautiful feeling they gave him at times, the feeling that it was just him in those nights, as if some arcane anomaly had faded all those other people in all those other houses away the moment they had fallen asleep, leaving behind a skeleton world in which Jespar was the only one left alive. A boy walking at the bottom of an ocean.
　　Had he been born in the Golden City, it would have been nothing of the like. “UunilY?r never sleeps,” the proverb went, but not before the one-eyed servant led him and Lysia down to the harbor had he realized how true it rang. To avoid unwanted attention, Sergeant M?adira had decided against an escort to accompany them. Instead, they took a different, lengthier route through the jungle, which was why they didn’t reach the lower city until well past midnight.
　　Still, it bustled with life.
　　People sat in front of their houses, gathered around fire bowls, drank, laughed, and talked over the sound of lyre melodies and drumbeats from inns and street musicians.
　　Some of the vendors still stood behind their stalls, and Jespar even spotted children playing on Fortune Road or dozing in their parents’ laps. Exciting as it was, however, Jespar was relieved when they finally reached the harbor and the cool ocean breeze dried the sweat on their faces. He was dead tired. A scrawny man greeted Agaam at the pier, and a purse exchanged hands. Not much later, a small yawl glided over the waters of the archipelago.
---
　　The lower deck contained just one cabin. There were only a few pieces of furniture, their tips almost scraping the low ceiling, and Agaam’s lantern was the only source of light. Two cots that reminded Jespar of coffins were set in either side wall. The old servant placed his lantern on a table beside the door and adjusted his eyepatch.
　　“I will handle the sailing. You two should rest.”
　　With that, he went out, leaving Jespar and Lysia alone in the cabin. Lysia walked over to her cot—that was, the one she had silently declared her own—stripped off her jacket, boots, and belt, and slumped down on the mattress with a sigh, lacing her fingers under her head.
　　“Speak tomorrow,” she said, and she closed her eyes.
　　“You’re not afraid I’m going to steal your stuff?”
　　Lysia didn’t open her eyes. “Where are you going to take it? Plus, I’m afraid there’s not much to steal. Unless you’re craving the lovely scent of garlic or gruntroot extract.”
　　Before Jespar could reply, she said, “Good night, Jespar Dal’Varek. We have a long day ahead of us tomorrow, so let’s try to catch some sleep.” She rolled over on the side, her back facing Jespar.
　　“... Good night.”
　　Jespar stifled a yawn and stretched his arms behind his back. Then he went to his own cot, got out of his boots, unbuckled and slipped off his gambeson, and pulled off his shirt.
　　He was about to toss it onto the stool at the foot of his bed when he hesitated. He cast a glance in Lysia’s direction. Put it back on.
　　Suppressing another yawn, he trod over to Agaam’s lantern, counterbalancing the slight sway of the ship.
　　“Wait,” Lysia said when he opened the latch to put out the flame.
　　“Huh?”
　　“Can you… Can you leave it on?”
　　“Why? Afraid of the dark?”
　　She didn’t return his smile. “Please.”
　　Jespar shrugged. “Okay. Sure.”
　　He closed the latch and went to bed. A queasy feeling settled in his stomach, as it always did when he was about to go to sleep, not knowing what would follow: long hours of staring at the ceiling, nightmares, or, on increasingly rarer occasions, rest. He closed his eyes.
　　Images.
　　The attack on the palanquin, the air stirring when the crossbow bolt passed right over his head, the Bull’s scream when Jespar had killed him, blood spraying over his face.
　　He opened his eyes and rolled over on his other side. He tried again.
　　More images, dancing across the dark of his eyelids.
　　This is a trial, and you play a role in it.
　　The ziggurat. Nayima Oonai’s dream. The white fog over the First Magnate’s eyes.
　　The horned crown on his nightstand, polished and cold, like a grave good.
　　Coward. Failure.
　　You’re the one who can save him.
　　With a groan, he shifted onto his back. His tunic got stuck under his flank as he moved, causing the coarse fabric to chafe against his rash. It answered with an explosive itch.
　　“Fucking—”
　　Suppressing the rest of the curse, he sat up and scratched between his shoulders. The muffled sound of rain pattering against the ship’s hull and deck set in, first soft, then louder.
　　“Can’t sleep?” Lysia asked.
　　Jespar stopped scratching. “Not really,” he said. “But I’m used to it. Did I wake you?”
　　“No, don’t worry,” Lysia said. “I don’t think I’m going to get much sleep tonight anyway. I thought I could, but my mind’s in a whirlwind.”
　　Jespar smiled wearily. “I can relate.”
　　Silence.
　　“Can I ask you something?” Lysia said.
　　“Sure.”
　　“Do you believe what that lady, Ma’saa Oonai, said? That Morala meant for your paths to cross?”
　　Jespar searched his mind for a witty remark but found only exhaustion. “No,” he said.
　　“No, I don’t.”
　　“Huh. Then what about that dream she had?”
　　“I have no idea. My guess is that she just saw some man that vaguely looked like me and subconsciously filled in the blanks in hindsight.” He considered the thought, then nodded as if to confirm this to himself. “I mean, think about it: Twenty-eight years ago, my father pops into her life and saves her from a lifetime of misery. Now, her husband’s in danger and not even the best healers of Kilé can help him.”
　　“So, her mind creates another savior figure,” Lysia said.
　　“Yeah. It makes sense, doesn’t it?”
　　“I guess…”
　　For some breaths there was silence, as though Lysia decided whether or not to leave it at that. She didn’t. Instead, she sat up on her cot, resting her back against the wall, the gloom accentuating the tree-root scar on her face. Or was it a scar? In the shadowy lighting, Jespar first noticed that the dark skin of the zigzag lines was only slightly raised and there was an almost purposeful symmetry to the pattern.
　　“So, tell me, Jespar Dal’Varek,” Lysia said, “if divine messaging isn’t your calling then what is? How did you end up as a mercenary?”
　　Jespar made an amused sound. “Right into the deep stuff, huh?”
　　“It’s past midnight, we’re on a boat, and it’s pouring rain outside. If this isn’t the time for profound conversation then when is?” She gave him a lopsided grin. “Plus, if we both can’t sleep, we have to kill time somehow, don’t we?”
　　“Fair point.” He slid back to lean against the wall, propping his pillow—a sack with foul-smelling hay—between the wood and his back. His rash continued to burn, but he ignored it. “Though I’m afraid I have to disappoint you… my story isn’t that spectacular.
　　I left my country to travel, ran out of money, and started taking jobs. And since I can handle a sword, things just kind of went their own way from there.”
　　How charmingly simplified, he thought.
　　“Okay, but why did you leave your country?”
　　Jespar smiled. “Guess.”
　　“Um… You made enemies with the wrong people?”
　　“No.”
　　“Someone tragically broke your heart?”
　　“Afraid not.”
　　“You slept with the king’s wife and now the entire country is after you?”
　　Jespar laughed. “Not really. To be honest, I don’t think there’s a particular reason I left.” The lie felt shabby, so he decided to add some truth. “I suppose I just hate being in the same place for too long. It makes me feel… I don’t know. Nervous.”
　　“I see.” Her lop-sided grin returned. “Commitment issues.”
　　Jespar frowned in exaggerated indignation. “Oh, please… I’m very committed.”
　　“Yeah?”
　　“Yeah. In fact, I’m currently in a happy relationship with someone very special. She’s always there if I need someone to talk to and brings me warmth and comfort in the lonely nights.”
　　“Uh-huh? And who is the lucky lady?”
　　Jespar fished his leather gambeson from the bedside and rummaged through the pockets. “Here,” he said, holding up his nightflower pipe.
　　They laughed. It felt good, genuine, the laugh of two people who don’t know each other that well but want to. He went through his pockets again and produced a satchel.
　　The rain had picked up. “Do you want to try?”
　　“What’s that? Tobacco?”
　　“No, nightflower. They have the best stuff in these parts.”
　　“I’m not—I don’t know. I don’t usually do these… things.”
　　Water, Jespar remembered. Not wine. He shrugged. “Okay, sure, no problem. Do you mind if I light one, though?”
　　“That’s fine.”
　　Jespar had not even stuffed his pipe when an expression that was half-frown, half-smile crossed Lysia’s face. “Ah, you know what? I’m in. Just don’t make it too strong, it’s been ages.”
　　“Okay.”
　　Lysia got up and walked over to his cot. A pleasant shiver ran down his arms as she sat down just a finger-length from him. He continued to stuff his pipe, blending the crumpled, purple leaves of the nightflower with sugarmint. When he was done, he went to the lantern, lit the pipe, and sat back down. He handed the pipe to Lysia. “Ladies first.”
　　“How gallant.”
　　To his surprise, Lysia took a deep pull and held the smoke in for several seconds before exhaling. Violet swirls of smoke danced up to the ceiling, the cool scent of mint mingling with the sweet aroma of nightflower that always reminded Jespar of moss and vanilla.
　　With a long sigh, Lysia reclined against the wall. “This is good,” she said, half to herself, half to Jespar. “This is really good.”
　　She passed the pipe. The wood on the handle was warm—Jespar wondered whether it was from the smoldering leaves in the chamber or the tips of Lysia’s fingers. He pulled. It was good, even better than what they’d served him in the sa’nuu— he’d gotten it when he’d left the drug tent to get some food while waiting for Enkshi earlier that day.
　　Today.
　　Had it really been less than twenty-four hours since he’d woken up in that brothel? It felt like weeks. Closing his eyes, he let the familiar warmth settle in his body and mind, driving away bad thoughts and bad memories. A smile settled on his lips.
　　“So,” Jespar said, handing the pipe back to Lysia. “You’re actually from Mel?y, huh?
　　What’s it like there? I’ve heard stories.”
　　“Well,” Lysia said after she’d taken another puff from the pipe, “it’s a big mountain of ice with a couple of settlements on the shoreline. It never gets hotter than ten sparks, not even in summer, and, in winter, we get less than an hour of daylight.”
　　“Gods… that sounds awful. No offense.”
　　“None taken. I’m more of a tropical paradise person myself.”
　　Upstairs, a gust swept over the deck. Planks creaked, wood moaned. Jespar’s thoughts went out to the old servant, and whether he was doing all right steering the ship on his own, but the wind calmed.
　　“Then you must be feeling right at home here.” There was a short silence, but it wasn’t uncomfortable. “So, you’re a light mage, did I hear that right?”
　　“A light mage and a medicus, as they call it in these parts. To be honest, I try to avoid the magic part whenever possible.”
　　“Arcane fever, huh?” Jespar knew how magic worked, but he’d always had troubles wrapping his head around it: There was an ocean of realities, eventualities, next to ours, and people with the gift, arcanists, were simply able to perceive those realities and transfer elements from them into ours. A firewall? Flames from a reality where the spot you conjured it at was already burning. Healing? Evoking the reality in which the wound had never been inflicted. As there were indefinite eventualities, the possibilities were virtually endless—at least in theory. The truth was that seeing and interacting with other worlds was a strenuous process for the brain, and the consequences ranged from light fever to madness or aneurysms. What determined the power of a mage and how much of another reality they could transfer into their own was ultimately their mental resilience, which was part training, part natural aptitude.
　　Lysia took another drag, then passed Jespar the pipe. “You’re well-informed.”
　　“I’ve worked with arcanists,” he said. “And you’re some kind of healer of the poor, aren’t you?
　　“That’s a bit of an overstatement. I’d say I’m just a traveling medicus who doesn’t think the weight of your purse should decide whether you live or die. So, yeah, I treat the poor, but not exclusively—those who can afford it, pay.”
　　“Very noble.”
　　“Not really. Those I do charge pay enough for me to live a pretty comfortable life, so it’s not like I’m some kind of selfless martyr or something. Again, I just think that nobody deserves to lose his legs over some silly infection that could be easily prevented with an antiseptic or a bit of light magic.” And eerily modest at that.
　　Who are you?
　　“Huh. And where did you learn all that? Ma’saa Oonai said you’re some kind of priestess, right?”
　　“Former priestess, but yeah… the Order of the White Leaf. Nuns devoted to Esara, the Light-Born of Mel?y, who have committed themselves to curing the world of all diseases.”
　　“Lofty goal,” Jespar said.
　　“It is,” Lysia replied. “And probably way less exciting in practice than it sounds. If you’re a Sister of the White Leaf, what you mostly do is pray, clean, tend to the herbal gardens, and transcribe a shit-load of dusty, old tomes. Especially as an initiate.”
　　Jespar pulled again and puffed out the smoke in little rings. The effects of the flower were now in full bloom. Everything felt light and soft, his body, the room, his mind. “I see. And how did you end up there? I mean, was it your choice to join the coven or your parents’?”
　　Lysia made a joyless noise. “My parents… in fact, they left me at the order’s doorstep when I was less than a year old. The sisters took me in and brought me up.”
　　“Oh. I’m… I’m sorry.”
　　“It’s all right. I mean, at least I had a roof over my head and something to eat, right?
　　Not to mention that I also learned how to read, write, and heal, the latter of which I have quite a talent for as it turned out.” She took the pipe from Jespar. The leaves had almost burned down. “Also, as tough as life in the cloister was, the nuns were doing good with their work. That can’t be said about most religious orders.”
　　“Then how come you left them?”
　　“Ah, several reasons.” A strand of hair had come loose from Lysia’s ponytail. The pipe in one hand, she brushed the strand of hair behind her ear with the other. “First, because, as noble as being a Sister of the White Leaf was, my idea of life wasn’t toiling away in some lonely cloister in a snowy steppe. I want to help people, yeah, but that doesn’t mean I want to get old in a ten square width-wide room and watch my lady parts grow rusty with neglect.”
　　Jespar laughed.
　　“Second,” Lysia continued, smiling faintly, “there was something about the philosophy of the coven that always bothered me. As if… I don’t know how to put it, as if my sisters were only looking at a tiny part of a giant picture, and that this actually hindered their mission.”
　　“I’m not sure I follow.”
　　Lysia took a second long drag then exhaled slowly, turning her face to Jespar, the smoke framing her face. “It’s hard to describe. As I told you, the nuns are good people and live by what they preach. They wanted to actually cure the world of suffering. It’s their approach that’s lacking. Sure, the older sisters can recite the entire Encyclopedia of Ailments by heart, they can name every single bone in your body, and their idea of romance is probably getting seduced on an operating table. But, as vast as their knowledge may be, it’s at the same time limited. They never in their lives leave the confines of those thick cloister walls. Hell, they don’t even go out to do their healing, but let people come to the monastery to get treated. You see what I’m getting at?”
　　“They live in their own world,” Jespar said.
　　“Their own little reality that is completely detached from the outside world, yeah. And how are you supposed to bloody heal the world if you never go out to see it in the first place?”
　　Outside, the wind picked up slightly, sending a moan through the planks. The rain was now relentless, harrying the wood with needle-strike blows.
　　“I hear you,” Jespar said. “You can’t understand the ocean by just studying it. You have to learn how to swim.”
　　Lysia made an amused noise. “How philosophical. But, yeah, that’s exactly what I mean. To keep with the metaphor, all the sisters ever do is stand on the shore and stare at the waves. And that just wasn’t for me, so I left. I just snuck out in the middle of the night, on my nineteenth name-day, made my way to the next port, went on the first ship that still took passengers, and haven’t come back ever since.”
　　Sounds familiar. “Huh. But, as you’re still healing, you haven’t broken with their goal, have you? To cure the world of all diseases?”
　　There was a short pause. “Well, let me put it this way…” Lysia finally said. “When I kick the bucket, I don’t want to look back on my life and realize I was just another selfish ass who was only out for herself. And, since nature decided to give me magical talent and a healing hand, trying to at least do a little good until the curtain falls seems like a fair way to avoid that.” She clicked her tongue, shook her head. “Stars burn me, that sounds theatrical, doesn’t it?”
　　“Not really,” Jespar said. “I admire your idealism.” Pity that the world rarely rewards idealists. And that some dumb prick will undo all the good you’ve done the first chance he gets.
　　Lysia gave him a smile. For the first time since they met, it crinkled both her eyes.
　　“Thank you. Legacy and purpose aside, it’s not all selflessness and martyrdom. Another reason I left is because I simply want to enjoy life as long as I still can. I mean, who knows, maybe tomorrow another star decides to come crashing down like the one eight thousand years ago and turn us all into a bloody pulp. There’s a Mel?yan poem that sums it up better than I ever could. ‘Live like an eagle, love like a madman, and dream like a god.’”
　　Jespar grinned. “Sounds exhausting.”
　　Lysia mimicked slapping him in the face. “You’re an idiot. Anyway, I think the pipe’s empty. Thanks for that, you were right—it was good stuff. Now, how about you let me take a look at that rash of yours?”
　　Jespar blinked. “My—How do you know that?”
　　“People usually don’t scratch themselves just for the joy of it, and you’ve been doing nothing else the entire trip down the mountain.”
　　“Oh. Well, it’s nothing, really… just something from the heat, I guess.” Why did you say that?
　　Lysia rolled her eyes. “Trust me, if this is what I think it is, it’ll only get worse if you leave it untreated. Now, take off that bloody shirt and let me look.”
　　Jespar hesitated briefly then sighed and stripped off his tunic. Lysia watched him, a trace of amusement in her eyes. It faded when he turned his back to her.
　　“Stars burn me.”
　　“It’s not that bad, really. It feels like it’s getting better.”
　　“And I’m the Empress of Old Aranath.” Shaking her head, she got up from the cot and walked over to hers.
　　“What are you doing?”
　　“Bear with me.” She opened and picked through her knapsack and returned with two tools: a pincer and some kind of spatula. Despite the nightflower in his blood, a queasy feeling settled in Jespar’s stomach.
　　“All right… let’s give those little buggers a taste of magic, shall we?” she said as she came back.
　　Jespar swallowed hard. “B-buggers?”
　　“Kiléan itchmites, yeah. They get under your skin, dig tunnels, and breed like rabbits.
　　If you don’t put a stop to them, they continue until your skin looks like a shrunken mushroom.”
　　“Holy shit.”
　　“Don’t worry. It’s easily curable with the right treatment. Which I, with your kindly permission, am about to perform.” Lysia traced the outline of the rash with her spatula, the steel cold against Jespar’s skin. “The Makehu and native Kiléans have developed some kind of defense mechanism against it, which allows their body to kill off the mites on their own. Of course, that doesn’t prevent us outlanders from catching it.” She tapped the flat side of the spatula against Jespar’s left shoulder blade, where the rash was the worst. His skin felt as if it were coated with a mixture of spices and coals. “Do you know why they call these mites the ‘pigskin itch’?”
　　Jespar cleared his throat. “Why?”
　　“Because usually only outlanders are dumb enough to sleep around the cheap fuck-shacks that serve as brooding nests for our little friends.”
　　“I…” Jespar started but broke off. “I was drunk.”
　　“And that’s why you couldn’t say no when she climbed on top of you, was it?”
　　Her and him, Jespar thought, but didn’t say it. “A man has his needs.” It sounded lame, and Jespar didn’t feel much like joking, but, as always when he was uneasy, his lips were faster than his thoughts.
　　Lysia surprised him by laughing. “I like you, Jespar Dal’Varek,” she said. “I like you.
　　So, here’s the deal: I’ll get rid of the buggers for you, but as this will require a bit of magical trickery that will give me a fit of arcane fever in return, I want something in exchange. A… wish, you could say.”
　　“What kind of wish?”
　　“I’ll tell you when I’m done. And don’t worry: ‘reasonable’ is my second name.”
　　Jespar threw up his hands in mock desperation. “Fine, you wicked wench. You win.”
　　“Good boy,” Lysia said. “Now, close your eyes, will you? This will sting a bit.”
　　What followed was the most painful minute of his life. At first, there was only a tickling as Lysia laid her left hand on the center of the rash. Then, liquid lightning shot through his body. Jespar screamed, flinched away, but Lysia held him in place with a hard grip. Scorching his skin wherever it went, the lightning current zigzagged down his back and up his neck, forked off in all directions, stopping at certain points where it intensified into a white-hot nail of pain for a second, then continued along its way.
　　After an eternity, it was over.
　　Lysia let go, and Jespar slumped down into the cot, his breath coming in fits, his skin gleaming with sweat. Lysia stood from the bedside, disappeared from his sight, then reappeared in his cone of vision with a waterskin and a piece of cloth.
　　She uncorked the skin and held it to his lips. Jespar drank greedily. “Yeah, I lied,” she said. “It hurts like a bitch, but I couldn’t risk you chickening out… you would have probably passed them onto me and Oonai’s entire ziggurat otherwise. Good thing the spell should have killed those on the bed sheets as well.”
　　Jespar tried to reply, but all that came out was a croak. Lysia soaked a tip of the cloth with water and started dabbing the spots of Jespar’s back that burned the worst. “You didn’t feel it yet, but the mites were already all the way down to your hips and up to the base of your scalp. These little ‘pops’ you felt every now and then was my magic bursting them like grapes.”
　　Too much information, Jespar thought.
　　“But... But I’m fine now, right?”
　　“You tell me. How does it feel? The rash?”
　　Jespar felt for it. The skin was between his shoulders was perfectly smooth—no rash, no blisters, no itch. “I... It’s gone? But how... how did you do that?”
　　Lysia’s eyes crinkled. “Secret of the trade.”
　　She went back to her cot. Just as the pain had ebbed away, the rain had let up and was now once again down to a drizzle. His head slightly tilted and his right hand rested on a part of his shoulder where the skin still stung, Jespar watched her as she methodically put her tools, the cloth, and the waterskin back into her knapsack.
　　You like her too, he thought.
　　You do.
　　It was more than mere attraction. Of course, there was something about her rust-colored eyes, her soft, yet pronounced features, and—less sophisticated than that—her butt that spoke to the primordial parts of his brain, but that was only a part of what constituted the way he felt. It was a sense of… yes, what?
　　Recognition.
　　Like meeting the motif of an oil portrait from the hallways of your childhood home.
　　“Thank you,” he said as she walked back over. “Honestly, Lysia. Thank you.”
　　Lysia settled back on the bedside. “It was either me or some overpriced quack. Now, about that favor…”
　　There was a prickle in Jespar’s chest. Ordinarily, Jespar was all but shy, and, under different circumstances, this would have been the moment where he would have pulled some kind of joke or maybe, sensing the crackling between them, even made a direct move. Instead, he said, “Yeah?”
　　“I want another pipe. And double the petals.”
　　Jespar looked perplexed, then cleared his throat. “Oh. Okay. Sure.”
　　He prepared and lit another pipe, and all the while Lysia studied him with what seemed to be a mixture of amusement and curiosity. She got the first pull. She held the smoke in for several seconds then exhaled slowly.
　　Jespar said, “For someone who doesn’t smoke usually, you’re pretty—”
　　She kissed him.
　　Her lips were soft and warm and chipped from the sun, her kiss was demanding. When their mouths parted, tendrils of violet smoke rose between their faces.
　　You like her.
　　You d—
　　She kissed him again, this time deeper, more intense, their tongues circling and touching. Jespar pulled her onto him, hands on her waist, her scent—a mixture of leather, nightflower, and herbs—sending a prickle down into his stomach and groin.
　　When Lysia withdrew her face, her eyes were still half-closed and a grin flickered on the corners of her mouth. She shoved him down on his back and ran her finger around his neck and over the line of his clavicle. The rain had stopped completely, leaving only the sounds of their breathing, the creaking wood, and the waves breaking against the hull of the ship.
　　“I’ve been meaning to do that for a while now,” she said.
　　“Really?”
　　“Yeah. At least ten minutes.”
　　Jespar grinned, tracing his hands up her waist then back down again to her hips.
　　“Aren’t there rules against that or something? Getting involved with your patients?“
　　Lysia clicked her tongue. “As long as no one gets hurt, and I feel comfortable, and like what I’m doing, who cares?”
　　“Fair point. So? Are you liking it?”
　　Lysia planted a kiss on his forehead. “It’s better than expected.”
　　“... Thanks.”
　　Lysia laughed. “Oh, don’t get me wrong, you’re a good kisser. It’s just… you’re not the type of man I usually get involved with. Greying hair or not, your face is a little too boyish for my liking, that stuff on your cheeks barely qualifies as stubble. Also,” she flicked a finger against Jespar’s upper arm, “you could do with more muscle.”
　　Jespar sighed. “You know how to make a girl feel special.”
　　Lysia laughed again. It was good laugh, husky, genuine. “I’m sorry—people tell me I’m too direct sometimes. But, rest assured, I’m enjoying it. Otherwise, I wouldn’t be sitting on top of you, would I?”
　　Instead of answering, Jespar pulled Lysia closer and tried to kiss her again. She resisted and put her index finger on his lips. “One more thing,” she said. “What do you expect from this?”
　　“What do you mean?”
　　“Well, we’re on a mission together, and if that counselor is to be believed, a lot depends on it… so, we should probably, you know, map the road before we go any farther. What do you expect from this?”
　　Jespar gave it some thought. “No idea,” he finally said. “You?”
　　“Fun.”
　　“Really?”
　　“Really. Just a good time… And no need to worry about babies and the like—I took some bitterleaf last week, so I’m still on the safe side.”
　　“You took… What for? For whom?”
　　Her eyes crinkled at the corners. “For someone. You know, considering that I just cured you from a whorehouse itch, you should go easy on the indignation, don’t you think?”
　　Jespar said nothing. Lysia kissed him on the tip of his nose. “So, are we good? Just some fun, no strings attached?”
　　“Yeah… Yeah, we’re good.” He smiled, shook his head. “Some priestess you are, Lysia Varroy.”
　　“I’m full of surprises. So, how about you, Jespar Dal’Varek?” Not taking her eyes from him, she ran her fingertips down his navel and under the loose waistband of his trousers.
　　“Do you like it?”
　　He did.
　　He liked it when she took off her tunic, exposing the strange, marring, beautiful scar that reached all the way down to her right breast. He liked the way her toes curled as he ran his tongue over her most sensitive spot. He liked it when she sat on top of him, their bodies naked on the coarse fabric of the cot.
　　Slowly, she eased him inside her and began to move up and down, up and down, her fingers warm on Jespar’s chest. His hips joined her rhythm, his hands first caressing then clutching hers. A prickle grew in Jespar’s stomach and thighs, shivering heat, and Lysia broke into a soft moan. They rolled over so she was on her back and he over her, her legs locked around his waist, his arms around her back, both pulling each other closer and closer, until the warmth of their skin melded, and the thrusts grew faster and their breaths shorter, and the prickling heat in Jespar’s groin became unbearable.
　　After it was over, they lay still for some minutes, Jespar’s face buried in Lysia’s neck, her hands laced around his.
　　Finally, she smiled. “Let’s finish that pipe.”
　　They talked, joked, laughed as they did. When the chamber was empty, they had sex again. By the time Jespar finally fell asleep, the first rays of early morning sun were already falling through the portholes.
#Chapter Five - Yuva
　　THE FIRST THING JESPAR NOTICED when he awoke was that he’d had no nightmares. No Corpse. No trial. No knives cutting the skin off his body. The T second: He was alone on his cot. He blinked to clear away the sleep and propped himself up on his elbow. Lysia sat on a stool across the room, legs crossed ankle on knee, and in her hands a book. Her eyes didn’t move and there was something absentminded to her expression, as if she wasn’t really reading.
　　“Hey,” Jespar said.
　　Lysia’s eyes darted up. “Oh, hey.”
　　“Slept well?”
　　“Like a baby. I should smoke nightflower more often.”
　　Jespar yawned. “Words of wisdom.”
　　“How’s the rash? Still gone?”
　　Jespar felt inward. “Yeah.”
　　“Good. Sometimes a mite survives and then it starts all over. But seems we got them all last night.”
　　Last night.
　　An uncomfortable silence ensued, as if both didn’t know what the other expected them to say next.
　　No strings attached, Jespar thought.
　　He swung his legs over the side of his bed and sat. “Well then... let’s see where we are, shall we?”
　　Something flickered across Lysia’s face, as though she had hoped for a different answer. Then the left corner of her mouth curled up, forming that lop-sided smile of hers, and the tension was gone. She closed the book with a thud. “Sure. Lead the way.”
　　Upstairs, they found Agaam doing repairs on the sail. Tiny puddles of water on the deck glistened in the morning sun, leftovers of last night’s downpour. Agaam had rolled up the sleeves of his tunic all the way to his shoulders, exposing two arms so athletic they made Jespar wonder if the old servant participated in underground fights during his off-duty hours.
　　When Agaam noticed them, a faint smile flickered on his mouth. “Good morning, ma’sae. May you prosper.”
　　Lysia averted her eyes. Jespar cleared his throat. “You too. Did you get through that storm all right?”
　　“I did, ma’sao, thank you for asking. Are you hungry?”
　　They were. Not much later, the three of them sat around a crate repurposed into a table, eating a mixture of rice, fried plantains, and dragonfruit, sipping black tea, and chatting.
　　Though Lysia and Jespar were on the same side of the crate, she hadn’t seated herself particularly close to Jespar, and nothing about the way she talked or looked at him hinted at what had happened last night—Jespar watched her, undecided how he should feel.
　　Lysia did most of the talking, asking Agaam questions ranging from the political situation in Uunil-Y?r to his service under Jaaros Oonai. As expected, Agaam answered politely but with reservation, and, after a while, Jespar’s thoughts trailed off and he watched the play of the waves in the blue vastness around them instead.
　　As they finished eating, the wind settled and turned the sea still as smoothed paper.
　　Another hour later, shortly before its zenith, the pleasant morning sun turned into an orb of heat baring down from the cloudless sky, so that Lysia and Jespar returned below deck, where they made casual conversation and prepared their equipment.
　　They reached Yuva at noon.
　　“A haven for the lawless and the destitute,” Enkshi had called the easternmost island of the archipelago, and what Jespar saw when Agaam steered the yawl into the port of the island’s eponymous capital couldn’t have been more fitting. Though only eight hours sea journey from Uunil-Y?r, Yuva seemed like a different world.
　　It was a floating city.
　　Even though patches of sand on the shoreline hinted at what the island must once have looked like, every bit of soil was covered with structures. A faint green mist hung over the island, dense on the ground, gossamer over the roofs. The buildings were run-down, the roofs made from dried palm fronds and the walls from woven reed or, on rare occasions, adobe. As exciting as this might have sounded in a traveler’s notebook, it was depressing in reality. The dreariness and disrepair aside, the city lacked a concept—no Fortune Road marked the progression of wealth, no nobles’ district contrasted the serpentine alleys of the outer city rings. Yuva was simply a motley of houses, cobbled together every which way, with zigzagging bridges and ramps connecting them. If UunilY?r was Morala’s daredevil lover, Yuva was their misshapen child, locked away in the attic so no one would see. No one seemed to care about their arrival—no inquisitive harbormaster, no forms to fill out. They’d simply picked the first free wharf and claimed it as their own.
　　While Agaam moored the yawl, Lysia adequately summed up Jespar’s feelings. “Stars burn me. This place is a shithole.”
　　“It’s been through some hard times,” Agaam said.
　　“I wouldn’t have noticed,” Lysia replied. She shielded her eyes against the sun and squinted into the distance. “What’s that fog?”
　　“Nuvium dust,” Agaam said. “Yuva has the biggest mine in the archipelago. Which is also why I advise you to get yourselves a mouthcloth for while you’re here. Also, you should be careful—There aren’t as many guards here as in the capital and Yuvanians aren’t known for their fondness of folks from other islands, let alone outlanders, so keep your weapons ready, just in case. I’ll be watching the yawl while you’re gone—just come back here once you’ve found the dreamwalker and we can be on our way back to the capital.”
　　Eager to leave, Jespar thought. He couldn’t blame him. “Okay. Any idea where to start looking?”
　　Agaam finished towing the rope to the mooring post. He adjusted his eyepatch. “Try asking in a tavern.”
---
　　What Jespar noticed first as they walked down the dockside was that there were far more Makehu on Yuva than there had been on Uunil-Y?r. At the same time, ethnicities were harder to pinpoint, as many of the natives they saw wore the colorful clothes of the Kiléans instead of their traditional, reed-like garments, and a lot of their faces combined Makehu and Kiléan characteristics: bamboo-leaf eyes but dense facial hair, wiry but tall.
　　But like most poor places Jespar had been to, their material deprivation didn’t necessarily reflect in its inhabitants. He came across all kinds of emotions: anger, exhaustion, and defiance, but also pride, liveliness, and a kind of dignified calm—though the former three were undoubtedly more prevalent than the latter. In front of one of the few official-looking buildings, a woman had an argument with a Blue Guard that almost ended with her getting arrested when she dropped the word “Scythe”; twice Jespar overheard people mentioning the Golden Soil decree. What land was left on Yuva to buy, he couldn’t fathom.
　　Most buildings on the harbor promenade seemed to be warehouses, so it took them a while to find an inn. By the time they came to a halt in front of an adobe house crammed between two ramshackle buildings, Jespar felt like a lobster in a cooking pot. Sunburn on his palms and neck underlined the simile. A sign depicting a kraken snapping a scarab in two hung above the tavern’s open entrance. Wind and weather had worn away some of the establishment’s name, leaving it to read “Kr-k-s Ar-s.” Judging by the drawing, the first word used to be “Kraken’s,” the second probably “Arms”— though the smell wafting toward them from the inside left invited another interpretation.
　　“Looks like as good a place as any,” Lysia said.
　　They went in. Surprisingly, the interior of the place was far less dreary than the facade suggested. Except for a group of sailors in a corner and a solitary figure at the bar, the place was empty. A scrawny innkeep with a beaver-like face greeted them; They bought first
　　drinks, then asked for information.
　　The innkeep made an amused noise. “There are at least three dozen Takanas on Yuva, and them are only the ones I know of. You’re gonna have to give me more than that.”
　　Lysia hesitated.
　　“She is some kind of shaman,” Jespar said. “Or used to be.”
　　The innkeep’s face clouded. “The crazy one?”
　　“I guess.”
　　“... Huh. Yuz, I know her. Most of the islandfolk are giving her a wide berth, though.
　　What’s your business with her?”
　　Lysia rejoined the conversation. “Business.”
　　The innkeep frowned. “Fair enough. I’ll tell you where she lives, but it’ll cost you.”
　　A haggle later, Jespar’s coin pouch was fifty sêr lighter but they had the information they wanted. They finished their drinks and went back outside, headed for the Pit—the place where Takana, the last dreamwalker, apparently lived. Neither Jespar nor Lysia noticed the four figures following them.
---
　　As Yuva had no main road, Jespar and Lysia spent most of their time pushing their way through a crowded maze of rat-runs and alleys on the ground and a web of plank-ways and bridges on the rooftops, waving off the countless street merchants who offered them dubious goods, and holding on tight to their knapsacks and pouches. The city was cramped: Every bit of ground was developed, a battle for living space without regard for architectural rules and safety. A tower rose in the city center, adobe at the base, wood at the top, that looked as though the Yuvanians had just kept on adding stories against better knowledge, with oriels and windows protruding at the most bizarre angles. What seemed to be an old town hall had been repurposed into a mass commune. A shack stood right in the middle of a street.
　　The deeper into Yuva they went, the more drastic the poverty and disrepair became.
　　Waste littered the streets, children with bloated bellies sat by the roadside and sold shriveled, black clumps that were supposedly fruits. Men and women, skeletons in rags, wallowed in the shadows of the houses. Only every now and then did the ruins of a structure cut from the white stone they knew from the Golden City’s noble districts poke through the shacks. Despite it all, however, Lysia and Jespar experienced little hostility, apart from the occasional distrustful glance or jostle in passing.
　　It was shortly after midday when Lysia told Jespar she needed a rest and that they should go look for a place where the air smelled just a touch less than what emanated from the orifices of a troll. Jespar argued that they should stay as close to the populated areas as possible, but Lysia insisted. With the sun sizzling on his skin and the green fog burning in his throat, he finally gave in, and they turned into the first alley that seemed to lead oceanward. After following it for quite a while, the maze of streets opened up to a patch of hardpan framed by the backsides of deserted shacks and vegetated with tangles of shrubs and ferns. Waste lay scattered in small heaps all over the clearing, and flies ate away at the remains of a dog in its center.
　　“This will do,” Lysia said and made for one of the shacks whose walls cast an inviting shadow.
　　Jespar rubbed his throat. They had gone too far from the crowded areas for his liking.
　　On the other hand, this was the first place where the air didn’t sting in their lungs and make his sunburn singe like acid.
　　Lysia slumped down in the shadow of the shack and reclined against the wall. “ Bloody fog... how does anyone stand it?”
　　Oh, to hell with it.
　　“I doubt anyone asks for their opinion,” Jespar said and sat down beside her. Their legs touched slightly, and Lysia neither withdrew nor slid closer. “Probably not.” She heaved her rucksack on her lap, pulled out a wooden jar, and offered it to Jespar. “For the sunburn.”
　　“Oh. Thanks.”
　　It contained a white, pleasant-smelling salve that Jespar applied to his face, hands, and neck. The sting eased off almost immediately.
　　He returned the jar. “You’re a lifesaver.”
　　Lysia applied some to her own face. “How come Morala doesn’t tell her messengers that the sun over the Bygone Sea is a bitch?”
　　“Good question,” Jespar said. “I guess she just likes us all tanned and musky when we give our reports in her chambers.”
　　Lysia chuckled. “You’re an idiot.” She screwed on the lid of the jar, and put it back into her knapsack. Jespar unfastened his waterskin from his belt, drank deeply, then offered it to Lysia. She accepted.
　　“You know, I heard stories about this place,” she said after she finished drinking. “But I thought people were exaggerating. I don’t get it, really. I do, but then I don’t.”
　　Jespar took the flask and corked it up. “That doesn’t make a lot of sense.”
　　“I mean that people who think like Enkshi and the First Magnate actually exist...
　　people who know of this poverty, have the power and means to change it for the better, but don’t. It’s not news that the Light-Born don’t care, but the magnates? They are actual people.”
　　“Well,” Jespar said,” you heard Enkshi, didn’t you? They don’t help because they don’t consider it their responsibility—according to them, these have-nots brought their misery upon themselves, because they chose to see obstacles when others would have seen chances.”
　　Lysia made a joyless noise. “I don’t see an awful lot of chances up for grabs around here, do you? Come on, Enkshi is many things, but he’s not dumb, so he has to know that not everybody has the potential to strike it big. Stars, what about the feebleminded, or someone who, I don’t know, loses his entire property in a typhoon? People are different, that’s just how it is, and while some will be successful, others won’t. The answer can’t be to let those who don’t rot to death in a hellhole.”
　　“It seems to be working just fine.” Jespar said. He tried patting the flimsy layer of green dust off his gambeson. In vain. “As long as the people play the game, the winners won’t change it.”
　　Lysia sighed, rubbed her temples with her thumbs. “Yeah, yeah, yeah... I know the story. People are selfish, the world doesn’t care what you want, blah, blah, blah. At the risk of blowing your mind, you’re not the first cynical sellsword to walk the face of Vyn.
　　What I just don’t understand is whether people are simply born selfish pricks or become this way... and if they do, how. Anyway, you still have our provisions, right? Because I’m starving.”
　　Jespar took a bag of dates and two of the yellow gooseberries from his knapsack. They shared and ate in silence.
　　“You want to know what I think?” Jespar said after a while. “About that whole selfish thing, I mean?”
　　Lysia looked up. “Elucidate me.”
　　“That it all boils down to perspective. All this... Yuva, the slums of Uunil-Y?r... it’s so far away from the everyday reality of white palaces, power games, and money that the old money lives in that it has probably turned into little more than a theoretical concept to them.” He ate another date, his fingers sticky from the juice. “They know this poverty exists, yeah, and they also know the Golden Soil Decree will make life a lot worse for a lot of people. But we only care as far as the eye can see, and usually only if something directly affects us... that’s not necessarily malice, just human nature. Plus, we don’t like to see ourselves as bad people, so we create our own worldview that justifies our actions.
　　In Oonai’s or Enkshi’s case, that success is only a matter of working hard enough and that those who don’t make it were just lazy. And, in a way, this view makes complete sense.”
　　“Does it?”
　　“Of course,” Jespar said. “As long as you accept ‘each for their own’ as a your basic premise.”
　　Lysia spit out a date pit. “But that’s a horseshit premise.”
　　“Horseshit or not, it’s the premise most people would probably adopt if they were in Oonai’s or Enkshi’s position—Hell, I don’t even know if I’d be any different. You simply can’t and shouldn’t rely on mankind’s empathy to save the day, because it won’t anytime soon.”
　　Lysia studied him, her expression blank. Then she took the waterskin and drank. “I think,” she said, corking it up. “That you’re wr—”
　　Four figures had emerged from one of the shacks, three men and a woman, and even before Jespar noticed the weapons at their belts, he knew they were trouble. His eyes darted across the square, looking for an escape route; the abandoned shack blocked the path behind them; to their left and right were at least twenty arm-lengths of open field.
　　Even if the newcomers had no throwing knives, pistol crossbows, or slingshots, chances were they’d catch them—if not for their speed, then for Jespar’s and Lysia’s lack of knowledge of the area. He glanced at Lysia, who, judging by the way she clutched her baton, had come to the same conclusion. They got to their feet, not taking their eyes from the four Yuvanians, who came to a halt a few steps before them. The woman, a Makehu with a wild pattern of tattoos around her eyes that contrasted her otherwise almost fragile appearance, seized the word. A curved blade dangled at her side, the steel reflecting the sunlight.
　　“You know what comes next.” Oddly enough, she had no accent, neither Kilèan nor Makehu, which was something that was, in Jespar’s experience, characteristic for nobles.
　　Remembering the skystone in his pocket, Jespar’s hands reached for the hilts of his daggers.
　　Fool.
　　Why had they gone so far out?
　　Lysia raised her hands. “We can settle this peacefully,” she said, and went through her pockets. She pulled out a pouch of coins and offered it to the woman. “That’s more than enough, isn’t it?”
　　The woman looked at the pouch but didn’t touch it. The corners of her mouth twitched downward. “You think that’s what we are? Robbers?”
　　Lysia froze. “I thought—”
　　One of the men, a bulky Kilèan with skin so dark he might have passed for a Qyranian, grabbed the pouch and flung it to the ground, sending a shower of coins flying across the hardpan. “Keep your kazuum blood money. You’re in this because you work for the master leeches.”
　　Leeches?
　　Things fell into place.
　　“You’re with the Scythe,” Jespar said.
　　With a joyless smile, the Makehu woman drew her scimitar. The three men followed her example. “Well observed. And you’re working for the magnates, so we can’t let you leave this place alive.”
　　Jespar’s hands shot to his daggers, but he froze a second before he reached them. There was something in the Makehu woman’s eyes.
　　Doubt.
　　They’re not sure.
　　Of course not—if they were, they wouldn’t have bothered revealing their presence, but would have simply attacked from their hiding place instead.
　　Jespar forced himself to raise his hands, away from his weapons, exposing his chest.
　　“Look, I think this is a misunderstanding. We’re just travelers, and we’re not working for the magnates.”
　　“Bullshit,” the bulky man said.
　　The woman, however, hesitated. “Then what about that scroll you’re carrying?”
　　Jespar’s mouth was dry. He licked his lips. “Huh?”
　　The woman nodded at the front pockets of Jespar’s gambeson. “Earlier in the Kraken, when you paid the innkeeper, you also pulled out a scroll with the coalition’s sigil. We saw it.”
　　The contract.
　　Jespar’s heart beat faster. “No idea what you’re talking about,” he said. “As I said, we’re not working for the magnate. This is a misunderstanding.”
　　“Bullshit,” the bulky man said again, showcasing his broad vocabulary.
　　“Shut up, Ezos,” the woman said. She nodded to one of her other companions. “Vaal—
　　search him.”
　　Jespar tensed. He shot a glance at Lysia, who observed the situation with a blank face, her hands on her hips— ready to reach her baton if the situation demanded it.
　　Four against two, Jespar thought.
　　Bad odds, but they could do it. He’d survived the ambush, hadn’t he? Yes, they could.
　　If Lysia fought as well as she healed, which he had no way of knowing.
　　The man named Vaal approached Jespar, his eyes locked on Jespar’s hands. “The belt.”
　　Beyld. Jespar hesitated. Handing over his daggers felt like giving away your coat in a rainstorm—then again, insisting to keep his weapons probably did little to convince them of his harmlessness. If push came to shove, he still had the throwing knife on his boot, and it seemed as though the Scythes hadn’t noticed it yet.
　　“Are you deaf?” the man repeated.
　　Jespar sighed and did as asked, sweat forming on his palms as his girdle changed owner. Systematically, the man searched each of his pouches. Jespar did in fact have the contract with him; the woman had been right about that. He had also accidentally flashed it when he paid for their drinks and the information in the tavern.
　　But then he stowed it in far-harder-to-find inside pocket of his armor, where it rested next to the skystone. “There’s a piece of paper,” Vaal announced, his hands lost in one of Jespar’s satchels.
　　What?
　　Lysia tensed beside him.
　　The Makehu woman’s face clouded. “Is it...?”
　　Vaal drew a folded piece of paper from Jespar’s satchel, unfolded and read it. First, his expression grew harder. Then he scoffed.
　　“Those are scores for a game of Vuua.”
　　Game?
　　When he understood, he could barely suppress a sigh of relief. The night of his arrival, when he’d been drinking with the sailors, he’d also played some kind of betting game with them that involved colored stones and dice. The note must have been a memento he’d forgotten about.
　　He tried a conciliatory smile. “See? I told you this was a misunderstanding.”
　　The woman studied him for a breath longer, then her features relaxed. “Fair enough—
　　you can go. But next time you come here, be careful where you go. Not all—”
　　“Hang on,” Vaal said. “Let me search the rest of him. I’m sure he has hidden pockets or something. And the woman as well, for that matter.” He turned to Jespar, looking almost apologetic. “Sorry, friend, but we need to be sure you’re not leeches. Because if you are, I couldn’t sleep knowing that we let you go.”
　　Jespar’s throat tightened. He looked at the Makehu woman.
　　Say no.
　　Just say no, turn around, and leave.
　　She sighed. “All right. But be quick ab—”
　　Jespar rammed his right knee into Vaal’s groin. Simultaneously, he drew his throwing knife from the sheath sown to his boot and slashed it across the man’s throat. Vaal’s eyes widened. He dropped the girdle and his hands shot up and grabbed Jespar by the wrists. Blood flowed from his throat, spraying across Jespar’s face, but his grip was ironclad. For some leaden seconds, they struggled, then the man’s arms weakened, and his knees buckled. Jespar shoved him to the ground.
　　Three against two.
　　Jespar dropped his throwing knife, scooped up the bloodstained belt on the ground, and drew his daggers.
　　The others awoke from their stasis.Her face contorted into a mask of fury, the Makehu woman lunged at Jespar, thrusting her weapon at Jespar’s neck. It might have been the end of their journey, if Lysia hadn’t pushed him aside. Briefly, it seemed as though he would lose his footing, but he regained his balance and spun around, unsheathing his second dagger. The brawny man closed in on Lysia, who had drawn her baton, holding it at the side handle, the body of the weapon aligned with the length of her underarm. The third man, skinny and tall, and the Makehu woman, came for Jespar.
　　The fight was quick and brutal, a haze of steel, blood, and heat. When it was over, the tall man was on the ground, blood seeping from a cut along his throat. The tattooed woman lay only a step from the dead dog, a deep gash in her thigh where Jespar’s dagger had entered in a riposte attack that had been more luck than skill. She did know how to fight. Though she clutched her wound with both hands, a stream of blood had already soaked the dry soil under her.
　　His breath heavy and his pulse hammering against the insides of his wrists, Jespar became aware of the blood running down the length of his arm. A wound in his shoulder formed a dark red stain on the cloth. Thanks to the battle fervor still racing through his veins, it barely hurt. He knew it would soon.
　　Lysia.
　　She stood where she’d been when the fight started, the dark-skinned man laying motionless at her feet. Lysia held her side and had a cut on her forehead, but that seemed to be the extent of her injuries.
　　Lysia noticed him. “You’re bleeding.”
　　“... Yeah.”
　　She cast a last look at the attackers. None of them except for the Makehu woman still moved, and she didn’t look capable of springing to her feet anytime soon.
　　Jespar didn’t argue. Lysia walked over and studied the cut. Now that the battle fervor was wearing off, it hurt like a bitch.
　　“You’re lucky... They missed the artery. Hold on.”
　　She took her utensils from her pouch and cut open Jespar’s gambeson to expose the bloodied flesh beneath. Then she disinfected her hands and the wound with a piece of cloth soaked in alcohol. A few houses over, a man laughed. Some dogs barked in the distance.
　　A strange feeling settled in Jespar—triumph underpinned by emptiness. The primal part of his brain celebrated the victory, but the rational part felt that sense of innate injustice that always came after a battle: The realization that he would live on, whereas other lives had ended.
　　Lysia withdrew the soaked cloth, hesitated, then cupped her palm over the wound.
　　“What are you doing?”
　　“Making it better.”
　　A golden shimmer emanated from her palm. Warmth that simultaneously felt cold prickled in his flesh and soothed the burning. When Lysia was done, she winced.
　　Droplets of sweat had formed on her forehead.
　　“Are you okay?” Jespar asked.
　　“... Yeah. Just the usual arcane fever.” She exhaled, brushed a fringe that had come loose back behind her ear. “I’d close the whole wound if I could, but a spell that potent would mean two days in bed with a feeling like my skull was about to explode, so that’ll have to do.”
　　She applied more salve to the wound and finished by bandaging it.
　　“Thanks,” Jespar said when she was done. The pain had subsided to a dull throbbing.
　　Again, he said, “You’re a lifesaver.”
　　This time she merely nodded. She tipped her chin at the attackers. “The scrawny one and the one who searched you are gone, but we might still save the woman and the one I knocked out.”
　　Jespar glanced around. Except for them, the courtyard was still deserted. “Do you think that’s a good idea? Considering what just happened, I doubt they’re in the mood for making up and grabbing drinks together.”
　　“They won’t,” Lysia said. “But let’s at least talk to her. We owe her that much.”
　　Do we? Jespar thought, but didn’t argue. They went over to where the Makehu woman lay, curled and bleeding. Jespar kicked away the scimitar that glinted in the sunlight an arm-length away from her. Not before they squatted down next to the woman did Jespar notice her words were more than just delirious babble.
　　“...Leech... leeches. Godsdamned leeches.”
　　Lysia gave Jespar a sidelong glance. He frowned. She drew a long breath.
　　“Is there a way to end this without killing you?” Lysia asked the woman.
　　There was a long pause before the woman opened her eyes. Jespar recognized the look in them: hatred. The same he’d felt from the Makehu worker whom the guards had denied a bath. “R...rot in Hell,” she said. “The... twins will... cr—” She moaned. Pressed her wound harder.
　　An expression passed over Lysia’s face—half anger, half sadness. “The twins, huh?
　　Are they also responsible for what happened to the First Magnate? Are you?”
　　No reply. Slowly, the woman’s grip loosened. Her chest still rose and fell, but that was all.
　　“She’s going to die,” Jespar said. “And even if she weren’t, we’d have to kill her and the other guy. If we don’t, and they somehow manage to survive, we’ll have the entire Scythe from Yuva at our heels.”
　　Lysia closed her eyes and rubbed them. Then she nodded, almost imperceptibly.
　　“Okay. Can... you do it?”
　　“Yes.” Jespar unsheathed one of his daggers, his hands feeling cold against the sun-heated leather of the hilt. It was still bloodstained. Just when he brought it to the Makehu woman’s throat, she opened her eyes again.
　　“Y...your fault,” she said. Her voice was faint and she slurred her words. “The pawn is as... as guilty as the m...master.”
　　There was a short silence.
　　Lysia grabbed the Makehu woman by the chin and lifted her head. “Last time I checked, you were the terrorists. You don’t change things for the better by killing people.”
　　Against all odds, the woman opened her eyes one last time. Tears were on her lower lids—whether from pain, fear, or something else, Jespar didn’t know. “...not like we haven’t trie...”
　　Lysia’s jaw flexed. Her grip on the woman’s face hardened. “Tried what?”
　　The woman moved her mouth again, but this time, her words were unintelligible. Some breaths later, she fell silent.
　　“Unconscious,” Jespar said.
　　For a moment, Lysia was quiet. Then she let go off the woman and stood. “This is my fault. You were right, we shouldn’t have gone so far from the populated areas.”
　　Jespar stood as well, his knees cracking as he did so. “They would have found another window to attack us eventually. Also, I was the one who waved that scroll around like an idiot.”
　　“Yeah, maybe. At least we know now that Enkshi was right—Oonai does have enemies everywhere.” She let her gaze wander over the battle site. “I guess I just didn’t think it would get bloody so quickly.”
　　“Neither did I,” Jespar said.
　　Lysia gave him a grateful look. “Well. We should probably finish what we started. No point in delaying the inevitable.”
　　They killed the survivors. First the Makehu woman, then the man. When the latter stopped breathing, they discussed telling the guards about what happened, but quickly discarded the idea—they would want answers, and Enkshi’s instructions about discretion were clear. They moved the corpses into one of the deserted shacks instead, all the while Jespar tried to ignore the image of two playing children stumbling upon them by chance.
　　He remembered Lysia’s words: I didn’t expect things to get bloody so quickly.
　　Something told him this was only the beginning.
　　When they were done, they washed their hands with what little water they had left, and went deeper into the maws of Yuva. Behind them, the flies let off the dog’s carcass.
　　They scented the new food.
#Chapter Six - Takana
　　JUST AS THE FOG SUNK AND THE DEEPER into the city Jespar and Lysia went, the buildings grew taller and taller. By the time they reached the market, a cramped J plaza where vendors hawked their wares into the bustling mass of skin, sweat, and sound that was the crowd, Jespar constantly had to remind himself that they were still on a tropical island and not trapped in a feverish dream. The decrepit towers and houses loomed high above them, their shadows turning the alleys and canyon-like streets into a gloomy maze, while the fog crept just above ground level and made it impossible to see more than ten arm-lengths ahead. Jespar barely noticed its stench anymore, but somehow that only made it worse; breathing felt like sucking in invisible parasites you didn’t notice until their eggs hatched.
　　And hatch they did. People coughed from swollen throats, and blisters marked their faces. A Makehu woman held on to a lamppost and spat out blood, wine-red stains on her white reed skirt. And, still, everybody went about their daily business as though this were normal. Because it is, Jespar thought and pulled his scarf, repurposed into a mouth-cloth, up to also a cover his nose. Probably as effective as a loincloth in a blizzard, but a drowning man would clutch at a twig. Or was it a straw? He didn’t remember, and he didn’t care.
　　Lysia hadn’t spoken much since the incident at the town square, and Jespar appreciated the silence. He didn’t feel like discussing or thinking about it more than necessary —
　　neither the fact that he’d barely escaped death for the second time in two days, nor that he was responsible for two more deaths, self-defense or not. During his time with the Gallowmen, he’d learned that every soldier had their own way of dealing with taking another life. A rare few enjoyed it and bragged, some smothered the memory the moment it formed, many repeatedly reminded themselves of why they’d been in the right. Most, including Jespar, were silent until the visceral reality of the killing faded and eventually turned into a memory.
　　Then, they moved on.
　　Jespar and Lysia had left the market behind them and were walking down a wide, crowded street, when Lysia pulled Jespar from his thoughts by putting a hand on his shoulder. “Look. I think that’s it.”
　　Jespar’s eyes followed hers.
　　Farther up ahead, it seemed as though the ground simply disappeared. After blinking twice, he understood what he was looking at: A massive crater opened up at the end of the road.
　　“The Pit,” Lysia said. “The name fits, doesn’t it?”
　　“Uh-huh.” Jespar squinted. Shapes moved through the fog all around the crater, giant cranes and other contraptions swiveled about. People shouted, wood creaked, metal clanked. “And that’s where the dreamwalker lives?”
　　“Around here, according to the innkeeper. Let’s get some directions.”
　　The Pit was as deep as it was wide, with circular tiers that decreased in diameter the farther down they went. Workers crowded every stage and hacked away at the rock under their feet, squatting down every now and then to pick up a turquoise nugget and toss it into a nearby crate. Uniformed men and women patrolled the tiers, barked orders, and coordinated the countless carts, barrels, and crates that were pushed, hoisted, and pulleyed around.
　　With one nuvium nugget priced at several hundred sêr apiece, Jespar tried to imagine the money these mines produced every day. A lot. Not much of it seemed to stay with the island or its inhabitants.
　　Lysia approached one of the overseers, a man with a mustache that would have triumphed over every walrus in the Civilized World. She asked him about Takana.
　　Walrus Man looked surprised. “The crazy one? What on Vyn do you want from her?”
　　“Business.”
　　Walrus Man arched his equally bushy eyebrows. Then, he shrugged and flicked a thumb over his shoulder. “She and her family live in a shack on the plains just behind the longhouses... hers is the only house right by the shore, so you should have no trouble finding it.” He hesitated. “You’re sure you know what you’re doing? There are rumors that people go cra—”
　　“Jevan!” a woman shouted. She stood a few steps away from them, coordinating a group of miners who were cleaning nuvium nuggets in water barrels. “You’re not getting paid to chat! Get your coinless ass over here!”
　　“All right, all right!” Walrus Man shouted back. “Sorry, friends,” he said to Jespar and Lysia. “You heard the boss. May you prosper.”
　　He walked off. Jespar wetted his cracked lower lip—a layer of nuvium dust had gathered on it, so it tasted sour. “Well. Shall we?”
　　The longhouses were a motley of oblong buildings ten minutes’ walk from the Pit, high, wooden dwellings with slits for windows. As if to counteract the dreary surroundings, each of the buildings was painted a different bright color. Men and women sat before them and chatted, children played in the streets, dogs chased each other over the gravel, all of them unfazed by the dust. The longhouses almost formed a small town by themselves, so it took Jespar and Lysia a while to reach the plains the overseer had talked about, an expanse of rocks, earth, and shrubs that extended down a long slope behind the longhouses and flowed into the shoreline in the distance. Shanties carpeted the plain, but, oddly enough, they clustered inland and thinned out toward the coast. Jespar, picturing the ocean breeze, would have expected it to be the other way around. Only when they reached the coast did he understand why: The sea was tainted.
　　Lysia halted and covered her nose. “Stars burn me. Do you smell that?”
　　Jespar, who had believed his olfactory nerves were dead from over-stimulation, did.
　　Not only did the water look as though someone had poured barrels full of tar into it, but it smelled like tar mixed with the contents of the islands’ privies. The taint stretched on for hundreds of arm-lengths, before it slowly faded into the blue of the ocean.
　　Jespar squinted. “Yeah. What on Vyn is that?”
　　“I don’t know. But I’d rather not find out.”
　　As the overseer had promised, it didn’t take them long to find Takana’s hut. It was right by the ocean, sitting on a small cliff that was all rocks and lichen, at least fifteen minutes’ walk from the next shanty. The hut was maybe twenty arm-lengths long and wide, with bamboo walls and a thatched palm roof.
　　They stopped a few steps from the front porch. The sun, though westering, still burned Jespar’s reddened cheeks, and the wound on his shoulder throbbed under the bandage.
　　His mouth was dry, but their water had run out.
　　He cupped his hands around his mouth. “Hello?!”
　　No reaction.
　　He tried again. Nothing.
　　“Let’s knock,” Lysia said. She went up to the door and raised her fist.
　　The world vanished.
　　Jespar stood on a frozen ocean. It was endless—ice as far as the eye could see, under a curtain of black clouds. Even though there was no sun in the sky, not even a silhouette, a pale half-light enfolded the scene. The air was freezing, but somehow Jespar didn’t feel cold.
　　What...?
　　He looked at his feet. The ice under his boots was milky, like congealed mist.
　　Then it cleared.
　　One moment, he’d been looking at a murky gray. The next, it was transparent and he stared into an endless depth beneath.
　　Something came floating up.
　　Small. Round.
　　No.
　　Panic shot into his muscles, his instincts telling him to run, but he was paralyzed. He made a sound that was half-croak, half-whimper.
　　Gods, no.
　　The Corpse’s head.
　　Strands of muscle and pieces of skin trailed from his severed neck, a cloud of black blood followed him like an octopus’ ink. Its skin was bloated, his lips swollen and blue; the thick, gray strands of his hair floated around his skull.
　　He opened its eyes.
　　A flicker.
　　Jespar was back in Yuva. Warm air surrounded him, the reek of the polluted ocean in his nostrils. Solid earth was under his feet.
　　Lysia stood by the door, her fist still in mid-air. Slowly, she turned to face him, her mouth half-open, her jaw trembling.
　　“Did you—did you see...?”
　　Jespar swallowed hard. “Yes.”
　　“What in the seven holy fucks was that?”
　　“I—I have no idea. I mean, I was here, and then I was—”
　　“Standing on a frozen ocean?”
　　Jespar nodded weakly. “Yes.”
　　For a breath, they kept looking at each other, as if hoping the other one held the answer to the question. Finally, Lysia sighed and wiped the sweat off her forehead. She smiled, but it seemed forced. “Well, I’m sure Ma’saa Takana will be eager to explain.”
　　She knocked again. Jespar winced, but this time, there was no shift of reality. There was also no answer. She tried again. Same result.
　　Jespar walked up beside her. “I don’t think anyone’s home. We should—”
　　Someone screamed from behind the door. Lysia cast Jespar an alarmed glance. He returned it and rattled the doorknob. As expected, it didn’t budge.
　　“Locked,” Jespar said. “Probably some kind of security bar on the inside.”
　　“Can you pick it?”
　　“I think so, yeah.”
　　He squatted down, took a finger-long, thin steel rod from his pouch and slid it through the crack in the door. He felt found the bar and looked for the locking cradle. Another scream came from inside, followed by a moan and then silence. He shot a glance over his shoulder. No one in sight.
　　“You got it?” Lysia asked, sounding nervous.
　　“Almost.”
　　He found the locking cradle and tried to lift the bar with the steel rod. It was easier than expected—probably palmwood too, barely enough to withstand a shoulder ram. He lifted the bar from the cradle and carefully eased it to the ground to not cause any noise. He stood, his knees cracking as he did so.
　　“There we go.”
　　They slid inside and quietly closed the door behind them. Briefly, they stood still and waited for their eyes to adjust to the gloom.
　　No one home.
　　The room was dark except for faint rays of afternoon sun that fell through the slits of the bamboo wall, tinged green by the nuvium fog.
　　The hut was divided into two areas, one for living and eating in the front, one, Jespar surmised, for sleeping in the back. A wooden screen separated them, the opening in its middle covered by a dark green curtain. A knee-high, round stone table made the centerpiece of the living room, five sitting cushions placed around it. To Jespar’s right, there was a kitchen, a bunch of plantains on the crude cabinet, and rice sacks leaning against the stove.
　　Someone muttered.
　　Jespar’s eyes darted across the room. Only then did he notice the woman sitting in a wicker chair in the right corner on the opposite side of the room. Obscured by shadows and sitting perfectly still, Jespar simply hadn’t noticed her. He glanced at Lysia. She didn’t move a muscle, eyes fixed on the woman, hand on the hilt of her baton.
　　“Hello?” Jespar said.
　　The woman didn’t react. She continued her mumbling in a language Jespar didn’t understand.
　　“Uhm... can you hear us? I’m sorry we entered, but we heard someone scream, so we wanted to make sure everyone’s all right.”
　　Nothing.
　　“Hello?” Jespar repeated.
　　“I don’t think she can hear us,” Lysia said.
　　“Hm. She must have been the one who screamed, though, right? There’s no one else here.”
　　“Probably. You think that’s her? Takana?”
　　“Maybe,” Jespar said. Tentatively, they approached her. Still no reaction.
　　Takana—if it was her— was older than he had expected. Enkshi and Ma’saa Oonai hadn’t known her age, so Jespar had somehow surmised her to be in her late twenties, or early thirties. The woman in the wicker chair was at least in her forties, possibly even older. Wrinkles marked her face, clustering on her forehead and the folds between the corners of her mouth and her nose. Shadows underlined her eyes, blending with the tattooing around the sockets: A pattern of broad brush strokes pointing outward.
　　A bowl containing a mushy broth and a mug of water sat on a table beside her, both untouched. Jespar gave Lysia a sidelong glance.
　　He said, “Takana?”
　　The ocean.
　　He was back on the ocean, and the ice cleared, but this time it broke. The water swallowed him. He screamed, clung on to a floe, but, Gods, the Corpse’s head was beside him, face turned up, and it opened its eyes, its mouth, and said—
　　Flicker.
　　He was back in the hut, back in Yuva, back in Kilé, back in the world of matter. Before him, Takana was screaming, pressing her hands against her temples, the tendons of her neck bulging as if about to burst.
　　Then she stopped. Her head lolled to the side. Her eyes fell shut, and she sank back into the chair.
　　Gods.
　　By the fucking Gods.
　　What the hell is happening?
　　Clutching his daggers so hard his knuckles showed white, he looked at Lysia. Her face was pale as bleached bone, her mouth half open.
　　Takana opened her eyes. “Son?”
　　Before either of them could react, the door of the hut swung open. The panic still in his veins, Jespar drew his daggers and whirled around.
　　A young Makehu stood in the doorframe, backdropped by the westering sun. He was supporting an older man, one arm around his shoulder, the other around his waist. A girl and a boy stood behind them. In the batting of an eyelash, Jespar realized he was looking at a family: Father, son, children.
　　Takana’s family.
　　The girl was the first to notice the intruders. With a shriek, she darted behind the young man, who, while continuing to support his father with his left, grabbed a small pitchfork leaning next to the door with his right. He pointed it at Jespar and Lysia.
　　“Get. Out.” His hands were trembling.
　　The vision still fresh in his mind, Jespar fumbled for words. Finally, he sheathed his daggers and raised his hands. “This is a misunderstanding.”
　　The young man scoffed. “You broke into our house. There’s nothing to misunderstand about that.”
　　“Wait,” Lysia said. “He’s right. We meant to wait for you, but then your mother started screaming, so we went in to check on her. I swear.”
　　While the young man didn’t move, his father relaxed a little. He put a hand on his son’s shoulder and said something in Makehu. The young Makehu replied, his expression unchanged.
　　Behind him, the little boy began to cry.
　　They might have remained like this for a lot longer if Takana hadn’t spoken up behind them.
　　“Son? Is that you?”
　　The young man’s eyes flicked to his mother. His frown softened, but only slightly. “Mother.
　　Did they... did they harm you?”
　　Takana slowly turned her head to face Jespar and Lysia, as though she’d only just become aware of them. “What? They? No, of course not. They... they are good people. You are, aren’t you?”
　　Perplexed, Jespar answered, “...Yeah. We are.”
　　Takana smiled. “See? I told you. Good people.” Her gaze trailed off. “The ocean is endless, you know? There is just water, water for miles, and you are always alone, even in your tuewa, and the loneliness eats you... your souls and your mind. But you know what the elders say? They say that, one day, the Mother-Father will come and they will help us gifted ones sleep. They will make us dream, just for one night, like the others do, and when we wake up again, our souls will be rested and we will be happy. Happy.” She looked at Lysia. Tears glistened on her cheeks.
　　“Are you the Mother-Father?”
　　“The...? I’m sorry, I don’t—”
　　“Mother-Father, you... have to help me. Me and him. All I ask for is one night, you know?
　　One night of oblivion.” Her voice had fallen to a whisper. “Please.”
　　The old Makehu pushed past his son. “Takwhe.”
　　The young Makehu frowned. “Father—”
　　“Quiet.”
　　He limped across the room, dragging his right leg after him, his face twitching in pain with every step. The young Makehu hesitated, then sighed and went after his father, all the while Takana mumbled on.
　　The man squatted down next to the wicker chair and took his wife’s hand, ignoring Jespar and Lysia, who watched the scene with a mixture of helplessness and confusion. He said something in Makehu, his voice low and soothing.
　　Takana fell quiet. She looked at her husband, her sunburst tattoos still moist with tears. Then a weak smile tugged at the corners of her lips, almost bashful. “Oh. It’s you.”
　　She closed her eyes and sunk back into her chair.
　　A moment passed in silence.
　　The old Makehu stood slowly. Two dark blue eyes faced Jespar and Lysia, sockets framed by solid, black tattooing.
　　“I want explanation.”
　　“As I told you,” Jespar said, “we didn’t mean to break in, but we heard the scream.”
　　“Yuz, I believe you. But why two wakhem come here?” He nodded at his son, who still clutched the pitchfork. The boy and the girl stood in the doorframe, holding each other’s hands and watching Jespar and Lysia warily.
　　The old Makehu faced his son. “Kawu. Tea.”
#chapter Seven - Chances
　　BY THE TIME JESPAR AND LYSIA FINISHED TALKING, the light seeping through the bamboo walls had taken on a brownish color, the orange of dusk mixing B with the green of the nuvium dust. They’d left their story vague, as instructed, mentioning only that they were working for a magnate who needed Takana’s help regarding a health matter.
　　The father, whose name was Maiyaro, sipped from his tea. “I understand.” He, his son Kawu, and Jespar and Lysia sat cross-legged around the eating table, the skystone between them. Maiyaro had sent the two children out to play while his wife slept in the back room.
　　“And if Takana succeeds, she gets the skystone in return,” Jespar said. “It’ll bring you at least eighty thousand sêr if you sell it. Enough so you’ll never have to work again.”
　　Maiyaro carefully placed his cup back on the table. “I know what stone is worth,” he says. “But thank for telling.”
　　Kawu followed their conversation silently, as he had done since its beginning. The age difference aside, he looked a lot like his father—the same medium-length black hair, the same fine-featured face with no facial hair. Only his eyes were his mother’s, a pale green.
　　He had no tattoos.
　　“But we can’t help,” Maiyaro said. “My wife is ill—has been for a time.”
　　An illness, Jespar thought, that causes spontaneous visions in bystanders.
　　“We noticed,” Lysia said. “Maybe we could help her. I’m a healer, and I’ve dealt with afflictions of sanity before.”
　　Maiyaro gave his son a questioning glance at the mention of the word “sanity.” Kawu said a word in Makehu. His father replied in the same tongue, and Kawu turned to face Lysia. “My father says that we are grateful for your offer, but you won’t be able to help her.” His In?l was perfect—not even a Kiléan accent—but there was nonetheless something odd in the way he spoke, as though he carefully weighed and arranged every word before he said it. “What my mother has isn’t an ordinary ‘affliction of sanity.’”
　　“What is it then?” Jespar asked. “If the question isn’t too personal…”
　　Kawu glanced at his father, who nodded.
　　“It’s hard to explain,” Kawu said. “If you know about dreamwalkers, then you probably also know that the gift comes with many burdens. Put shortly, my mother has lost her grip on akhara, the waking world, which is something that happens to many dreamwalkers. Her mind constantly flickers back and forth between dream and reality.”
　　Jespar remembered the frozen ocean—and the Corpse’s severed head. He placed his palm on his shoulder wound—it had begun to throb again. “I’m sorry to hear that. And I’m guessing her condition has something to do with those visions we got?”
　　Kawu seemed surprised. “Visions?”
　　“Yeah, I don’t know what else to call it. Just before your mother started screaming, it was as though we were somewhere else all of a sudden.”
　　Kawu made a pensive noise. “Then you must be mages.”
　　“I am,” Lysia said. “He isn’t.”
　　“To a certain extent he must be; otherwise nothing would have happened. A lot of people have a spark of magical talent in them, usually without being aware of it.” To Jespar, he said, “Are you a light sleeper, or do you get headaches often?”
　　“…Yes.”
　　“Then that’s because you have a modicum of magic in you. Not enough to see other eventualities or to even light a candle, but still…”
　　Lysia wrinkled her forehead. “Are you also a mage?”
　　“No,” Kawu said. “But my mother taught me a lot. Either way—these visions you experienced were caused by my mother’s seizures. She… how do I put it? She pulled your mind into the In-Between.”
　　“The what?” Jespar asked.
　　“The place between akhara and tuewa… the portal between reality and dream, if you will. Normal people are usually unconscious when they enter it, but because of my mother’s seizure, you—”
　　“We sorry, ma’sae, ” the old Makehu cut in, “we not want to waste time. All you need know is my wife is very ill and cannot help. Now, you please leave.”
　　Jespar glanced at the skystone. A fortune at your fingertips, and you don’t even bother looking for solutions.
　　Why?
　　Something clicked.
　　Jespar faced Kawu. “You have the gift too, don’t you? You’re a dreamwalker.”
　　There was the briefest of pauses. “I’m not.”
　　“Yes,” Jespar said, “you are. You said that ‘normal’ people are unconscious when crossing that ‘In-Between’ place, by which you excluded yourself. Which, in turn, means that you could help us if you want.”
　　Kawu averted his eyes.
　　Maiyaro sighed. “Yuz, son dreamwalk too. Answer still no.”
　　“Why?” Jespar said. “Forgive me, but I don’t understand. This gem is worth a fortune.”
　　Maiyaro’s cheeks flushed. “Because dreamwalking is dangerous! Dreamwalking is a curse, not gift, and son will not risk life for magnate!” He drew a deep breath. “Now, leave.”
　　No “please” this time.
　　After a moment’s pause, Lysia leaned forward, elbows resting on the table.
　　“Look,” she said, “I understand your concern, and we are deeply sorry for what happened to your wife—as I said, I would try treating her, but if you say that there’s no cure for her condition, well, we believe you. However, before you decide, please hear us out. Please?”
　　Maiyaro said nothing.
　　“Thank you,” Lysia said. “So, when I told you why we’re here, we didn’t give you the full truth because we weren’t supposed to, but if dreamwalking is really as dangerous as you say, then you deserve to know it.” Jespar gave her an alarmed look, but she continued, “We’re not working for just any magnate, but for the First Magnate himself, Jaaros Ismiraael Oonai.”
　　Though he tried to conceal it, surprise passed over Maiyaro’s face.
　　“It’s true,” Lysia said. “And he also isn’t just ill; he’s dying. What has happened is that he has fallen into some kind of supernatural coma, and none of the healers have an explanation for it—they’ve just never seen anything like it. Ma’saa Oonai hopes that we can find out what happened to her husband—and cure him—by entering his mind.” She brushed a strand of hair back behind her ear. “Now, you might still think that this is none of your business, and I hear you, but, unfortunately, it is all of our business. And do you know why? Because if the First Magnate dies, he’ll leave a power void, and there’s a lot of dangerous people in the archipelago who’d jump at the chance to fill it. I’m sure you’re familiar with the Scythe?”
　　“Yuz,” Maiyaro said.
　　“Well, then you also know that they’ve gained a lot of power over the past year, all across the archipelago. Now, of course, Ma’saa Oonai has been trying to keep her husband’s condition from the public, but word is bound to get out eventually, if it hasn’t already.
　　“And what do you think is going to happen if the Scythe learns that the shepherd of the country is on the verge of death and, hence, unable to act? Damn right they’re going to pounce on the opportunity, and before you know it, you’ll have a civil war at your doorstep… not just in Uunil, but on every single island. And even if the Scythe doesn’t act, rest assured that someone else will. Whichever way you look at it, a lot of people are going to die, not just insurgents or guards, but innocent people. So, there you have it—if there still is a chance to stop all this from happening, then it’s through you. I know you never asked for this burden, but it is what it is.”
　　It was a good speech, a genuine one, but its effect seemed lost on the two Makehu. His face expressionless, Maiyaro turned to his son. Kawu said something in Makehu, probably a summary of what Lysia had said. Maiyaro softly shook his head and emptied the last of his tea. “Kawu—please tell wakhem story of Yuva. They don’t know.”
　　Kawu hesitated. Then he lowered his gaze. “Of course.” He began talking, slowly and deliberately, as it seemed his habit. “Yuva wasn’t always like this. In fact, it was a different world only two decades ago. Yuz, it has always been a mining island, and thus never the greenest in the archipelago, but there were trees, and the ocean was nothing like what the mines turned it into. More importantly, however, the people were different.”
　　“How so?” Jespar asked.
　　In the back of the hut, Takana gave a soft whimper. Maiyaro and Kawu tensed, but when she fell silent a moment later, Kawu continued.
　　“Less crime, at least… and there was a sense of comradeship. Most of this was because the magnates didn’t own the mines back then, but two Yuvanian families did, one Makehu, one Kiléan.” Kawu ran a hand through his hair. His fingers were lithe and uncalloused, not the hands of a laborer. “And they were good people. Merchants, of course, but good people—as long as you didn’t cross them. They cared for their workers, who were allowed to spend one day a week with their families while still receiving pay, and the mine continued to give their workers a fraction of their pay when they became too old to continue, or some accident happened.” For a flicker, Kawu glanced at his father, whose face betrayed no emotion. “To make a long story short, when word spread across the archipelago of how well the Yuvanian workers lived, they rose up.”
　　“And demanded rights,” Lysia said.
　　“Yuz— which would have cost the coalition millions of sêr. So, the magnates reacted.”
　　Jespar frowned. “What did they do?”
　　“Officially? Nothing. They couldn’t simply disown the two families, they were too influential for that. Instead, an ‘accident’ happened in the Pit. It was already the biggest mine back then, and both families owned parts of it.”
　　“An ‘accident’…” Lysia repeated.
　　“A rockslide that buried well over four hundred people under it. I suppose you can imagine how the rest of the story goes. The rockslide ruined the two merchant families, and the coalition pressured them into selling. Can you guess who bought it?”
　　“Jaaros Oonai,” Jespar said.
　　“Yuz. From there on in, there were no more retirement or accident pays. It was almost as though the coalition was trying to punish us. More veins were opened up all over the island, and the fog grew denser and denser, killing off what little green was left. All the while the salaries went down and crime exacerbated. And this, ma’sae, is how our country became the place it is today. Everybody knows the coalition is behind the accident, but no one dares to speak out. Or, well, that is not precisely true—there was a protest weeks after it happened, but the Jade Carapace itself quashed it. No people were killed, of course, but a lot of protesters were wounded. That was the last time the Yuvanians ever stood up for their rights… until now.”
　　Outside, a dog barked. The muddy rays falling into the hut had faded. Jespar had to think of the Scythe woman with the vine tattoos around her eyes. It’s not like we haven’t tried.
　　Maiyaro rejoined the conversation. “Maybe this helps understand why Scythe is so liked on Yuva. And, no, we don’t support. But we also no feel sympathy for Oonai.” He slid the skystone back to Jespar’s and Lysia’s half of the table. “I’m sorry.”
　　Silence ensued.
　　“Then there’s going to be a civil war,” Lysia said. She sounded tired.
　　“Maybe,” Maiyaro said. “But maybe other greedy merchant fills Oonai’s place, and things go on like before. Or maybe Scythe takes over country and makes better. You don’t know.” He gestured to Kawu. “Son, go find Ekha and Guwi. Getting dark.”
　　Kawu nodded and rose, offering help to his father. Maiyaro waved his hand and got to his feet on his own, his face twitching with pain as he did so.
　　Lysia watched them quietly. Then she sighed, took the skystone, and put it back into one of her pouches. “Fair enough,” she said. “Fair enough.”
　　A thought crossed Jespar’s mind. Chances. Not obstacles.
　　“You are wasting a chance.”
　　All eyes turned to him.
　　“Look,” Jespar said, standing up, “You dislike the magnates, and I understand that—
　　you certainly have all the reason to. But why don’t we leave them out of the equation and talk about you for a moment? And your family?” He glanced around the house. “I said it before, but the skystone is worth a fortune.”
　　Maiyaro squinted. “We don’t need money.”
　　Yes, you do. The two children were too young to work, and Maiyaro and his wife weren’t able to, which meant that their eldest son, the dreamwalker, provided the only income, and judging by the state of the hut, it was barely enough to get by. But you’re too proud to take it.
　　“Maybe you don’t,” Jespar said, “but what about your children or your future grandchildren? The money from the stone is not just enough to ensure a good life for this generation, but also for the next ten generations to follow. Would you really have them grow up in poverty instead?”
　　“You understand nothing,” Maiyaro said. He spoke quietly, but Jespar could feel the hurt under the layer of control.
　　Of course Jespar had known the Makehu would react this way, and felt guilty for it, but he also knew it was necessary if his argument was to work. After all, it wasn’t he Jespar had to convince.
　　“I understand that there are more layers to your decision than may be obvious at first glance,” Jespar said. “And your family and your children’s offspring are only the beginning. Think of your people, the Makehu.”
　　“What do you mean?” Kawu asked. It earned him a reprimanding look from his father, but he ignored it.
　　“Well,” Jespar said, “it’s no secret that your people are being ostracized. Not overtly, of course, but they are. I mean, how many of the magnates are Makehu? Zero?”
　　Kawu said, “There are the elders. They represent our interests in Kilé.”
　　“Fair enough, the elders. But tell me, how much influence do they really have? I mean, really. Something tells me that the coalition only ever asks their opinion when they know it doesn’t contradict their own interests.” This was a guess—Jespar knew the bare-bones of Kiléan politics and had simply assumed the rest. As Kawu’s expression betrayed, it wasn’t far off the mark. “Elders or not,” Jespar continued, “the fact is, and that’s obvious even to an outlander such as myself, that there are next to no Makehu in the elite.” He nodded at the pouch at Lysia’s belt where she had put the skystone. “But there could be, with your help. With the money from this gem, you’d have the funds to start your own business, you could work your way to the top, and by doing so not just give your own family a better life, but even become a voice for all the Makehu across the archipelago.”
　　Kawu studied Jespar, as if searching his face for dishonesty. “You say this as though it were so simple.”
　　“I’m not saying it’s simple. But it’s a once in a lifetime chance.” He showed his palms.
　　“Of course, it’s up to you. We’ve taken up enough of your time, and if you want us to leave, we will do so now.”
　　“Then do,” Maiyaro said. “Leave, as I say three times before.”
　　Jespar remained a breath longer, eyes locked on Kawu.
　　Finally, he dropped his hands. “All right. Thank you for your time.”
　　He went to the door, and after a moment’s hesitation, Lysia followed.
　　His hand was on the handle when Kawu spoke up. “Wait.”
　　Jespar turned around.
　　“I’ll help you,” Kawu said. “I’ll do it.”
　　Maiyaro stared at his son and said something in Makehu.
　　Kawu shifted his weight from one leg to the other but held his father’s gaze. “I’m sorry, Father. I’m going with them.”
　　His father made a disbelieving noise. “You will not. You’ll stay, and—”
　　“Yuz, and do what?” Kawu replied, his hands trembling. “Continue serving meals for that sad old man, for money that’s barely enough to fill our bellies? Kweh, you know what he only keeps me in his service becomes he wants something else from me in the long run, don’t you?”
　　Maiyaro’s cheeks flushed. He shifted to Makehu, but Kawu’s answer only made him angrier. The argument went back and forth until Maiyaro once again told Jespar and Lysia to leave. They did.
　　“That was manipulative,” Lysia said as they sat down on a rock at the bottom of the slope leading up to the hut. The two children played the colored stone game not far from them, looking, by turns, at the house from which the shouting came, and the two wakhem on the rock. Jespar waved at them, but they didn’t react.
　　“But nonetheless true,” Jespar said. “You saw how they live, didn’t you? They need that money like Oonai needs a conscience, at least if you believe their story about Yuva.”
　　“And if the mission goes wrong? What’s going to happen to this family if their son doesn’t come back?”
　　“Why wouldn’t he? We’ll take him to the ziggurat, let him do his dreamwalking thing, and that’s it. Easy.”
　　“So far, nothing about this mission has been easy.”
　　“Okay, fair enough. But what are you trying to say, exactly? That you would have preferred he stay?”
　　Lysia sighed, rubbing the scar on her cheek. “I don’t know what I’m trying to say. I guess I’m just worried.”
　　By the time the door of the hut swung open, what little of the fog-covered sun was left had disappeared behind the horizon. The black puddles on the ocean shimmered a faint green, and a breeze had picked up.
　　Kawu approached them. A bag hung over his shoulder, and he’d put on sandals. His face was a mask.
　　“I promised them I’d be back within a week,” he said. “If Oonai isn’t cured by then, I’ll return, skystone or not.”
　　Jespar swallowed the yellow gooseberry he’d been eating. The combined efforts of the ocean’s stench and the nuvium dust made that part a challenge, but his stomach burned with hunger. “That’s all we’re asking.”
　　Kawu nodded briefly, then went over to his siblings and hugged them. Jespar’s chest felt heavy when the boy began to cry.
---
　　It must have been about an hour before midnight when they reached the ship. As the old servant had promised, he waited for them at the gangplank, his good eye watching the newcomer with curiosity. Introductions were made, explanations given.
　　An hour later, the yawl was on its way back to the Golden City, and Jespar stood leaning against the ship mast, smoking the last bit of nightflower he had left. With the fresh ocean air in his nostrils and a meal in his stomach, he almost felt human again.
　　Lysia had retreated back below decks, but Kawu was at the rear of the ship, elbows propped on the railing, and watching Yuva’s shrinking silhouette on the horizon. The luminescent fog enfolded it like a dying man’s breath.
　　Jespar took one last puff from his pipe and walked over to the young dreamwalker.
　　“Hey.”
　　Kawu glanced at him. “Hello.”
　　“I just, um, wanted to thank you. For helping us.”
　　He expected a sullen answer. It didn’t come.
　　“You don’t have to thank me.” Kawu turned his eyes back to the ink-black water.
　　“Your friend was right, you know? If there’s going to be a civil war because the First Magnate dies and I could have prevented it, there’s blood on my hands as well. Not to mention that we do need the money, regardless of what my father says. He’s proud and afraid of losing me, but he doesn’t understand that he might lose all three of us if nothing changes.” He made a weary sound and shook his head. “So, yuz, no need to thank me. If anything, I should thank you for reminding me not to be a coward.”
　　Jespar studied him. Looking at him now, Jespar realized he was even younger than he’d guessed, maybe twenty, maybe twenty-two. Yet there was something about his eyes that made him seem a lot older and that both intrigued and unsettled Jespar, though the former outweighed the latter.
　　Jespar cleared his throat. “Well, happy to help. There are only two cots below decks, but you can have mine if you want to. I can sleep up here.”
　　“I don’t sleep like you do, so no. But thank you.”
　　“Right,” Jespar said, “the gift.”
　　“Yuz.”
　　When Kawu didn’t elaborate, Jespar took the hint. “Okay. Well, then I better leave you be. Good night.”
　　Looking up, Kawu smiled faintly. “Good night, Ma’sao Dal’Varek.”
　　“Jespar. Just call me Jespar.”
　　“Very well. Jespar.”
　　Jespar made his way back down to his cabin, nodding at Agaam in passing, who stood by the tiller. The old servant returned the nod, not a sign of exhaustion on his face.
　　Below decks, Lysia sat on the bedside of Jespar’s cot, reading the same book she’d read that morning.
　　“Rejoiceth,” she said when he entered, and she put the book down. “Yon noble adventurer hath come to proffer unto this humble wench some meager company.”
　　Jespar slumped down beside her. Stifling a yawn, he ran a hand through his hair.
　　Despite the bucket of water he’d poured over his head when the yawl had left the harbor, it was still sticky and speckled with turquoise dust. He really needed a bath. “What a d—
　　”
　　Lysia kissed him.
　　When she withdrew, Jespar smiled. “Now that came out of nowhere.”
　　“Yeah, well, I needed a change from all that gloom,” Lysia said, a lop-sided grin on her lips. She ran her right hand up his thigh. “I thought you might, too.”
　　He felt a pleasant warmth prickle just below his navel. You like her, he thought.
　　You do.
　　Just like that, the prickle died. One moment he’d wanted her, the next he didn’t and felt a light pressure in the back of his neck. He hesitated then gently took her hand from his thigh and kissed the back of it. “You’re beautiful, you know that?”
　　“I sense a ‘but’ coming.”
　　“Ah, it’s just… I don’t know. I’m still a little rattled, I guess.” He slid his back up against the wall. “It’s got nothing to do with you.”
　　There was an almost imperceptible pause before Lysia grinned. “Okay. Okay, sure, no problem. Admittedly, sex would have been a little strange anyway given all that’s happened. I do have to ask you to take off your shirt, though, to take a look at your wound. I hope that much nudity is bearable.”
　　Jespar made an amused noise. “I can handle it if you can.”
　　He did as asked. Lysia cleaned the wound, applied some salve, then cut off a patch of fresh bandage from a roll she produced from her pouches.
　　Wrapping it around his arm, she said, “Can I ask you something?”
　　“Sure.”
　　“What’s your take on the boy?”
　　“Kawu?”
　　“Uh-huh.”
　　“Hm. Hard to read.”
　　“Doesn’t he make you feel… I don’t know, jittery?”
　　“What do you mean?”
　　“Well, like… nervous, uneasy. No idea why, but there’s just something about him that gives me the creeps, and I was wondering if you feel it too.”
　　Jespar gave it some thought. “I know what you mean, yeah, but I wouldn’t say that he gives me the creeps. He’s unusual, but that’s about it.”
　　“Huh. Okay.” She finished the bandage and tied it off. Then she wiped her hands with a cloth and yawned heartily, not bothering to cover her mouth. “Well, if you’re not in the mood for sex, let’s get some shut-eye, shall we? Something tells me we have an even longer day ahead of us tomorrow.”
　　She swung her legs over the bedside and was halfway back to her own cot when Jespar said, “Wait. Do you want to sleep here?”
　　She scrunched up an eyebrow. “You want that?”
　　“Yeah.”
　　A pause.
　　“Okay. Sure.”
　　They undressed and, leaving the lantern on, curled up on the rough fabric. Lysia cuddled up to Jespar with her back facing him, his arm over her shoulder. They talked for a little more, but Lysia’s voice quickly trailed off. A minute later, her chest rose and fell evenly.
　　It was a long while before Jespar slept, but, for the second night in a row, the dream of the Corpse spared him.
#Interlude - Ninety Days Before
*“Home,” the Man says.*

　　IT FEELS LIKE A LIE. And maybe it is. After all, only his memories make that house in the moonlit palm grove more than just an abandoned shack. Only his memories I make it the place where he spent the first eleven years of his life.
　　“Home,” he repeats.
　　No nostalgia. No comfort. Not even anger.
　　The Man runs his fingers through his beard. What did he expect? It’s the first time he’s come back since that one evening that changed it all, and the life the Man leads now could not be more different than that of the Boy who had once slept under that thatched roof. The Man remembers the many times the Boy traveled the road into the city, accompanying P?pa to the market. Back then, the other farmers and travelers had paid them no more attention than they would have to a pair of donkeys. Would he do the same now without his peasant disguise, the reactions would range from awe to knee-falls, from contemptuous glares to assassination attempts. Given recent events and the decisions he had made, more of the latter than the former.
　　Strange.
　　Only six moons ago, he would have enjoyed this mixture of respect and fear his presence evoked in others. “Greatness comes with friends and foes in equal parts.”
　　Weren’t these his own words?
　　Now, however, imagining that star struck look on a civilian’s face unsettles him almost as much as the thought of a knife at his throat.
　　He sighs.
　　What’s wrong with you?
　　The Man circles the hut. The walls and the roof are overgrown with ferns and vines, their fleshy, green leaves and blue flowers concealing the moldy wood. Rosemallows, red and pink, sprout at the base of the wall. Two slits on each side of the shack mark the windows, kept small to keep the heat out, and a broken fence frames the now-wild garden. The Man approaches the two rainwater barrels on the porch. One of them is empty, the other, that one, still full.
　　He feels nothing.
　　The memory is still there, of course, but the emotions that had come with it all his life aren’t there. He walks to the back door and places his palm on the handle.
　　Comfort.
　　Despite it all, there had always been a sense of comfort in the hut, strong on the good days, weak on the bad ones. To the Man, that comfort had always been the reason life with P?pa hadn’t been all bad like M?mah had insisted it was.
　　That comfort—or the lack thereof—is the reason the Man still often lies awake at night wondering how P?pa must have felt when he found the house empty the night after they left. And, though a hundred scenarios came to mind, the Man’s pondering always ended on the one he considered the most plausible: that P?pa had simply pretended nothing had happened, just as he had always done after shouting at him or M?mah for no reason, or hurling another piece of the little pottery they had against the wall. Yuz, the Man would think. Probably P?pa simply went to the market that morning, expecting M?mah and the Boy to be back at night, sitting around the set dinner table and greeting him with apologetic smiles. It probably would have been one of the good nights, only there was no dinner and no apologetic smiles. Because they never returned.
　　And then?
　　Everything suggested that P?pa never searched for them. Neither M?mah nor the Boy ever heard from him again. So, yuz, maybe he had just gone on pretending, drowning the dark thoughts with “rice drink” and telling himself that an ungrateful wench and a kazuum son, who thought he was more than just another have-not, weren’t worth his breath anyway.
　　They had left? So what?
　　Good fucking riddance.
　　He’d just wait for the day they’d come back crawling, begging him to let them in, the Boy’s back scarred from whip strikes he’d deservedly gotten as punishment for thievery, M?mah’s cunt sore and loose from the sailors she had to fuck to keep the Boy and her from starving.
　　He’d just wait.
　　How wrong he was. The Boy didn’t steal and M?mah didn’t sell her body, something P?pa would have known she’d never do had he truly known her. No, the Boy refused the
　　“hand life had dealt him,” refused to accept the place for “people like them,” and instead seized fate by its fat fucking throat and made history, climbed Fortune Road at a pace that would later become the stuff of legends. He did sell the “lobsters.” He did get caught. It did cost him almost all the money he’d earned. But instead of breaking him, the setback only steeled his resolve, made him learn from his mistakes, made him stand up from the dust and try again, with another approach, and, that time, it worked, didn’t only bring him twice as much coin as the lobsters had, but set the foundation for what would later become an empire.
　　And yet—the comfort never returned.
　　Not after the Man joined the coalition, not after he and M?mah moved into the biggest house the Jade District could offer, not after he met his wife and moved into the ziggurat on the top of the mountain. And, to the day she died, M?mah never understood why the Man felt like something was lacking. For her, it was as she had said that night they walked away: Life was better without him.
　　A stray dog trots onto the porch. He pokes his snout into a mound of rubble, scouring it for food, then looks at the Man questioningly when he finds none.
　　The Man returns the look, then says: “Nothing’s free.”
　　The dog disappears into the thickets. What a stupid thing to say. He shakes his head.
　　With a deep breath, the Man turns his attention back to the handle he has been holding for several minutes. His palms are wet. He presses it, and the door swings open.
　　It’s all still there, buried under a thick layer of dust: The stone table in the center of the room, the palmwood chairs and shelves, even grandfather’s fishing rod that P?pa had treasured so much, as if some spell had protected the hut from being looted. It’s all still there, except for the comfort, because the room is a corpse.
　　A carcass.
　　A thought forms in the back of the Man’s head, hard and clear, almost as if it were a truth and not merely an assumption.
　　P?pa never returned.
　　For a second, the Man wants to scream, slam his fist into the wall. He doesn’t. A fog clouds his brain, has clouded it for the past three moons, and it smothers his feelings before his brain can translate them into action.
　　What’s wrong with you?
　　“Fool,” the Man says. “Fucking old fool.”
　　He leaves.
#chapter Eight -
　　AGAAM WOKE THEM JUST BEFORE DAWN. To their surprise, Kawu had prepared breakfast for all four of them, a violet bean paste and a hearty soup with A leaves and plantains. It tasted delicious.
　　Several times while they ate, Jespar noticed Kawu looking at him, but whenever their eyes met, the young dreamwalker would drop his gaze. An hour after they had finished eating, Uunil-Y?r appeared on the horizon. Countless boats and ships populated the waters before it, fisher boats, trade vessels, galleons bearing the swords and the scarab flag of the Blue Islands Coalition. While the ship Jespar had arrived on three days before had to wait hours for admission only to be told to anchor in Port Vaju instead, Agaam got it at once when the man on the harbormaster’s boat recognized him.
　　Soon after, the ship glided toward the busy piers of the Golden City.
　　When Jespar emerged from below decks with his knapsack slung over his shoulder, Kawu was leaning against the mast some steps from the door leading below, arms crossed. There was still no sign of the sun on the horizon, and the blanket of clouds stretching over the sky suggested it would stay hidden even after it rose.
　　“Oh,” Jespar said when he noticed Kawu. “Hey.”
　　“…Hello.” Kawu rubbed the back of his neck. “May I… may I speak to you for a moment?”
　　“Um… Sure.”
　　He sat down on a barrel next to the mast and tilted his head. “Yeah?”
　　Biting his lip, Kawu looked at his feet. “You don’t feel it, do you?”
　　“Feel what?”
　　“My… presence.”
　　“I can see that you’re here,” Jespar said with a grin. “If that’s what you mean.”
　　Kawu blushed. “No, that’s… you misunderstand. You remember the experience you had near my mother, don’t you?”
　　Unfortunately, Jespar thought.
　　“Yes.”
　　“Well, most dreamwalkers produce a certain kind of ‘resonance’ in people. For my mother, it comes in bursts, which results in those reality shifts for magically gifted people and extreme anxiety in others. I, on the other hand, tend to produce a kind of…” He exhaled, ran a hand through his black, disheveled hair. “I don’t know. People just normally feel uncomfortable around me, and you don’t seem to.”
　　“Oh… I see.” Jespar paused. “You’re right, though. I feel… different around you, but not in an uncomfortable way.”
　　“How then? If I may ask.”
　　“I don’t know. Curious, maybe? It’s hard to say, really.”
　　For a moment, Kawu said nothing and merely studied him, as if looking for dishonesty in Jespar’s face. Finally, the corners of his lips curled up in a faint smile. “I see.” He looked as though he wanted to add something, but then Lysia appeared in the cabin door.
　　Kawu bowed. “Excuse me,” he said and went to the stern, where he had stowed his things.
---
　　An hour later, they were back in the anthill bustle of the Golden City, making their way through the harbor to the city outskirts, where they’d get fresh horses from a coalition trading post and ride back up Mount Uunil. Kawu, wearing his knapsack on his front, both arms slung around his chest, studied this new world with a mixture of wariness and awe. As Jespar had learned earlier, it was his first time outside Yuva.
　　According to Agaam, it was a busy day even by Uunil-Y?r standards, which he attributed to the upcoming Sua Javaar, the “Rain Celebration”—a two-day festival due two weeks from now, which marked the start of the rainy season that would nourish the island’s parched grounds and, hopefully, provide for a rich harvest. Like every year, Sua Javaar brought thousands of people to Uunil and its capital, Aeterna minstrels and bards, merchants, fortune-seekers, and civilians from all over the archipelago wishing to witness the countless performances, marvel at the Starling fireworks, or simply drink and smoke their worries away with gallons of coalition-funded rice wine and barrels full of nightflower. This year, Agaam explained, the festival would be more lavish than ever before, so the city expected at least ten thousand visitors. Even though the old servant hadn’t said it, Jespar understood the idea behind this: Probably the coalition hoped a drinking orgy with lots of music and free food would help to take the edge off the unrest the decree had spawned. While they were walking down a cramped alley, Lysia voiced Jespar’s thoughts: “I hope the coalition doesn’t just double the wine, but also the number of guards.”
　　“I have no information on that,” Agaam said.
　　Comforting, Jespar thought, hoping they’d have wrapped up their dreamwalking business and found the culprit before Sua Javaar took place. The festival was the reason neither of them was surprised to find the main road from the harbor into the Stone District clogged up by a crowd. Two sewer canals ran parallel to it, carrying the wastewater through the harbor and out into the ocean. It smelled accordingly.
　　“Don’t think we’re getting through here,” Lysia said.
　　Agaam nodded and craned his neck to see over the heads of the crowd.
　　Jespar, on average a good head taller than most Kiléans, did the same. Strangely enough, a group of Blue Guards manned the gate. It neither looked like they were planning to let anyone through, nor did Jespar get impression that the majority of the crowd wanted to pass. Agitated voices rose over the ruckus.
　　“Something is going on up there,” he said.
　　Agaam appeared to have come to the same conclusion. “Stay put. I’ll talk to the guards.”
　　He disappeared into the crowd, sidling through the throng in a way that almost seemed effortless. Jespar took a swig from his flask and offered it first to Lysia, who accepted it gratefully, then to Kawu. The dreamwalker didn’t even notice him. His eyes were fixed straight ahead, and his arms were crossed, fingernails digging into his skin.
　　“You okay?” Jespar asked.
　　Kawu turned to face him. “Pardon?”
　　“Are you all right?”
　　“Oh… Yuz, thank you.” He hesitated. “There’s unrest.”
　　“That’s fairly obvious,” Lysia said.
　　“No, it’s… it’s more than that. The people, they are…” He fumbled for the right word.
　　“Fragile. Enraged.”
　　Lysia made a thoughtful noise.
　　Jespar approached a middle-aged woman by the roadside, who observed the commotion from afar. She had a plump, honest face with cheeks so rosy it showed even on her tanned skin.
　　“Excuse me, ma’saa— do you know what’s going on here?”
　　The woman gave him a quick once-over. “Someone washed up in the canals again.”
　　“…You mean a corpse?”
　　The woman snorted. “I doubt a week of being tossed around in that shit-water improves your health, so, yuz, a corpse. Some young girl, and she was carrying… now the guards say they made ‘inqueerees’ and that it was just the usual story, you know, the man seeds her and then leaves her, so she jumps from the mountain and kills herself, but the people are calling horseshit. So am I, for what it’s worth.”
　　Kawu walked up beside them. “So, you think someone murdered her, ma’saa?”
　　The woman gave him a curious glance. “You speak good In?l.”
　　“Thank you, ma’saa.” His eyes didn’t move.
　　“Sure. And, no, I don’t think anybody murdered her—she killed herself, the guards got that right, but I bet my left hand it wasn’t just over some heartbreak. She jumped for the exact same reason the other six folk who washed up in the sewers in the last fortnight did.”
　　“Six people killed themselves?” It was Lysia. There was shakiness in her voice Jespar hadn’t heard from her before.
　　“That’s what I said, girl.”
　　“Because of the decree, right?”
　　The woman snorted. “I’m not an oracle, but me and those folk over there say it’s likely. Wouldn’t you? The man who washed up just two days ago, for example, had five kids and a wife to support, and because his job didn’t earn him enough to feed them, he made coin on the side by plucking fruit from further up the coast and selling it, every coinless morning hours before the sun came up. Now that the coast belongs to some kazuum coalition bigwig, he not only can’t do that anymore, but also has to pay for the drinking water he and the other folk from his village got from a nearby pond, because—
　　guess what—the rivers and ponds also belong to some kazuum merchant.” She spat.
　　“You know what we called this when I was young? Thievery. Them magnates might as well have cut that man’s throat themselves.” She paused then shook her head. “I don’t know who that girl was, but I sure as hell know I wouldn’t want to be young with a bun in the oven these days. Might as well spare your kid the misery.”
　　Before either of them had a chance to reply, Agaam returned. There was something absentminded and weary about his expression. He acknowledged the woman with a nod.
　　“Ma’saa. Would you kindly give us a moment in private?”
　　The woman frowned for the batting of an eyelash. Then her lips curled in a smile and she returned the nod. “Of course. May you prosper.” She walked off.
　　Agaam let out a sigh. “I talked to the guards. They are going to let us through.”
　　“Great,” Jespar said. He hesitated. “That woman… she told us that commotion is about a girl they found in the sewers. Is that true?”
　　“It is.”
　　Lysia said, “She also told us that the people believe she killed herself because of the decree, like six others in the past two weeks.”
　　“I wouldn’t know about that, but it’s certainly possible. Now, shall we go? We shouldn’t keep Ma’saa Oonai and the counselor waiting longer than necessary.”
　　Lysia narrowed her eyes but said nothing more. They followed Agaam through the angry crowd that, somehow, barely noticed them. Behind the line of guards protecting the Stone Gate, two purple-clothed figures wearing masks depicting mourning faces hoisted a shape wrapped in a purple cloth onto a cart. It had come loose at the bottom, exposing a sandaled, bloated foot.
　　Six suicides in two weeks.
　　Two weeks from now, most citizens would be celebrating the arrival of the rain.
　　Some wouldn’t.
---
　　Once outside the city gates and on their horses, they rode fast. At noon, the double-winged gate opened before them. It was the first time Jespar saw the ziggurat in daylight, and it once again didn’t fail to take his breath away. At night, there had been a mysterious, almost holy, air to it. Now, its thirty tiers of white and blue stone and the colossal statue crowning it were simply majestic and overwhelming. Jespar glanced at Kawu, who stood rooted to the spot, gaze fixed on the ziggurat.
　　“Impressive, huh?”
　　As if awaking from a trance, Kawu turned to face him. “It’s just… I thought the stories were exaggerations.”
　　“So did I.”
　　“Ma’sae?” Agaam said. “You’re expected.”
　　They followed the old servant up the stairs and into the atrium, passing dozens of gardeners working on the hedges, trees, and flowerbeds, servants carrying goods in and out of the building and scrubbing the floors, and at least two dozen Blue Guards patrolling the ziggurat and the adjacent property. In the atrium, Enkshi awaited them. He wore a yellow and light blue robe that contrasted his onyx skin, an abundance of jewelry, and an admittedly, pleasant perfume. None of it could hide the exhaustion written across his face.
　　Noticing Kawu, his nostrils twitched. “Where’s the dreamwalker? Takana?”
　　Jespar and Lysia explained.
　　When they were done, Enkshi looked Kawu up and down, squinting as if looking for a fault. Kawu’s face remained perfectly expressionless throughout all this, his hands clasped behind his back. People just feel uncomfortable around me.
　　“He can be trusted,” Jespar said. “And it’s either him or no dreamwalking at all. Your choice.”
　　Enkshi flicked Jespar an annoyed look. Then he sighed and ran a hand over his shaved head. “Of course. I’m sorry, Ma’sao…”
　　“Kawu. Kawu Nākhani.”
　　“I’m sorry, Ma’sao Nākhani. The past days have been stressful.”
　　“I understand,” Kawu said.
　　Enkshi smiled politely. “Good. Well then, please follow me, all of you. Ma’saa Oonai has been eagerly awaiting your return. Agaam, you may withdraw to your quarters, but stay ready. We might require your services later.”
　　Agaam bowed.
　　Enkshi led Lysia, Jespar, and Kawu to the study on the twelfth tier, making noncommittal conversation on the way. Jespar’s shoulder wound itched in the dull heat, but when he lightly pressed his fingers against it, he was surprised to find that, thanks to Lysia’s treatment and magic, the pain was almost gone.
　　Ma’saa Oonai was reading a letter when they entered. She wore a simple, armless black robe and three brass rings around each of her upper arms. Her hair was in a ponytail, and her face powdered to hide the shadows under her eyes.
　　She smiled. “Thank Morala, you’re back. Did you bring her?”
　　“No,” Enkshi replied. “But they did bring her son. They’ll explain.”
　　When they finished telling their story for the second time, Ma’saa Oonai’s eyes rested on the young Makehu. There was an odd expression in them, the same discomfort Jespar had observed on Enkshi and Lysia, but paired with an almost motherly affection.
　　“If I may ask—how old are you, Kawu Nākhani?”
　　“I’m twenty-two, Ma’saa.”
　　“And you’re certain you can do what we ask of you? I don’t know anything about your… craft, but it’s a complicated mission.” Oddly enough, the concern in her voice seemed to be for Kawu rather than the mission.
　　“If your husband does have dreams in this coma you described, then, yuz, I can enter them.”
　　“Would you prefer to go by yourself or take Dal’Varek and Varroy with you as we suggested?”
　　Kawu cast a sidelong glance at Jespar. There was a short pause. “Three minds perceive more than one and most of my concentration will be spent on keeping the three of us aware within the dream, so, yuz, if they agree, I would have them accompany me.
　　However, even then I can’t make any promises. Dreams are enigmatic at best, incomprehensible at worst, so we might find an answer, or we might find nothing.”
　　“It will work,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “I spent the last night in prayer, and Morala favors the cunning and the bold, so it will work.” Her features relaxed. “In any case, thank you very much for agreeing to help—I’m certain we will both benefit from this agreement.
　　And thank you, too, Dal’Varek and Varroy, you did great work. Zagash, were you aware the Scythe had so many supporters on Yuva?”
　　“I wasn’t,” Enkshi said. “But I’ll inform General Duul and Sergeant M?adira so they can decide on a course of action.”
　　“Good.” Ma’saa Nayima turned to Jespar, Kawu, and Lysia. “There’s good news, too.
　　A moon ago, we sent word to the Holy Order on Enderal and asked for a division of keepers to help us against the Scythe—a precaution more than anything, really; the Blue Guard can handle them, but who knows what these faithless have-nots are planning for Sua Javaar. ” She held up the letter she’d been reading. “This is the Holy Order’s answer.
　　It arrived this morning via black myrad courier.”
　　Enkshi wrinkled his forehead. “What does it say?”
　　“Truchessa Dal’Veram is going to send a division that should be here within a fortnight.”
　　“That’s later than I had hoped.”
　　“According to her, it’s as fast as it was possible for them. We should be grateful they are sending us any help at all.”
　　“…I suppose.”
　　“If I may ask,” Kawu said, “when you talk about the Holy Order, are you talking about the warriors of the Light-Born?”
　　“Yuz,” Nayima said. “ But don’t let this be of any concern to you. If all goes well, and I have faith it will, your business here will be done within the next couple of days.” She put down the letter and folded her hands. “Speaking of which, we should waste no more time. Do you need anything to perform this ritual, and, if yuz, what?”
　　“It’s a hypnosis, not a ritual. And all I need is a place for the three of us to lie down near the dreamer, your husband, an item of great personal value to him, and a pouch of znah— the latter will probably be the hardest to acquire. It’s a very rare herb.”
　　“We can use my marriage beads for the personal item. As for that herb, Agaam will find it, no matter how rare or how expensive. Zagash, tell Agaam to reach out to his contacts. That’s all?”
　　“Yuz, ma’saa. That’s all.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai nodded. “Then we will take care of the rest. You’ll perform the ritual as soon as we get the herb, possibly this afternoon. Use the time to eat, wash, and rest.
　　Zagash will inform you when everything is ready.”
　　Enkshi showed them down into one of the many dining rooms, a high-ceilinged hall on the twentieth floor, and left them there with a stiff nod. When Jespar saw the dining table in the center, round and with six chairs, he wondered for the first time why Oonai had no offspring. A Makehu girl served them drinks and a plate of mixed Kiléan dishes, the hint of a frown on her face as she handed Kawu his cup. Jespar attempted to make conversation, but Lysia was unusually silent and Kawu busy gobbling down the food, all the while trying to conceal his obviously ravenous appetite. About the time they were done eating, Enkshi returned and informed them that the arrangements had been made and the znah would arrive in the early evening hours.
　　The counselor was about to leave when Lysia said, “May I ask a question?”
　　Enkshi turned around. “What?”
　　“That ‘accident’ in the Yuvanian mines twenty years ago,” Lysia said. “Is it true that it was orchestrated in order to shut down the worker movement?”
　　Jespar decided that, as many strengths as Lysia had, subtlety wasn’t among them.
　　Enkshi narrowed his eyes. He gave Kawu a sidelong glance. “Is that what you’ve told them?”
　　Kawu said nothing.
　　“Is it true or not?” Lysia asked. “That’s all I want to know.”
　　Enkshi adjusted his rings, their silver contrasting his dark skin. “Well, let me put it this way: You’re right about the rockslide. It wasn’t an accident.”
　　Beside Jespar, Kawu tensed.
　　“Then you admit…?” Lysia said.
　　“Not what you think,” Enkshi said. “Yuz, of course the worker movement from Yuva was a thorn in the coalition’s side… simply because their demands were so ludicrous.
　　However, it had nothing to do with the accident. You’re aware that two families owned the nuvium mines on Yuva, yuz? Well, one of them, the Onêlyses, was at the brink of ruin, and forced to sell their shares of the Pit to the other family. Long story short, they couldn’t bear the shame.”
　　Jespar scrunched up an eyebrow. “You’re saying they blew up their own mine?”
　　“Correct, Dal’Varek, that’s what I’m saying, and there is plenty of evidence to prove it.
　　Never underestimate the power of hurt pride.” He turned to face Lysia. “Now, you may choose to believe me or not—knowing you, it’ll probably be the latter. Yuz, only a fool would deny the coalition has stains on its robes, but Yuva isn’t one of them. But, of course, that’s not what the have-nots want to believe. If I can give you a piece of advice, keep in mind that being poor doesn’t make you a saint. Everybody tells his own version of the truth to fit their own pretty little narrative.”
　　Lysia held Enkshi’s gaze for a moment, then turned her attention back to her plate.
　　“Okay.”
　　“Good.” He nodded toward the exit. “Now that that’s settled, I expect you in the sleeping chambers two hours from now, washed and changed. You have a contract to fulfill.”
---
　　Clouds still occluded the sun, so a rainy afternoon gloom filled the sleeping chamber’s vestibule. It was silent except for the light wind outside. Gingerly, Jespar opened the double-winged door, slipped inside, and closed it behind him. It was dark inside, so a moment passed before Jespar’s eyes adjusted. The room smelled better than it had yesterday, freshly aired and traced with incense, but the aroma of sickness still dominated. Kawu, Ma’saa Oonai, and Enkshi were by the First Magnate’s bed, Kawu kneeling beside it, his palm resting on Jaaros Oonai’s forehead. The dreamwalker wore no tunic and sandals, and a necklace hung around his neck, a crescent of bone spikes.
　　Ma’saa Oonai and Counselor Enkshi watched over his shoulder. While Enkshi and Kawu didn’t seem to have noticed Jespar, Ma’saa Oonai acknowledged him with a smile.
　　“They’re still waiting for the old servant to bring the stuff,” Lysia said. She was leaning against the column next to the door and spoke in a low voice. “And the boy is doing some kind of pre-examination.” Just like Jespar, she wore fresh clothes, a white tunic that contrasted her tan and brown, loose linen trousers. Her hair was down and still wet from the bath.
　　“Okay,” Jespar said, sitting on the edge of the nearby table. “How are you feeling?”
　　“Honest answer? Bloody nervous.” She sighed. “Entering a dream… If I didn’t know better, I’d say this is all some kind of stupid joke.”
　　“Shouldn’t you be used to that kind of thing? Considering magic is all about alternate realities and so on?”
　　“That’s different. Eventualities are… detached, like shapes you see moving behind a foggy looking glass. It’s all very abstract, even if you’re a mage. You got your world, and you got the others that you use from time to time to light a candle, heal a cut, or something like that. Bottom line, the borders are… solid. Clearly defined.” She shook her head. “Dreams, on the other hand… I don’t know. They are part of our world, tiny little phantasms we create in our own heads at night. To think of them as actual worlds you can enter, but only in your mind because they’re not physical… it’s bloody strange if you ask me.” She snorted, then gave Jespar an absent-minded smile. “Stars burn me, I’m probably not making a lot of sense, am I?”
　　“Actually, you are.”
　　The door opened and Agaam appeared carrying blankets and cushions under one arm.
　　Ma’saa Oonai’s face lit up as she saw him.
　　“Do you have it?”
　　Agaam nodded and produced a brown leather pouch from his pockets with his free hand. “It’s not much and it was hard to get, but, yuz, ma’saa. I have it. ”
　　A part of Jespar had been hoping for a different answer.
　　“Then we’re ready,” Enkshi said.
　　Over the next hour, Kawu explained the rules of tuewa, the realm of dreams. Three of them were paramount for the mission.
　　First was the fact that every conscious being had its own tuewa, its own dream world its mind traveled to when it slept, and each tuewa was found in the “In-Between,” the ocean beneath the glacier lake Jespar had involuntarily seen in his seizure. Black and endless… a crossroads of minds.
　　“Let me get this straight,” Lysia said. “You are talking about some kind of… collective mind?” They sat around a table near the canopy bed, a candelabra that Agaam had lit the sole source of light. Light rain fell against the closed shutters, its pattering faint and hypnotic.
　　Kawu nodded. “That is one way to say it, yuz.”
　　“I’m not certain I understand,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “Does this mean that our minds…
　　connect with others when we fall asleep?”
　　“It does. Think of it as ‘collective telepathy.’ We perceive ourselves as individual entities, but the truth is, parts of our spirits are always connected, and that limbo between waking life and dream is when we briefly come together, albeit while unconscious. A shared hallucination, if you will.”
　　Lysia gave a long sigh. “If I didn’t know better, I’d say that’s a lot of hogwash. How is it possible that no one except the Makehu know about this?”
　　Kawu turned to face her. “I don’t know. Probably because knowing or not knowing this ultimately makes no difference for most people. As I said, this telepathy only lasts for a brief moment until our minds reach our own tuewa, and everyone, except for dreamwalkers, is unaware of it while it happens.”
　　“But why?” Lysia asked. “Where’s the point of all this?”
　　Kawu paused before answering, “Who knows? You might as well ask why we’re born and why we die—it’s simply how it is. I assume there are a lot of things we don’t know about, and still they happen.”
　　There was a short silence.
　　“Fair enough,” Jespar said. “But if every living being temporarily enters that In-Between place when it dreams and it’s a ‘shared hallucination,’ wouldn’t that mean that ocean would have to be full of people? I didn’t see anyone when your mother gave me that ‘seizure’ back in Yuva, not even Lysia, though she was standing right beside me.”
　　“Again, because the In-Between is infinite. Physical proximity when falling asleep puts you closer in the In-Between, but almost never within sight.”
　　“… I see.”
　　Not really. Sure, he understood the words and the theory, but did he actually grasp the meaning behind them? No. It was a bit like when he had first heard about the concept of alternate realities that made magic possible, or when on a starlit night, his foster father had let him (and her) look through his Qyranian telescope and Jespar first realized how small and insignificant things must have looked from up there.
　　“All right,” Lysia said, “so we enter a shared hallucination when we fall asleep. But how do we get inside our actual dreams? The ones we remember?”
　　“That happens by itself. Think of it as us sinking until our minds guide us to our tuewa somewhere down in that ocean, and our sleeping minds automatically take us to them.
　　Which is where I come in—for us to reach Oonai’s mind, we need to be aware while we traverse the In-Between. I will hypnotize you and, by doing so, keep you lucid so we can find his tuewa together.”
　　Cold settled in the nape of Jespar’s neck. “We’re going to be aware while we sink down that ocean?”
　　“It’s the only way. Also, remember, everything that happens in the In-Between or in our dreams is ultimately just an elaborate illusion and can’t harm us physically.”
　　But mentally? He kept quiet.
　　“The second rule: To the dreamer, the dream is reality,” Kawu explained. “The sleeping mind doesn’t know it’s dreaming. Except for rare exceptions, it thinks everything that’s happening is real.”
　　Rare exceptions such as yours truly, Jespar thought.
　　“Which directly ties into the final rule: If the narrative of a dream breaks, the sleeper awakes. This is irrelevant for normal dreams, but important for our undertaking. A dream,” Kawu said, “always follows an internal logic, a narrative, and that narrative has to be respected.”
　　“So,” Lysia said, “once we enter Oonai’s dream, we have to play the part?”
　　“It’s not so much about ‘playing the part’ than about making certain Oonai’s dream doesn’t recognize us as outsiders. The moment this happens, we’ve lost, because the dream will expel us and, possibly, not allow us to enter if we try again. Not to mention the immense mental exhaustion we’ll all feel after the journey.” He gave what he hoped was a reassuring smile. “But, if you follow my guidance, we’ll be fine. Staying within the narrative isn’t hard if you don’t do anything foolish. Extracting information, on the other hand, is a challenge.”
　　Enkshi, who had been listening quietly, spoke up. “What you’re saying is that you cannot simply approach Master Oonai in his dream, tell him he’s asleep, and ask him what happened, correct?”
　　“Absolutely not,” Kawu said. “That would be the quickest way to propel us back into reality.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai let out a sigh and leaned back in her chair, massaging her temples as if helping her brain to process her new knowledge.
　　Jespar drank from the water Agaam had brought him, wishing it was something stronger. “In other words: We’re spies in a dream.”
---
　　Lysia and Jespar sat cross-legged on the blankets Agaam had laid out for them. Based on Kawu’s instructions, Jespar wore his daggers, Lysia her baton. They were facing the bed, where the dim light shrouded the First Magnate’s emaciated shape in obscurity. He looked stiff and lifeless, more like a wax figure than man. Ma’saa Oonai, holding a wooden box, and Enkshi stood some arm-lengths away, as if trying to keep a safe distance; Agaam was behind Jespar and Lysia, so motionless Jespar had to remind himself of his presence.
　　Kawu knelt down in front of them, buttocks resting on his heels, the arches of his feet on the ground, and handed them two cups of dark liquid. Znah. Jespar brought it to his nose. It smelled good, sweet and rich.
　　“Please drink.”
　　Jespar sipped. When he found that it tasted as good as the smell suggested, he downed it in one go.
　　Lysia looked uncertain. “ Remind me, what exactly does this do?”
　　“ It numbs your mind,” Kawu said. “As I said, my hypnosis will keep you conscious while we traverse the In-Between, but as you’re not used to this state, there’s a high risk you would panic without some kind of help . ”
　　“So, it’s a droga.”
　　“ A sedative, yuz. But it will let off once we’re inside the dream.” Seeing Lysia was still reluctant, he said, “Even if you were somehow able to stay calm in the In-Between, znah also changes how we perceive time, which will make things a lot more pleasant for you. It might take us days or even weeks to find Oonai’s dream.”
　　“Weeks?” Enkshi said. He still sat at the table, observing them with an expression best described as resigned skepticism. “We don’t have that much time.”
　　“Here, it won’t be as long,” Kawu replied. “In the In-Between, time doesn’t exist at all, and it passes differently in tuewa. Thirty minutes out here might be a year in a dream, or even more.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai cast a worried glance at her husband.
　　A soothing warmth spread in Jespar’s mind, like liquid honey coating his thoughts. The effect reminded him of nightflower, but a lot stronger and without the sleepiness.
　　Kawu turned back to Lysia. “You will simply have to trust me.”
　　Lysia hesitated. Then she emptied the contents of the cup.
　　Kawu nodded at Ma’saa Oonai. “The beads, please.”
　　The mistress of the house took a necklace from the wooden box she was holding, marble-shaped gemstones in different colors strung onto a chord. She gave it to Kawu.
　　“Please be careful.”
　　“I will.” Kawu took the marriage beads and studied them. “Your husband loves you.”
　　He said it without emotion, as though stating a fact.
　　Ma’saa Oonai smiled weakly. “I know.”
　　“Then we can start?” Enkshi asked.
　　“We can.”
　　Following Kawu’s instructions, Lysia and Jespar straightened their backs, folded their hands in their laps, and concentrated on the marriage beads that lay between them. The droga was now in full bloom. Kawu bent forward and touched Lysia’s forehead with his outstretched index and middle finger.
　　“Sleep.”
　　Her eyes fell shut. Agaam, who stood behind them, immediately grabbed her under the shoulders and eased her down on the blanket. Kawu turned to Jespar.
　　Two thoughts crossed his mind when he felt the dreamwalker’s fingertips on his forehead.
　　The first: This was the first time they’d made physical contact.
　　The second: He’d done a lot of peculiar things in his time on the road, but if there were trophies to be won for strangeness, this one was by far the top candidate.
　　“Sleep.”
　　By f—
　　He plummeted into darkness.
---
　　The water enfolded him.
　　It was silent, cold, and dark, except for faint rays of light coming through the iced water surface far above him, but the light was fading. Because he sank.
　　The In-Between.
　　I’m dreaming.
　　The clarity of these thoughts surprised him. He knew the state of being lucid within a dream from his recurring nightmare, but this was different—yes, he was aware during the Trial, but there he was reduced to being a witness: forced to feel, unable to act, a prisoner in his own mind.
　　Here, he was free.
　　He was himself.
　　Surrounded by the dark water, he tried to wave his hand. It moved. He kicked his legs.
　　They obeyed. He noticed how, though his lungs worked, neither air nor water entered his nostrils, and how his body didn’t miss it.
　　Interesting.
　　Even though his situation gave plenty of reason to panic, he somehow felt completely at ease, calm and collected, as if his sinking into an endless ocean that supposedly represented the border between dream and reality was the most normal thing in the world—according to Kawu, it was. The znah, Jespar realized. Whatever negative emotions he would have ordinarily felt, the droga drowned them in a peaceful lethargy.
　　A smile formed on his lips as he sunk deeper and deeper.
　　He didn’t know where he was going.
　　He didn’t care.
　　Someone touched him on the shoulder. Slowly, as if awaking from a trance, Jespar turned his head. Kawu. He hovered less than an arm-length from him, the bone necklace floating around his neck like fragments of a shattered vase. Jespar attempted to speak, but Kawu merely shook his head and beckoned him to follow. Jespar did.
　　They swam, seemingly without direction, downward, upward, left and right, through the monotonous blackness. The light from the surface was almost gone when they found a shape floating in the vastness. Lysia. She had the same look of numbed amazement on her face that Jespar must have had on his own. Kawu signaled them both to follow.
　　Time passed while the dreamwalker guided them through the ocean, and it felt as unreal and fluid as the water surrounding them. When Kawu finally stopped, Jespar couldn’t tell how long they had been going, whether it had been seconds, hours, or days.
　　When Kawu came to a sudden stop and his fists clenched, Jespar’s znah-drugged mind didn’t realize what it meant. Kawu faced them, his eyes wide open.
　　Shock?
　　Fear?
　　A current gripped Jespar.
　　Before he even understood what was happening, it had already torn him away from the group. Finally, panic broke through the false serenity of the znah. He tried to escape the pull. He swam, kicked, but it was pointless. Like flotsam in a cyclone, the current tossed and spun him through the water, smothering all sense of orientation. A figure swept past him and caught his ankle, he looked, it was a corpse in gray robes, the Corpse, his bloated lips pressed in that look of contempt and shame and disappointment, Jespar screamed, but there was no sound, k. He kicked at the rotten face but missed, and a silhouette appeared below them—the trial hall encased in a sphere of water—and he saw it all, the jury, the spectators, the guards, the dais.
　　His dream,
　　But, then, the current changed direction. It ripped him away from the Corpse, once again flung and spun him through the darkness until there was another water sphere coming at him at breakneck speed.
　　He opened his mouth in a silent scream.
　　And smashed through the bubble.
　　Briefly, he hung suspended in mid-air. There was no more water, just moist air, and the sphere through which he had entered just a millisecond ago was now solid stone. His clothes and skin were as dry as on a summer’s day.
　　He crashed down on the stone floor.
　　For what must have been minutes he just lay there, his breath coming fast and shallow while he tried to comprehend what had just happened. As Kawu had promised, the effect of the znah seemed to have let up completely upon entering the dream. Slowly but surely, his mind put together the pieces.
　　At first, all had gone as intended—Jespar had entered the In-Between, and, through Kawu’s presence, remained lucid. Kawu had found first him, then Lysia, and had started to guide them to what should have been Jaaros Oonai’s tuewa, his dream world.
　　Then something had gone wrong. A riptide had torn them from each other, and tried to drag Jespar into his own nightmare until, for some reason, it shifted direction and tossed him into another dream instead.
　　Oonai’s?
　　Deciding that he wouldn’t find out whilst lying on the flagstone, Jespar moaned and got to his knees. His vision was blurry, and his head swam but other than that, he felt fine. Rubbing his eyes to clear the fog before them, he looked around.
　　And froze.
　　The room was filled with the carcasses of pigs, headless, skinned, and suspended from chains. The smell of blood permeated the air, mingled with the aromas of spices, cabbage, and flour. It was dark except for a cone of light falling through a half-open door at the opposite side of the room.
　　A storage chamber?
　　Jespar felt for his daggers. Thankfully, his brain—or the In-Between, or whatever weird law dictated the rules in this place—had projected his weapons into the dream, their steel hilts reassuring under his palms. When the question what good an immaterial weapon would do in an immaterial world stirred at the back of his mind, he ignored it.
　　What now?
　　Wake up.
　　Of course. The most reasonable thing to do was to wake up in the ziggurat, review the situation with Kawu and the others, and try again. How, though? His mind raced, until he remembered Kawu’s words: Break the narrative.
　　That was it. All he had to do was to signal the dream he was an outsider, and it would reject him.
　　“I’m dreaming,” Jespar said aloud.
　　Nothing.
　　“I’m in a dream. I want to wake up.”
　　The same result. He tried several other things, from squeezing his eyes shut and envisioning himself bolting awake, and even pinching himself, but none of them worked.
　　Oonai.
　　In all likelihood, Jespar couldn’t “break the narrative,” because the dreamer wasn’t even present to notice he was doing it. Which, in return, meant one thing: To get out, he had to find Oonai or Kawu.
　　And if he managed neither?
　　Then, Ma’sao Dal’Varek, you’re trapped.
　　Cold formed in the pit of his stomach.
　　“Okay,” he said. “Okay.”
　　He was waist-deep in shit, fair enough, but if there was one thing that would raise waist-deep to neck-deep, it would be to let fear get the better of him.
　　Okay.
　　You got this.
　　He went to the door, carefully sidling his way through the suspended carcasses, ignoring the smell of the bloody, salted meat forcing its way into his nostrils. Halfway through, his fear had let off a little. That he felt so clear and in control helped: Had he not known that his real body was sound asleep in First Magnate Jaaros Oonai’s sleeping chambers, he would have found it hard to believe that what he was experiencing wasn’t reality. Less than ten arm-lengths separated him from the door when a shriek pierced through the silence. Jespar whirled around, drawing both daggers. One of the pig carcasses slowly swung from side to side, blood trickling from its decapitated neck.
　　What the—
　　The blood and the swinging stopped.
　　Jespar gripped his daggers tighter and walked backward to the door, keeping his eyes on the carcass.
　　Just a dream.
　　Whatever happened next, it wasn’t real. He was safely in the world of matter, akhara or whatever the Makehu called it, and no matter what happened to him down here, no dream could physically harm the living.
　　Very convincing, he thought. Very convincing.
　　He’d taken three steps when there was another shriek, this one twice as loud. It came from another carcass, one that hung just a few arm-lengths away from him. Like a grotesque pendulum, it swung back and forth, the bloodied flesh bumping into the other carcasses around it. Blood spurted from its neck, forming a puddle beneath it.
　　Jespar stepped back. The headless carcass cried again and the swinging grew faster.
　　Just a dream. Another step back, toward the door. When the next sound came from a carcass right behind him, his blood froze.
　　Why?
　　Because he finally understood where the noises came from. Not from a disembodied voice, not from the pigs’ mauled throats, but from inside the carcasses themselves.
　　And they were human.
　　Four corpses set in motion at once, swinging so hard that their bodies smashed into the ceiling, shrieking and wailing, spraying fountains of blood all over the room.
　　Simultaneously, their bellies shifted, stretched, bulged.
　　Jespar spun around and ran for the door. All the corpses were morphing now, until one of them right next to Jespar tore open and a little thing fell to the floor from inside them, crying, covered in blood, and crawling on all fours. Jespar reached the door, flung himself through, and smashed it shut behind him. He had just enough time to catch a glimpse at one of the creatures from the bellies of the corpses.
　　Embryos.
　　Behind the door, the cacophony ceased.
　　His breath coming in fits, Jespar stared at the metal door, almost convinced that it would spring open any moment.
　　It didn’t.
　　“… Fucking hell.” He wiped the sweat off his forehead. The tips of his boots were tinged with blood, the metallic smell still in his nostrils and the cries and shrieks of the children in his eardrums.
　　“Fucking hell.”
　　He turned around and studied his surroundings. Before him lay a long hallway. Even though it was tinted by a pale, violet light falling through its right side, there was no mistaking the white stone walls, the marble floor, and the blue and gold rug that ran down the length of the corridor. The ziggurat.
　　Good news, he thought. You found the place.
　　Bad news: It’s a godsdamned nightmare.
　　He went to search for Kawu and Lysia.
---
　　Jespar wasn’t surprised to find that the carcass-born toddlers were far from the only horrors the dream had to offer. After taking a right turn at the end of the hallway, Jespar came into a section lined with row after row of portraits, supposedly depicting Jaaros and Nayima Oonai’s ancestry. At least that must have been their purpose in the waking world.
　　Here, the figures in the frames were deformed, mockeries of humanity, with limbs and bones stretched and bent in impossible angles, necks as long as arms, and arms that were as thin as fingers. Eyeballs sat in sockets placed too far apart, the heads equine and angled, the mouths placed a finger-length above the chin.
　　And they moved.
　　Slowly they pressed their hands against the inside of the paintings as if trying to escape, their eyes following Jespar as he walked by and their mouths opening and closing in soundless words and silent screams. His daggers drawn and his blood hot in his temples, Jespar placed one foot in front of the other. When the paintings were finally behind him, he had to wipe the hilts of his daggers against his tunic. They were so drenched in sweat they had almost slipped from his palms.
　　When one corridor finally led him outside onto a colonnade, he realized that the Uunil of Oonai’s dream was as dead as the inside of his palace. It was a no man’s land, gray, ashen soil as far as the eye could see, not even the skeleton of a palm or a tree or a shrub to remind Jespar of the real world from which this landscape had been formed. A moon purple as frostbitten limbs shone through a cover of clouds, and the dry air smelled like ash.
　　Jespar pushed on, shouting Kawu’s and Lysia’s names, but he found nothing.
　　Following a hunch, he went to the study in the ziggurat garden, but it was deserted and decayed. A silhouette in a pale yellow dress squatted over a flowerbed before it and shoveled gray earth into an empty planter. Jespar approached her warily.
　　“Hello?”
　　The woman turned her face. It was blank, smooth as a marble except for a pointy nose and a thin mouth. Charcoal was smeared all over her skin. Jespar stepped slowly back, the tips of his daggers pointed at the eyeless woman. She didn’t follow.
　　He tried the dining hall where he, Lysia, and Kawu had eaten, and found two corpses instead, seated around the table and quietly moving their cutlery over the empty plates.
　　One of them wore three prayer rings on each of her upper arms, the other one an abundance of rings on the rotten fingers. Though they all turned their heads to Jespar when he entered, none of them reacted. They just stopped moving their cutlery and looked at him, worms creeping over their eyeballs.
　　For a moment, Jespar held their gaze, his brain struggling to find an adequate reaction to what it was seeing. At last, Jespar slowly turned around and left.
　　“ I’m dreaming,” Jespar repeated again and again, but it didn’t take long before the horror that had begun to grow in his chest in the storage chamber had swollen to a paralyzing cloud over his mind. Outside, he hurried up the main stairs, and sat down on the steps halfway up the ziggurat. For the first time, two thoughts that had been lurking in the depths of his mind since he entered the dream made their way to the surface.
　　In dreams, time is relative.
　　What if there’s no way out?
　　They spawned a third: What if I’m alone?
　　What if, by some unlucky coincidence, he was indeed the only one who had actually made it into Oonai’s dream? What if Kawu and Lysia were back in reality, in akhara, telling Ma’saa Oonai and Enkshi about the tragic event, Jespar’s body motionless on the blanket next to the man he’d been hired to save? Sure, they might come for him again, but if five minutes in waking life could equal five years in a dream, what—
　　There was a whimper. Jespar started.
　　Another.
　　It was hard to tell, but the voice seemed to be coming from somewhere down the column-lined walkway running along the front edge of the ziggurat. Jespar drew a deep breath.
　　He stood and followed the noise.
　　The whimpering grew louder as he moved down the walkway, the vastness of the dead island backdropping the balustrade to his right, door after door to his left. The howling of the wind mixed with the sobs and moans. Finally, Jespar came to a halt before a metal door. It looked just like the others leading inside the ziggurat, but the voice seemed to come from behind it.
　　Jespar reached for the handle.
　　Hesitated.
　　Opened it.
　　A sickening smell hit him, sweet, metallic, pungent. The room was cramped and dark, lit only by a brass chandelier, half of its candles burnt down. Cupboards and shelves covered the crude stone walls, packed with books, herbs, and medical paraphernalia—
　　vials, instruments, and bandages.
　　After the split second it took his mind to translate what he was seeing into context and meaning, Jespar simply froze.
　　At the opposite side of the room, Jaaros Oonai sat in a chair. His face was all angles and bones, his skin full of scabs and blisters, his hair and beard greasy and disheveled.
　　The Magnate’s Crown was on his head, but it was rusty and five of the spikes were broken. A man in orange robes knelt before him, both hands sunk in a head-sized hole in the First Magnate’s stomach. Blood spurted from the wound, spraying all over the man’s robes and soaking his arms, but both the man and Jaaros Oonai were impassive. The First Magnate’s eyes were wide open, spittle running from his lips as they formed the moaning Jespar had heard from outside.
　　The orange-robed man pulled out his hands, cupping a clump of meat—
　　A liver
　　It’s a liver
　　—in them. He put it onto a table beside him, next to a mound of other organs.
　　Jespar vomited.
　　When he had emptied the contents of his stomach on the flagstones, he coughed, his heart racing and pulse throbbing, not daring to lift his eyes, thinking that this made no sense, none of this made any sense, none of this was happening, none—
　　He threw up again.
　　When it was all out, he forced himself to look up.
　　The orange-robed man had pulled another piece of flesh from the First Magnate’s insides, whose face remained as lethargic as it had been.
　　A fist-sized tumor protruded from Jaaros’s head, just above his left ear.
　　Tumor?
　　“Gods,” Jespar whispered. “Gods.”
　　It wasn’t a tumor—it was an insect. Its body black and wrinkly and bulbous, it expanded and contracted, like a leech sucking blood from its host. Five tiny dots—eyes—
　　were set in the outward-facing section of its body, interspersed with fat. Finger-long feelers grew out between them and twisted and writhed slowly. Stumps poked out on either side and hooked into Oonai’s scalp.
　　For a while, Jespar simply stared at the grotesque scene, at the medicus, at the magnate, at the creature on his neck. Then he turned around and left.
　　Gently, as if trying not to disturb a sleeping child, he pushed the door shut behind him.
　　He went over to the balustrade and leaned his elbows on it, eyes fixed at the sky. Despite its unnatural color, something about it soothed him, probably that it was the only remotely normal thing in this godsdamned fucking nightmare, an anchor for his sanity.
　　It’s not real.
　　None of this is real.
　　Jespar made a frustrated noise, ran a hand through his disheveled hair.
　　Ultimately, he had two options: Continue searching for Kawu and Lysia or take matters into his own hands by breaking the narrative and propelling himself back into reality. As much as a part of him preferred option one, he doubted aimlessly scouring the horror cabinet of the ziggurat for another indefinite amount of time had a positive effect on his sanity—not to mention there was a considerable chance Kawu and Lysia hadn’t made it into this tuewa in the first place. Which left him with option two.
　　Oonai.
　　Whichever way he looked at it, the way out of the dream, and maybe even to the information they were after, led back inside that room. But how? The First Magnate hadn’t even seemed aware of Jespar, so how was he even supposed to get him to listen, let alone talk to him?
　　When the idea came, it was crisp and clear.
　　Jespar wiped his palms against his trousers, then took a deep breath.
---
　　The medicus had enlarged the hole in Oonai’s stomach, four flaps of skin folded outward and held in place by brackets pinned into Oonai’s robe. Having removed most of the organs inside, the medicus now seemed in the process of severing and extracting the muscle strands of the external oblique.
　　One dagger drawn, Jespar went to the medicus, yanked his head up by his hair, and cut his throat. There was no struggle, no resistance. The medicus simply stopped moving while the red liquid spurted from the wound, spraying into Oonai’s wound and his already blood-soaked, dark blue robes. He collapsed without making a sound.
　　Jespar looked at the corpse for a second then pushed him to the side with his boot.
　　Oonai ceased his muttering, the insect on his neck expanding and contracting. Still there was no recognition in the First Magnate’s eyes, he simply gazed straight ahead as if looking at some distant landscape.
　　“Jaaros Ismiraael Oonai,” Jespar said.
　　There was no reaction.
　　He lightly pressed the tip of his boot against the First Magnate’s knee. Nothing.
　　The bug. It was just as he had figured: Whatever that thing was, it caused Oonai’s coma, it caused this nightmare.
　　He’d found the “curse.”
　　Jespar exhaled heavily. Then he grabbed the First Magnate’s head, tilted it to the side so that the fat insect was fully exposed, and drove his dagger deep inside its black, slimy body.
　　Years back, during the civil war in Nehrim, a healer of the Gallowmen had requested Jespar’s help after a skirmish. Another mercenary’s leg had been caught under a battering ram’s wheel and crushed into a bloody pulp, and the healer’s assistant had gone missing.
　　Jespar obeyed and held the mercenary, barely more than a boy, in place while the healer cut off the leg with a bone saw.
　　The scream Jaaros Oonai let out the moment the knife went into the insect’s flesh was the same. At the same time, the insect’s feelers shot out and closed around Jespar’s wrist.
　　A shock raced up his arm, into his shoulder, up the side of his neck, and finally deep into his skull.
　　Pain exploded.
　　The world went red.

　　Memories.

　　A burning house, Jespar and her, trembling hands, disbelief, screams.
　　Bodies on stakes, familiar faces, all the skin gone except for their faces.
　　His brothers dead, his father dying, pale blue eyes staring at him.
　　Is that sadness?
　　Or disappointment?

　　The world shifts.
　　More memories, but not his own.
　　A house on a mountain, the sky orange and purple.
　　He and a woman in a bright room, talking.
　　He and a woman, walking between walls of green.
　　Anger.
　　Shame.
　　You can’t stop me.
　　Every sin leaves a mark on us.
　　I can fix this.
　　I can clear my name.

　　Darkness.
#chapter Nine - Leech
*Cold.*

　　EVERY PORE, EVERY BONE, EVERY SINEW, the kind of cold that took your fingers in a blizzard, the kind you’d find in the flesh of a corpse buried under an avalanche.
　　E Jespar moaned, but all that came out was a croak. He tried to open his eyes, but didn’t succeed before the third try. A milky film blurred his sight, making it impossible to see.
　　Voices.
　　Voices nearby, two, but he didn’t understand what they were saying. One of them came closer.
　　“…par?”
　　Cold.
　　Jespar slipped away.
　　When he opened his eyes again, the cold was down to a chill, and the blurry fog was gone.
　　The first thing he noticed was how funny the sky looked. Dark. Purple.
　　Oonai.
　　The bug.
　　Panic flooded him. He was still inside the nightmare, trapped, unable to move, unable to awaken. Someone ran toward him, and he instinctively reached for his daggers, but they weren’t there.
　　“Jespar!” The figure squatted before him and grabbed him by the shoulders. “Jespar, for the gods’ sakes, calm down!”
　　A breath passed before Jespar finally recognized the face.
　　“Ly-Lysia?”
　　Lysia sighed with relief. “That’s my name.”
　　Another figure came into sight. “Kweh… You’re awake.”
　　Kawu knelt down beside him, and placed his palm on his forehead. What was left of the chill vanished and his nerves calmed. For some breaths he didn’t move, his eyes darting from Kawu and Lysia like a trapped animal, his breath slow and heavy. Finally, he let out a long sigh and tried to reorient himself.
　　He was in the column-lined walkway, back resting against a wall right next to the metal door of what he presumed was the medicus’s room.
　　The bug.
　　His eyes shot down his right arm to five red dots on his wrist, supposedly where the insect’s feelers had touched him. What happened? The last thing he remembered was driving his dagger into the parasite’s black, glistening carapace. Then, darkness.
　　Wincing, he attempted to stand, but dizziness overcame him, and he almost lost his footing.
　　Lysia was immediately at his side and supported him. “Easy.”
　　Jespar gave a weak nod and drew a deep breath. Slowly, the strength returned to his limbs, and his mind cleared.
　　“…All right,” he said. “What on Vyn happened?”
　　Lysia gave him hollow smile. “Long story. But I guess we found the cause of the coma.”
　　Jespar glanced at the sealed metal door of the sick room. “The insect.”
　　“The dream-eater,” Kawu said. “It’s a parasite, and this is his creation.” He walked to the balustrade and rested his elbows on it, the dead island stretching out beyond the balustrade. “The current that separated us in the In-Between… I assume it was a sort of defense mechanism of the dream-eater to keep intruders out of the dream. I neutralized it, but, by then, it had already swept you away.”
　　“I see.” Jespar rubbed his forehead, his skin feeling damp and cold. “There… there was someone in the current. A character from my dreams.”
　　Kawu nodded, as if Jespar had confirmed his suspicions. “Probably a hallucination… an element of your own tuewa that seeped over into the In-Between. See, when the dream-eater’s defenses temporarily broke my hypnosis on you, your mind proceeded to do what it would have normally done while in the In-Between.”
　　“Guide me into my own dream?”
　　“Yuz. I stopped the current in time , but you were too far out for me to find you, so I took Ma’saa Varroy and myself to Oonai’s dream, where I knew the hypnosis would take you eventually. But it seems you came here before us, and when we found you in that room you were unconscious. You tried to kill the parasite, didn’t you?”
　　“…I thought it might get me out of here.”
　　“Understandable, but you’re extremely lucky to have survived—it’s impossible to kill a dream-eater in tuewa.”
　　Jespar’s eyes wandered back to the marks on his arms. By now, they had almost faded. “But I’m fine now, right? I survived.”
　　Kawu paused. “Yuz. I think you are.”
　　“Speaking of that bug,” Lysia said, “what on Vyn is that thing anyway? And how is it responsible for this?”
　　“That’s a long answer.” He turned to face them. “I’ll explain everything as best as I can, but not here. We’ve been in tuewa longer than it’s good for your minds, and it’s time to leave.”
　　Jespar let out a breath he didn’t know he’d been holding. “So, you can take us out of here?”
　　“Yuz. I had to wait for you to regain consciousness, but now there’s no more reason for us to stay.”
　　“Music to my ears,” Lysia said. She glanced at the metal door behind them. A faint whimper came from inside. “What about the First Magnate? Do we just leave him here?”
　　Kawu said, “We have to. There’s nothing else we can do.”
---
　　Leaving a dream through the In-Between was easier than entering it. There was only one way to go, and that was up. As he had done in reality, Kawu placed his index and middle finger on Jespar’s forehead, only this time he didn’t fall asleep.
　　The world melted.
　　Like an aquarelle submerged into water, the wall behind him, the ceiling above his head, and the scenery behind the balustrade first blurred, then morphed into the sphere of water he had entered through. Warmth prickled in Jespar’s limbs and head.
　　“The znah,” Kawu said as Jespar’s eyes widened. Though he was standing right in front of him, his voice sounded muffled. “It’s taking effect again. Don’t worry, I’ll guide you.”
　　Jespar wanted to answer, but, instead, he found himself smile. Everything was light, untethered, and he was the seed of a dandelion caught in an updraft. His feet left the ground, and he was floating toward the ceiling, toward the edge of the water sphere, behind which the dark ocean extended into the endless distance.
　　Before he knew it, they were back in the blackness of the In-Between, Kawu guiding them as they ascended back to reality. Not much later, the ocean’s frozen surface was coming at them. A befuddled grin on his face, Jespar stretched out his hand, reaching for the ice.
　　Before his palm could touch it, he awoke.
---
　　“So, you’re telling us that Master Oonai has a parasite,” Enkshi said. “A brain parasite.”
　　They were gathered around the First Magnate’s bed. Ma’saa Oonai was by her husband’s side, holding his hand with a faraway look on her face. Jespar, Lysia, and Kawu, with mugs of steaming tea Kawu said would help with the dizziness, sat on chairs they’d moved over from a nearby table. Counselor Enkshi stood by the window, leaning against the sill. The shutters were open, and the fresh night air mingled with the smell of sickness and scented candles. When he awoke, Enkshi told them barely forty minutes had passed during the hours and hours they’d spent in the In-Between and Oonai’s dream.
　　“I’ve never encountered a dream-eater before,” Kawu said, “but that creature we saw inside the dream fits the description. So, yuz, I think your master is infected by a brain parasite.”
　　Enkshi snorted. “And here I thought things couldn’t get any more absurd.”
　　“Is it that absurd?” Lysia said. “If you ask me, a brain parasite causing hallucinations actually seems like a fairly grounded thing compared to supernatural comas, collective subconsciousnesses, and trips into other people’s dreams.”
　　Smiling faintly, Enkshi massaged his temples. “That’s one way to look at it.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai, who had remained silent while Kawu recounted the events, spoke up. “Very well, so a parasite is behind this. That’s both a relief and a shock.” Her eyes fixed on Kawu.
　　“Tell us what you know about it. What, by the gods, is a dream-eater, what is it doing to my husband, and, most importantly, how do we get it… out of him?”
　　Kawu’s eyes drifted off, the way they always did before he spoke, as if he were making room to carefully consider and reflect on every word first. “Death by dream-eater was an execution method,” he finally said. “One that the dreamwalkers of the Sakhi, the Makehu tribe that used to inhabit Uunil, performed. It was the highest form of capital punishment, which the Elders only administered for the most heinous crimes.”
　　Lysia rubbed her scar. “I didn’t know there were different tribes.”
　　“There were, but that was a long time ago. About, I believe, seven-hundred years before the colonization, eight of the ten tribes united, and that’s also when ‘death by dream-eater’ was abolished.”
　　“How come?” Ma’saa Oonai asked.
　　Kawu drank from his tea. “Because it was considered too cruel. Which leads me to your other question, Ma’saa Oonai: A dream-eater is a parasite that befalls humanoids, so, in other words, the races of Vyn. It enters its host through their nostrils or eyes, settles in their brains, and releases a secretion there that slowly plunges the host into a coma where it spins a perpetual nightmare to feed off their suffering.”
　　Enkshi turned away from the window. “Did you say, ‘feed off their suffering?’”
　　“I did. Negative emotions—pain, sorrow, fear, and anger—are to the dream-eater what blood is to a leech—that’s why it creates this ongoing nightmare, where it confronts the host with their worst traumas and fears. At the same time, the dream-eater’s secretions keep the host just alive enough for the brain to continue functioning. That symbiosis might go on for several months to a year, until the dream-eater’s secretion can’t keep the host alive any longer and they die.”
　　Noticing the look on Ma’saa Oonai’s face, Kawu lowered his eyes. “Forgive me for speaking so frankly.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai made a vague hand gesture. “It’s all right. You said the coma doesn’t happen right after the infestation, correct?
　　“Yuz.”
　　“Does it… does it also cause a change in personality?”
　　Hesitating, Kawu said, “…I believe so.”
　　“I see.” Ma’saa Oonai turned her face to her husband. Some of his long black hair hung into his face—she brushed it back behind his ears, several strands sticking to her fingers. She wiped her hand against the side of the bed. Then she turned back to Kawu, her expression strangely neutral.
　　“What I don’t understand—and please don’t misinterpret this as an accusation—is why you didn’t think of this sooner. From what you described, my husband’s symptoms fit perfectly.”
　　There was a pause before Kawu answered, “Admittedly, because the idea never even crossed my mind. As I said, dream-eaters are supposed to be extinct, and the only reason I know about them at all is because dreamwalkers still pass down the knowledge from generation to generation. When my mother told me, she said it as if it were just an old scare story.” He rubbed the back of his neck. When no one commented on this, Kawu continued, “Either way, I believe we digress. What matters now is that, evidently, some dream-eaters survived and one of them infected your husband.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai gave a weak nod. “You said that only a dreamwalker can put that parasite into a person, correct?”
　　“Not quite,” Kawu replied. “If I remember correctly, a dreamwalker is necessary for a controlled infestation, but only for the imprinting.”
　　“Imprinting?” Enkshi asked.
　　“Yuz— a dream-eater has to be imprinted upon a person before it’s set free, otherwise it would simply jump at the first potential host it finds. Think of it as a… a mental link between a human and the parasite, which binds the dream-eater to the human’s will and gives the human the ability to command it. According to my mother, the dreamwalkers performed the imprinting on themselves in most cases, because they were also the executioners, but in theory…”
　　“Anyone could have put that thing into Oonai’s head,” Lysia said.
　　Kawu nodded.
　　With a grim smile, Enkshi said, “Well, at least we have our answer. This ‘curse’ was an assassination attempt after all, just as we suspected.”
　　“And they want to see him suffer,” Ma’saa Oonai said, her eyes glassy. “It’s the only explanation, isn’t it? If the murderers’ goal was to simply kill my husband, they wouldn’t have needed this creature.”
　　“I suppose so,” Kawu said.
　　Enkshi walked over to a nearby table, poured himself a goblet of wine, and took a deep swig.
　　“Well, all the grotesqueness of this aside, the way I see it we at least know what to do now: we get that creature out of Master Oonai’s brain as fast as we can. Once that’s done, we can think about tracking down whoever is responsible.” He looked at Kawu. “How can we kill it?”
　　Kawu tugged at the collar of his tunic. “I’m afraid it’s complicated.”
　　“A lot of things are complicated; that doesn’t mean they can’t be done. Now, answer the question, how do we kill it? Just tell us what you need, and we’ll provide it, even if it’s the godsdamned scepter of Tyr.”
　　Kawu sighed. “I said it’s complicated because you have to get the dream-eater out of the host’s brain first before killing it, else it releases a toxin that severely damages all the tissue around it.”
　　“A self-defense mechanism,” Lysia said. “Then we need to remove it first?”
　　Shaking his head, Kawu said, “If you try to remove it forcefully, it releases the toxin as well.
　　To my knowledge, the only way to neutralize a dream-eater is through the imprinted. He or she needs to command it to leave the host’s brain.”
　　“How… how certain are you of all this?” Ma’saa Oonai said.
　　Kawu gave a weary shrug. “It’s what my mother told me. I might remember incorrectly, of course, or there might be another method that my mother wasn’t aware of, but that’s what the writings say. You need the imprinted.”
　　Lysia rubbed her chin. “In other words, the one who is trying to kill Oonai is the only one who can save him.”
　　“So it seems.”
　　“That’s… unfortunate.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai let go of her husband’s hand. “Well,” she said, “as Enkshi said, at least we know what to do now—that’s more than we had yesterday. Now all that remains to be done is to find the assassin as fast as we can and force him or her to end it.”
　　What sounded straightforward enough turned into a dead end when they realized that all they had were guesses. The most obvious theory, that the culprit was to be found within the ranks of the Scythe or its support network, quickly became problematic under scrutiny. First, how would the Scythe had gotten their hands on a dream-eater? Acquiring a creature that was supposed to be extinct and presumably only existed in the darkest depths of the black market would require a wealthy and influential patron—that the Scythe had such a patron was certainly a possibility, but unlikely considering that the Twins tried to abolish the concept of wealth all together. Second, if the Scythe had ever been close enough to infect Oonai with the dream-eater, a bug that after hatching was about the size of a fingernail, wouldn’t they have just killed him instead? Except for its symbolic value, there was nothing to gain from Oonai’s prolonged suffering. And, finally, would the Scythe have known that the coalition had been leaderless for months now, then why hadn’t they made their move already?
　　Of course, all of those questions could have an answer—but they made the theory a lot less likely.
　　“The way I see it,” Lysia said, leaning forward with her elbows resting on her knees, “the best way to narrow it down is to look for people who meet three criteria: One, they have the means.
　　Two, they had to have been in his immediate vicinity about three or four moons ago when the infection must have started. And, three, they want to see Oonai suffer, or, at least”—she flicked Ma’saa Oonai a contrite look—“don’t care if Oonai dies slowly.”
　　Kawu said, “How about one of the servants? They might not have the means themselves, but they could have acted under someone else’s orders and definitely were in Oonai’s vicinity.”
　　Enkshi shook his head. “Unlikely. The Blue Guard scrutinizes every cook, guard, and even cleaner thoroughly before Agaam even considers them for employment in the ziggurat. One sign of disloyalty toward the coalition or Oonai in the past, and they’re disqualified… not to mention that we only ever employ people with strong family bonds.”
　　“Who have a lot to lose,” Lysia said.
　　“Yuz. Though, of course, there are people who’d be willing to send their children to the grave if it serves their deluded ideals, so you’re right, we can’t dismiss the possibility. Sergeant M?adira did some questioning already a couple of weeks ago, but kept it vague, so I suppose we could try again.” He turned to Agaam, who, as always, stood silently in the back of the room.
　　“Can you arrange for everyone to be questioned?”
　　Agaam gave a nod in reply. “I’m also willing to answer any questions you might have, ma’sao.”
　　“If there’s one thing in the world that I’m certain of, Agaam, it’s your loyalty—and I believe I speak for both the ma’saa and myself.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai indicated assent.
　　“Thank you,” the old servant said.
　　Lysia rubbed her eyes. “Okay, but this isn’t enough. First of all, the questioning will take forever without a solid lead to go on. The least we need is a proper suspect, and, frankly, I think if anyone can give us a hint, it’s the two of you. I mean, can’t you think of anyone who would have both the motive and the means to do this? One of the other magnates, maybe, or a political enemy?”
　　Enkshi gave Lysia a sour smile, his teeth a perfect white against his sable skin. “Oh, yuz, I can think of a couple.” He paused. “Dozens, to be precise. Hundreds.”
　　“Now you’re exaggerating,” Ma’saa Oonai said.
　　“I wish I was, Nayima.” He downed the rest of his wine. “You know, Jaaros always tried to shield you from all this, but trust me when I say that there are as many people who despise him as there are people who revere him. If I gave ten people this cursed bug and presented Jaaros tied to a chair, five of them would infect him without batting an eyelash. Given recent developments, probably six or seven.”
　　“You’re exaggerating,” Ma’saa Oonai repeated.
　　“As I said, I wish I was.” Enkshi put the goblet down and walked back to the window. “The truth is, greatness always comes with friends and foes in equal parts. If you run a race, there can only be one winner, and, of course, some of the runners who don’t make it get bitter… that’s just in our nature.” Glancing at Kawu, Jespar, and Lysia, Enkshi hesitated. Then, he frowned. “If Jaaros made a mistake, then it was to think that gold makes good armor… It doesn’t. Sure, it glitters and shines and looks imposing, but while it might scare off some people, you’re still as vulnerable and frail underneath as the coinless beggar from the Stone District. Jaaros was just…
　　too confident, too careless, as if his power and wealth made him invincible. I always told him that, but he never listened. Now look where it got him.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai studied Enkshi throughout the entire monologue. Then, she almost imperceptibly shook her head and turned her eyes back to her husband.
　　Lysia cleared her throat. “Fair enough. So, in a nutshell, what you’re saying is that there are so many suspects that we might as well have none?”
　　“Yuz,” Enkshi said. “Not to mention that if we just start merrily interrogating coalition members, we might as well tell them the whole story. The moment we approach anyone whose word carries even a modicum of weight, we’d better be dead certain of that person’s guilt…
　　which, again, we can’t be before we have a lead to begin with.”
　　Jespar had spent most of the conversation listening in silence—not for lack of interest but because he still felt dead tired and dizzy from the hypnosis and the drug. The light headache just above the bridge of his nose didn’t make it any better. And yet, when Enkshi finished talking, something clicked—and the memory returned.
　　A house on a mountain, the sky purple and orange.
　　Jespar said, “Maybe we do have a lead.”
　　All eyes turned on him.
　　Ma’saa Oonai said, “I beg your pardon?”
　　Jespar sorted his thoughts. “Remember when I told you that, inside the dream, I tried to kill the parasite? Well, I just remembered that I saw something before I passed out.”
　　Lysia wrinkled her forehead. “You saw something?”
　　“Yeah, like… images, memories. Some of them were my own, others weren’t.”
　　“Others weren’t?” Enkshi asked. “What do you mean by that?”
　　“Well,” Jespar said, “I know how it sounds, but for that one moment when that dream-eater thing touched me, I felt like I was him. Like I was Jaaros Oonai.”
　　There was a short silence.
　　“Kawu?” Lysia said.
　　Kawu narrowed his eyes. “It’s… possible. The contact might have established a temporary link between Dal’Varek’s and the dream-eater’s brain.”
　　Jespar.
　　Ma’saa Oonai looked at Jespar, some of the exhaustion in her eyes now replaced by a cautious hope. “What exactly did you see?”
　　“A… house, I think. Some of kind of manor on a mountain.”
　　“K?ara Manor,” Ma’saa Oonai said.
　　“Cara what?” Lysia asked.
　　“I… it’s one of our properties, north of Uunil. What else, Ma’sao Dal’Varek?”
　　“Well,” Jespar said, “there was a woman. Your husband was talking to a woman, and they were walking through some kind of… hedge maze? I’m not sure.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai’s hand clutched the blanket. “What else?”
　　Jespar paused, trying to recreate the memory. Finally, he exhaled. “I don’t know… it’s all blurry. What I remember more than the actual images and the sounds are emotions. I felt angry, incredibly angry, and… ashamed.”
　　“That makes sense,” Kawu said. “The dream-eater feeds on the host’s suffering, so the images it showed must have been ones that Oonai’s mind connected to powerful negative feelings.”
　　Jespar’s throat went dry when some of the other memories he’d seen came back to him—not Oonai’s, but his own. It knows you, he thought.
　　It knows you.
　　“You… mentioned a woman?” Ma’saa Oonai asked.
　　Jespar nodded.
　　“Who was she? Did you see her face?”
　　“Not really. As I said, the actual images are all very obsc—” His headache swelled. He gasped and dropped back into his chair, hands pressed against his temples.
　　“Jespar?”
　　Slowly, the pain abated, and his vision refocused. Everyone was looking at him.
　　“Jespar?” Lysia repeated. “Are you all right?”
　　Good question.
　　Are you?
　　“…Yeah,” he said. “Yeah, I think so. Sorry, it’s still that droga.” He drank from his tea; the headache let off further, leaving him with a cloud of dizziness. From the corner of his eye, he noticed that Kawu was looking at him, eyes narrowed and slightly frowning.
　　“Anyway,” Jespar said, “concerning that woman, I’m afraid there’s not much more I can tell you. I just saw her silhouette.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai turned to Enkshi. “I don’t understand—that house must have been Ka?ra Manor, that much is clear, but who was that woman? One of the servants?”
　　A mistress, Jespar thought. Judging by the frown on Lysia’s face, she’d come to the same conclusion, but both kept quiet.
　　There was the briefest of hesitations before Enkshi replied, “I don’t know. Possibly some merchant he did business with? There are plenty of women in the coalition. But provided—”
　　Ma’saa Oonai held up a hand. “Hold on, I still don’t understand. If Jaaros went up there to do business with someone, why didn’t he tell me?”
　　Enkshi exhaled. “As I told you, I don’t know. Maybe there was a good reason he didn’t tell us, maybe he simply had secrets, even before us. As much as I hate to say it, Nayima, now is not the time to ponder that. What matters is that, if what the dreamwalker says is true and these were Jaaros’s actual memories, they might be connected to the incident—in which case, Dal’Varek is right and we do have a lead.” He turned to Agaam and said, “Talk to Sergeant M?adira and have her send a unit of guards to K?ara Manor. I want them to search it for clues as to that woman’s identity and question every single one of the serv—”
　　“No guards,” Ma’saa Oonai said. “Varroy and Dal’Varek will go, and Agaam will take them.”
　　Enkshi gave her a look that managed to be both patient and condescending. “Look, Nayima, I respect your… wishes as to Ma’sao Dal’Varek, but it’s past time we hand this over to someone who knows his craft.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai’s face hardened. “Maybe I didn’t make it clear enough. This is an order.”
　　“You’re being unreasonable. This—”
　　“Morala has sent this man to help us,” Ma’saa Oonai replied, her voice raised slightly. “And this woman has not given us a single reason to distrust her. They will go, and if you do as much as think about crossing my orders, you can go back to your Starling workshops and build prostheses.”
　　Only him being sent by Morala, and Lysia’s trustworthiness, probably weren’t the only reasons, Jespar realized. Or where they?
　　No.
　　What Ma’saa Oonai feared at least as much as Morala’s judgment was that the guards would find something in that manor, would find that her husband had had secrets, and couldn’t keep their mouths shut about it. Unreasonable? Perhaps.
　　But human.
　　Enkshi held her gaze for a moment longer then dropped his eyes. “Of course, Ma’saa, as you wish. Agaam, you heard it—you’ll take Varroy and Dal’Varek to the manor tomorrow. I’ll prepare the necessary paperwork so that the servants know you’re on official business.”
　　“Of course,” Agaam said.
　　With a joyless smile, Enkshi clasped his hands and turned to Jespar and Lysia. “Well, that’s settled. You’ll search Ka?ra Manor for clues as to what Master Oonai had been doing there and to the identity of that woman. Morala willing, that will give us enough information to track down the assassin and force him to release the parasite. As for you, Ma’sao Nākhani, I suggest you stay here until the matter is settled. We might need your services again.”
　　Hesitating, Kawu said, “I’d like to go with them.”
　　Ma’saa Oonai raised her eyebrows. “Why? You’re safer here.”
　　“I… I just think I should. Please, trust me.”
　　After a moment’s consideration, Ma’saa Oonai nodded. “As you wish. I will pray for you.”
　　Looking to Jespar and Lysia, she added, “For all of you.”
---
　　It must have been around midnight when Agaam guided them to their sleeping quarters. It was a wind-still night, the moon shining a pale light through the windows that mingled with the flickering shadows coming through the struts of Agaam’s lantern.
　　Their rooms were located in a secluded part of the ziggurat on one of the lower floors, and, as they walked past countless rooms, an odd realization crossed Jespar’s mind. For most of the year, all those rooms in the ziggurat stood empty.
　　Two hundred rooms, he thought. One king and a queen.
　　“Here we are,” Agaam said, stopping in front a row of lavishly ornamented but nondescript doors. “Each of you may choose a room. Would you like some dinner?”
　　Lysia and Jespar agreed, Kawu declined.
　　“Very well, I’ll send a maid to bring it up. Now, unless there’s anything else, I advise you go get some rest now. We have a long ride ahead of us tomorrow.”
　　He bowed and left. Before the old servant disappeared around the corner, Kawu wished them a good night and disappeared into one of the rooms. The key turned in the lock.
　　Lysia blew air through her lips. “Always so sociable, the boy. Crazy, isn’t it? A few hours ago, we were inside another person’s dream. Now we’re here, as though nothing happened.”
　　Except for that godsdamned headache, Jespar thought.
　　“Yeah.”
　　“Hey,” Lysia said, “you want to share a room? I could use some company.”
　　Jespar did too. And, still, when he was about to speak, the weight on his neck he’d first felt on the boat was back and all he longed for was the quiet of his chamber.
　　“I’d love to, but I’m still a bit woozy. Next time?”
　　“…Sure. Sure, no problem.”
　　Lysia squeezed his hand. Smiled.
　　Then, she went into her room, leaving him alone with the silence of the empty corridor.
　　Jespar expected luxury when he entered his quarters, and they didn’t disappoint. Polished mahogany paneling ran along the base of the white walls, embroidered carpets covered the stone-tiled floor. A bed large enough to accommodate three people stood at the left side of the room, windows opened into the tropical panorama that extended all around the ziggurat.
　　Jespar kicked off his boots and sat down on the bed. The weight on his neck was still there, and so was the headache—it felt odd, cold somehow. Ignoring the warning voice at the back of his head, he stuffed himself a pipe of nightflower, lit it, and took a deep drag.
　　The pressure on his neck eased off a little, but the headache remained.
　　A bit later, the servant girl knocked on his door and brought dinner. She must have been in her early twenties and was pretty, prompting Jespar’s droga-clouded mind to make some stupid comment about how her brown eyes reminded him of autumn in Enderal. It earned him a dutiful smile. Jespar shut up, avoiding eye contact while she served the food, then left. Though it looked delicious—a steaming rice dish, yellow soup, figs, and a sugary confection—Jespar only ate a spoonful of each and returned the tray with an apologetic look when the servant girl returned.
　　“Anything else, Ma’sao?” she said.
　　He thought, Company.
　　Why hadn’t he taken Lysia up on her offer?
　　You’re an idiot.
　　He said, “Would it be possible to run me a bath?”
　　The servant said it was and excused herself to prepare it. Half an hour later, Jespar lay in the bathroom’s ridiculously large marble basin, the hot water filling the air with steam and the smell of roses.
　　The headache stayed. Maybe, Jespar thought, t he nightflower pipe hadn’t been such a good idea after all.
　　“Ma’sao Dal’Varek, your cunning is unrivaled.” His voice reverberated from the high walls.
　　All he needed was some shut-eye. He’d certainly earned it, hadn’t he? After all, he’d spent hours in some messed-up nightmare spawned by a brain parasite, fled a room full of toddler-filled pig corpses, and killed a medicus in the process of disemboweling his employer.
　　“Just a normal weekday,” he said. A grin tugged at his lips, but it felt fake. With a deep breath, he closed his eyes and slid under water, letting the warmth enfold him.
　　He thought of Lysia and her lopsided smile.
　　Kawu and how warm his palm had felt on his forehead.
　　The burning manor and flayed corpses.
　　Jespar jerked upright.
　　The Corpse sat on the edge of the basin.
　　“Fuck! ”
　　Jespar started, smashing his elbow into the wall behind him. Pain exploded, shot up his arm, his shoulder, into his skull. His sight blackened.
　　This isn’t happening.
　　This isn’t happening.
　　His arm burning and his head spinning, Jespar opened his eyes.
　　The Corpse was still there. His yellow, dirty nails curled around a glass of wine. With a smile on his face, he raised it and toasted in Jespar’s direction. Then, he gulped it down in one long, continuous draw, his Adam’s apple bobbing up and down his rotten neck, the dark crimson liquid running down the corners of his mouth, his lips, his chin.
　　Little clouds of red formed in the water.
　　Jespar screamed.
#chapter Ten - White Vein Tempest
　　HE AWOKE. The water in the tub was lukewarm, the scent had evaporated. The nape of Jespar’s neck, resting on the stone rim of the basin, was stiff and hurt, just like H his shoulder wound under Lysia’s bandage. His hands were white and wrinkly.
　　The Corpse was gone.
　　A dream.
　　It had all been just a dream. He made a sound that was supposed to be a chuckle but came out as a moan and sent a shiver down his skin.
　　“Just a dream,” he repeated.
　　Right?
　　His limbs prickling from the hour he must have spent in the tub, he heaved himself out of the basin, and dried himself with the cloth the servant had provided. He dressed and went to the door. His palm already on the handle, he spotted the wine pitcher that had come with the dinner.
　　The servant had left it when she’d cleared the table after Jespar slid into the bath. After a moment’s hesitation, he went over to it and took a deep swig. Then he went to Lysia’s room, his hair still wet and the marble tiles cold under his bare feet.
　　He knocked five times before there was a reaction.
　　“…What?” a drowsy voice came from behind the door. “Who is that?”
　　“It’s me,” Jespar said. “Can I… can I come in?”
　　“It’s late.”
　　“Please?”
　　After a pause, sheets rustled, and feet shuffled. The key turned in the lock and the door opened.
　　“I thought you didn’t want—”
　　Before Lysia could finish, Jespar slid past her into the room, pressed the door shut, and turned the key. He went to a wingback chair in front of the window and slumped into it with a long sigh.
　　“Sorry,” he said. “Sorry, I just… I needed to. Did I wake you?”
　　“At the risk of bedazzling you, yes, you did.”
　　“Sorry,” he repeated. His eyes drifted off toward the chamber’s bathroom. The door was open, allowing a glimpse inside; it had the same design. “Sorry.”
　　Slowly, his unease alleviated a bit.
　　Lysia gave him a look normally reserved for escaped circus animals. “Stars burn me, Jespar…
　　are you okay?”
　　“No,” Jespar said. “I mean, yeah, I am, but, no, I’m not.”
　　Lysia crossed her arms over her white nightgown, whose golden embroidery suggested it was from the ziggurat’s wardrobe. “You smoked.” She sounded concerned rather than accusatory.
　　“And drank.”
　　“A bit, yeah, but that’s not it.”
　　Conflicting emotions crossed her face. Then she pulled up a chair, back facing Jespar, and sat on it with her arms resting on the top rail.
　　“All right. Tell me what happened.”
　　He did.
　　He told her about the headache and that lingering unease he’d been feeling ever since they’d returned from Oonai’s tuewa, told her about the dream in the bathtub, told her, as the first person since he’d left Enderal, about his recurring nightmare and about the “tragic accident” in his teenage years. He left out her or that evening he’d found her in their room, both wrists cut open.
　　When he was done, Lysia regarded him silently. Outside, some bird hooted. The air smelled sweet from the two bowls of lemongrass-scented water that sat on the windowsill to keep the mosquitoes out.
　　“Hold still for a moment, will you?” Lysia said. She reached out, placing her hand on his forehead. “Huh. Thought so.”
　　“What is it?”
　　“You’re running a fever. Not much, maybe two sparks above average, but that explains the headache.”
　　“Really?”
　　“Feel for yourself,” she said, guiding his palm next to hers. Her fingers were warm and dry.
　　Comforting.
　　She was right, his forehead was hot. Strangely enough, it felt the exact opposite, which was why he hadn’t noticed it himself.
　　“Must be that dream droga.”
　　“Probably.” She got up and walked to her knapsack, which leaned against the side of her bed, rummaged through it, and returned with a vial filled with green pellets. She took one and gave it to Jespar. “Here. If you’re not feeling any better by the morning, I’ll give you another one.”
　　“Thanks,” Jespar said. He poured Lysia and himself two goblets of water from a pitcher on a nearby bureau, took the pill, and washed it down. It left a bitter, earthy aftertaste.
　　“All right,” Lysia said, sitting back down and resting her arms on the top rail of the chair.
　　“Now, concerning the rest of what you told me. First, what you saw in the bathroom wasn’t real.
　　You know that, right? You were asleep and dreamed the corpse was there, but it wasn’t really.”
　　“Yeah. I know.”
　　“Good. Second, I know you’ve probably heard it a thousand times, but I’m genuinely sorry about what happened to your family. It’s… tragic. No idea how else to say it.”
　　And could have been avoided if someone hadn’t put his holy “ideals” before the life of his own fucking family.
　　A glassy expression in his eyes, Jespar waved his goblet dismissively. “We all have our burdens.”
　　“Maybe,” Lysia said, “but, still… And finally, as for that recurring dream… do you mind if I tell you a story? Be warned, I’m the protagonist.”
　　“Go ahead.”
　　“Okay.” She paused as if to sort her thoughts first. Pointing at her scar, she said, “Did you ever wonder how I got this?”
　　“As a matter of fact, I did. I just wasn’t sure if it’s a touchy subject, so I didn’t ask.”
　　Lysia smirked. “A true gentleman. Well, brace yourself… I got hit by lightning.”
　　“Are you serious?”
　　“Yeah. Back when I was twelve.”
　　“How… how did that happen?”
　　“While I was out gathering herbs with a Sister, the only other novice my age. You have to know that the monastery of the White Leaf is on the eastern coast of Mel?y, the ‘warmest part,’
　　which in Mel?yan terms just means it’s tundra—wide open space with shrubs as far as the eye can see.” She traced her index finger along the edge of her goblet. “Anyway, while we were on our way back—it must have been early afternoon—a storm came up, and the monastery was still a good hour’s walk away. Mel?yans have a word for those sudden storms, you know? ‘White Vein Tempest.’ The name comes from how the sky looks like a web of illuminated, white-blue veins when the lightning bolts come crashing down one after another. It’s… haunting.” Lysia shivered. “Could you…?” she said, indicating at the shutters. Jespar stood, closed them, then sat back down.
　　“Thanks,” Lysia said. Something about her voice was different, gone was the huskiness, gone was the energy. She sounded flat and quiet. “Where was I? Right, the storm. We looked for cover, a wind bed or something, when the clouds drew together, but there was none, just plains and shrubs as far as the eye could see. Before we knew it, it was pouring buckets and the thunder was rolling… my Sister told me to get down on my haunches and put my head between my knees to make myself as small as possible, and I did, but then everything went black.”
　　“The lightning hit you.”
　　Lysia nodded. A faraway look came to her face. “Yeah. I was in a coma for three weeks, my brain practically dead. And when I finally woke up again, it didn’t happen bit by bit as it usually does, but all at once. There I was, back in the world of the living… and not only was I still alive, I was completely unscathed except for—” she flourished her hand down the scar— “this lovely piece of art imprinted into my skin. It’s where the electricity traveled down my body.” She looked up, but when her gaze locked with Jespar’s, she immediately averted her eyes.
　　Ashamed, Jespar realized. She’s ashamed.
　　“Actually, it looks pretty good,” he said.
　　“Sure.”
　　“No, I mean it. It has that… roguish adventurer look. Goes along well with the temper.”
　　A faint smile tugged at the corners of Lysia’s mouth. “Uh-huh. Well, I’ll take your word for it.
　　Anyway—according to the sisters, the fact that I survived White Vein lightning was nothing next to a miracle, and they told me so over and over while they ran all manner of tests on me, almost as if they were hoping to find some kind of newly-awakened magical talent or something.” Lysia shrugged. “Turned out there was nothing, and, three weeks later, I was back to tending the gardens and cleaning scalpels again. Life just went on as it had before.”
　　“But…?”
　　Lysia hesitated. “Remember when I told you why I left the monastery?”
　　“Because you believe one has to see the world to heal it, and because you want to ‘live like a god, love like an eagle, and dream like a madman.’ Or something like that.”
　　This time she gave her husky laugh, making Jespar grin. The memory of the Corpse in the bathroom was still there but it had faded, at least a little.
　　“Something like that. Thing is, that wasn’t all. Another reason was a nightmare I kept on having after the incident.”
　　“A nightmare,” Jespar said.
　　“Yes. It wasn’t about the strike itself,” she said, “but about that night three weeks after I woke up from my coma. Even now, I still remember it as though it were yesterday. It was early evening but already dark, and the Sister overseeing the infirmary had gone to do her rounds. I woke up on a stone slab, like the ones they put you on for dissection. As you can imagine, I was scared out of my bones… I got up from the slab, barefoot, freezing, and still woozy, and wandered through the monastery crying for help. In reality, it must have been just a couple of minutes before one of the Sisters found me, comforted me, and wrapped me in a blanket with a cup of hot chocolate before she woke up the other Sisters to tell everyone that a miracle had happened.”
　　“But that’s not what happens in the dream,” Jespar said.
　　“Exactly. You see, the White Leaf has a tradition. When a Sister dies, the order doesn’t bury her body but keeps it in the monastery to dissect and study it. It makes sense, of course—they dedicate their lives to advance medicine, so why shouldn’t they also dedicate their dead bodies to it? However, it also means that the monastery’s morgue is always packed with the cadavers of patients and Sisters, all embalmed and cut open in various ways. Some have no skin, some lack a limb, and so on, and so forth.”
　　Jespar scratched his neck. “Spooky.”
　　“Mh-hm. Either way, in that nightmare, Little Lysia wakes up on the stone slab, is scared out of her bones, and wanders alone through the hallway. But, somehow, here she ends up at the stairs leading down into the morgue.” She brought her goblet to her lips as if to drink, hesitated, then put it back down. “Stars burn me,” she said, “it’s been ages since I’ve talked to someone about this.” “I can relate.” They shared a smile. It felt good, connected. “Anyway, suddenly, these white, dead faces appear in the darkness at the bottom of the staircase. The dead Sisters, their heads shaved and embalming fluid running over their lips and out of their orifices. They stare at her but there’s no malice in their eyes—on the contrary, their faces look almost… benevolent, I guess. Friendly. And then they speak.” “What… what do they say?” “Just two words: ‘Welcome home.’” Lysia paused. “Little Lysia tries to run, but she can’t move her legs, as though there’s ice running through her veins instead of blood. She tries to scream, but her throat is frozen, and she notices how cold she feels, and that there’s a foul, rotten stench coming from her own skin. The cadavers slowly walk up the stairs, and they smile, and Little Lysia don’t know why, but something about the way they smile makes her think of mothers reuniting with their lost daughters. Then, one of the Sisters, who has no skin on her face, takes Little Lysia by her hand and Little Lysia goes with her. She doesn’t want to, of course— she’s so terrified she feels like she’s about to choke, but her feet just move on their own.” Lysia let out a breath and put her goblet back on the table. Though her face was strangely blank, the fingers of her right hand clawed into her left arm and she kept on bouncing one of her legs up and down. “So, they lead her down into the morgue and there are those sarcophagi in rows that the Sisters always keep cold with magic to store the bodies in, and there’s that bitter, clean, pungent smell everywhere. Then they put Little Lysia into one of them and close the lid.” “…Shit.” “Yeah. But do you want to know the scariest part?” “What?” “Little Lysia doesn’t mind. Of course, she’s horrified, of course she hammers her fists against the lid, but then, gradually, she starts to feel comfortable… at peace, you could say. Because she finally realizes that this is where she belongs.” Jespar didn’t reply. “In a coffin,” Lysia said. “She should be in a coffin because that bloody lightning should have killed her just as the Sisters kept on telling her.” After a brief silence, Jespar said, “But you survived. You know that, right? You survived.” Lysia gave him a joyless smile. “Of course I know. I’m not superstitious, and I’m not mad. But, still, to this day, there’s a tiny part in the depths of my brain that seems convinced that I’m not, and that all this—” she made an all-encompassing gesture— “is just a great charade. Some trick my mind plays on me to fool me into believing I survived.” Her features relaxed, and the glassy look disappeared from her eyes. She took a hair tie from a pocket in her nightgown and put her hair in a ponytail. “Wow,” she said, “that got heavy. As I said, I know I’m alive as can be, and I’m not mad, but to get to the point I’m trying to make, to this day, I believe I might have ended up a lunatic if I had ignored what the dream was trying to tell me, irrational as it may have been.” Jespar licked his lips. “Which was…?” “That had I stayed in the monastery, I could never beat that irrational, subconscious fear that the dream was right after all. I just…” She let out a long breath. “I needed to leave… I needed to live.” “You needed to prove to yourself you weren’t dead.” Lysia smiled, but her eyes didn’t follow her lips. “Gods, now you’re making it sound a touch theatrical. But, yeah, at one point, my adolescent, dramatically inclined mind might have had that thought. Which leads me to the moral of the story. I’m not an expert on matters of the mind, and I’m not a ‘dreamwalker,’ but, maybe, just maybe, that dream is trying to tell you something too. And, maybe, once you find out what that is and act upon it, it will stop coming—just as mine eventually stopped.” A thousand thoughts shot through Jespar’s head, but, somehow, he couldn’t articulate any of them—or didn’t want to. “I’ll think on it,” he said instead. “Thank you. For sharing this, I mean.” “You’re welcome.” A long silence ensued. They both studied the contents of their goblets. Jespar cleared his throat. “Do you… do you mind if I belatedly take you up on your offer? And stay?” For some reason, the question seemed to catch Lysia off guard. She opened her mouth as if to reply then closed it again. “Okay,” she said after a while. “You can stay.” “Thank—” “Under one condition.” Jespar scrunched up an eyebrow. “Okay?” “The boy. I hate to bring this up, but… what do you feel for him?” “Kawu?” Lysia nodded. “I’m not sure what you mean.” “Pretty sure you do,” Lysia said. “I saw the way you were looking at him. And vice versa, I might add.” Following an awkward silence, Lysia gave a long exhale. “Okay, Jespar, let me be frank: I like you. More than I expected.” “Oh.” “Is that a problem?” “No, it’s just… what happened to ‘just fun’ and ‘no strings attached’?” Lysia shrugged. “I guess my feelings changed. I mean, don’t get me wrong, I wasn’t lying back then… I did want fun, nothing more, nothing less. And, even now, I’m not entirely sure how I feel for you. Stars burn me, we’ve known each other for how long, four days?” “Three.” “There you have it—hardly qualifies as an affair. But, still, for some reason, I feel… drawn to you, cheesy as it may sound, and there are aspects about your behavior that confuse me. Now, please, don’t give me that look. You know what I mean. Ever since we’ve returned from Yuva, you’ve become… distant. Erratic.” “I’m a complex man.” It was supposed to lighten the mood, but sounded awkward when he said it, almost sulking. “No argument there,” Lysia said. “Look, I’m aware we barely even know each other and, as we don’t have any kind of commitment to each other, you can obviously do as you please. All I’m saying is that, considering this unexpected shift in my feelings, I’m not sure if I want to be a part of that. Which is why I suggest this: We can continue this mission as professionals, as friends, or as whatever else you want to call that other thing between us. The latter, however, only under the condition that we’re making this exclusive. Not because I’m possessive, not because I want to put a sword to your chest, but simply because this mission is crazy enough as it is, and I don’t have the nerve and energy to compete for your affection in some love triangle with a brooding psychic. So…” She opened her palms. “Do you want to pursue this or not? I’m not saying this to force you into something you don’t want, Jespar, and I’m not going to be angry if you’d rather keep things friendly. All I’m asking for is honesty.” For a couple of breaths, Jespar said nothing, expecting that invisible weight in his neck to return. To his surprise, it didn’t. Instead, the warmth he’d felt that first night on the ship was back, like a campfire after a long march through mud and rain. Of course, that wasn’t all. The second reason he didn’t want to leave, why he wanted to be close to her, was that the idea of returning to his chambers and crawling under his bedsheets alone, constantly glimpsing at the bathroom door where only 1 小时之前 a visitor from another plane of reality had sat, turned his stomach. A dream, Jespar thought. It was just a dream. He said, “Okay.” “Okay?” “Yeah. You’re right, I guess I have been acting erratically, and I’m sorry for not being upfront with you. And, it’s true, there is something about Kawu that I feel drawn to, but I’m not going to pursue it.” “Look, I don’t want to force—” He placed his hand on hers. “Lysia, I want this. Okay? I…” He exhaled. “It was more than just sex to me that night, too, and I want this thing between us to continue… whatever it is, could be, or will be.” After the briefest of hesitations, Lysia smiled. “Good—thanks for being upfront.” She chuckled, shook her head. “My, that was probably the most civilized discussion about a love affair I’ve ever had “Now that you say it, I kind of missed the shouting and the vase-hurling, to be honest.” Lysia grinned. “Maybe next time. Well, now that that’s out of the way, how about we make sure we catch whatever sleep the night has left?” They didn’t get much. Sex was the last thing Jespar had expected or even wanted when he’d knocked at her door 1 小时之前, but when they slipped under the blankets and Lysia cuddled up next to him, it wasn’t long before the comfortable warmth in his belly traveled downward. He gently pulled her closer and began stroking her hair. They kissed. One thing led to another. Later, they lay next to each other, sweat beading on her skin, their breath fast and shallow. Lysia heaved a pleased sigh and rolled over to kiss him again, her lips warm, soft, and salty, the strands of her loose brown hair brushing over his skin. Jespar kissed down the length of her neck, her chest, her nipples. She ran her fingers through his hair and muttered something. Jespar glanced up. “Did you say something?” Lysia lay back down, resting her head on his chest. “Just that I’m glad.” She traced her finger over his navel, drawing lazy circles. “That you’re staying.” Smiling, Jespar closed his eyes. “The feeling’s mutual.”
#chapter Eleven - The Big Dream LYSIA, JESPAR, AND KAWU BROKE FAST in a lavish dining room near their sleeping quarters. Feeble predawn light filtered through the windows, mingling with the glow L of the candles. While neither Lysia nor Jespar were talkative, Kawu barely spoke and didn’t lift his eyes from the plate while he ate. The moment he scooped up the last of his meal—he never left as much as a single grain of rice, kernel of corn, or fruit seed—he excused himself and left. Lysia let out a breath when the door fell shut behind him. “You really aren’t feeling it, are you? That… aura?” Jespar shook his head. The sun was a faint red sliver along the horizon when they met Agaam outside. He led them to the stables, where a servant boy finished saddling the last of four horses—black Skarragian cliffroamers, probably worth a fortune each. Morning birds chirped in the trees, flies and mosquitoes harried the group to scavenge some last drops of blood before daylight. Agaam gave the boy a coin then dismissed him. When they were about to mount their horses, Enkshi came hurrying up to them. He wore a plain blue robe and no jewelry. Shadows hung under his eyes, salt and pepper stubble showed on his cheeks and head. Panting, he came to a halt. “Wait.” Agaam dropped the reins and bowed. “Ma’sao Enkshi.” Enkshi acknowledged him with a nod. He seemed about to speak then sighed and massaged his eyes with the heels of his hands. “There’s something we should talk about before you leave. Follow me.” He led them into a room on the twenty-first floor, two levels below the top where Jaaros and Nayima Oonai resided. The big room was walled by ceiling-high bookshelves, each filled to the brim. Enkshi sat behind a massive black desk packed with scrolls and papers, but tidy. He didn’t offer them a chair. “There are two things you should know before you set out. The first concerns Ma’sao Oonai: He wasn’t faithful to his wife.” Shock of shocks, Jespar thought. “So he had a mistress.” “No,” Enkshi said, “not a mistress in the classic sense of the word. He had… diversions. Several, in fact.” Seeing the expression on Lysia’s, face Enkshi frowned. “Look, I know how it sounds, but there’s no need to get all indignant. Jaaros, Master Oonai, he loves his wife, that’s as certain as the next sunset. Those women he takes up to Ka?ra Manor with him are just… dalliances. A respite from the travails of daily life here in the city.” Lysia said, “Respites that Ma’saa Nayima knows nothing about, I assume.” Enkshi shook his head, looking annoyed, even sulky, as if there was something inherently unjust about him needing to have this conversation in the first place. Kawu spoke up. “Could the woman from Dal’Varek’s vision be one of these ‘dalliances’?” “It’s possible, that’s why I’m telling you this. But, before you ask, no, I don’t know who he was with the last time he went up, because he kept that part of his life private… even from me. Still, we shouldn’t jump to conclusions. Even if one of Jaaros’s women is involved in this matter, she wouldn’t have had the means to buy the parasite. Also, if what you said about the period from infestation to coma being several weeks to a couple of months is true, it can’t have happened up in the manor. As I said, the last time he was there was at the beginning of Drought, around six moons ago.” “In other words,” Jespar said, “if one of his affairs is behind this, she must have had support.” “Correct.” After an interval of silence, Enkshi nodded. “Well, there’s that. The second matter doesn’t really change anything about our plan of action, but I believe you should know either way: Last night, when you were already asleep, we received a report from General Duul. Not only has the Scythe doubled in numbers, they are actively spreading the rumor in the city that Master Oonai is dead.” “You think they know?” Lysia said. “Either that or they are gauging our reaction. If we go after the gossipers too harshly, that’s also an answer, isn’t it? No, Oonai needs to make a public appearance, and he needs to do so soon, otherwise the have-nots will believe the rumor and flock to the Scythe’s recruiters like bees to their queens. Not to mention that the coalition is also starting to get nervous—Third Magnate Vel’Nyx has even sailed to Qyra under the pretense of some business matter, and the second magnate has requested an audience with Ma’sao Oonai as soon as possible.” “The magnates must know something is amiss by now, don’t they?” asked Jespar. “I mean, how long has it been since Oonai was last seen in public? Moons?” “Oh, they’ve known that something is ‘amiss’ for a while now, of course. Just not what, exactly. Either way, there’s no point in continuing this conversation—what it comes down to is that we need answers, and we need them fast.” They left the ziggurat, taking a path along the eastern cliff of Mount Uunil, the city a kaleidoscope of structures, colors, and bustling crowds passing by beneath them. By sunrise, they had descended into the jungle that made up the eastern side of the island, following a barely-paved path instead of the main road to avoid unnecessary attention. Scattered rays of sunlight broke through the scintillating canopy over their heads, and the air was heavy with the smells of heat and growth and rot. Following Lysia’s advice, Jespar took two more of Lysia’s herbal pellets at their first break. A precaution, she said. Despite the sweltering heat, his fever was next to gone. Three hours later, they reached the eastern coast, an oddly-shaped stretch of brown rocks and scattered green, perforated by the occasional lagoon. Narrow strips of land ran between the rocks and the lagoons. “The Mandibles,” Agaam explained. “One of the two land bridges connecting the southern part of Uunil to the north.” Having crossed it, Jespar was surprised to realize just how much northern Uunil differed from the south. The southern half of the island was a carpet of trees, with only an occasional clearing for a village, town, or plantation on the eastern coast, and the white metropolis of Uunil-Y?r running along the entire west coast. The north, on the other hand, was a hilly, sparsely populated expanse of trees and grass mostly turned yellow by the long dry season. Only a few other travelers crossed their path on the way inland, and they passed no more than two settlements, one near a rice terrace, the other built around a colossal jade mine. It must have been early afternoon when they stopped in a tavern at a wide crossroads. It was packed with travelers, the smells of fried plantains, rice, and spices wafting through the sticky, humid air and mingling with swirls of gray and violet smoke that rose from pipes of tobacco and nightflower. On a round stage amid the tables, a woman plucked away at a lyre, accompanied by a man playing a reed pipe. A couple of heads turned to Jespar and the others when they entered, looking at his white-blond hair for a breath or two then quickly returning their attention to their meals, drinks, and conversations. Agaam led them to table in the corner where they sat and signaled for the innkeeper. A skinny woman with a pointy nose and light brown hair—a rare sight among Kiléans—came and took their orders. When it was Agaam’s turn, the old servant’s face was frozen, his eyes seeming to stare right through the woman. “Ma’sao?” the waitress asked. Agaam looked up. “Yuz?” “What do you want?” Agaam made his order. “Are you all right?” Jespar asked Agaam when the waitress scurried back to the kitchen. A breath passed before the old servant replied, “Just tired.” He smiled. “It’s been a long two days.” Understatement of the century. They ate their food, making conversation about the gods and the world, but avoiding the topic of their mission, both what had happened in Oonai’s dream and what lay ahead. When he’d finished his meal, Jespar went out to relieve himself. Clouds had formed, covering the afternoon sky like a threadbare curtain. He buckled his trousers. Pain exploded. It filled his entire skull, tinting the world blue-white. Jespar staggered, almost fell, caught himself on a nearby palm. As fast as it had come, the pain stopped and went down to a dull afterglow, cold smoke filling his brain. For some heartbeats, Jespar did nothing. His breath came heavy and ragged, bile tickled in his throat, blood ran down his chin from a lip he had bit open. What the hell? He hadn’t smoked, he hadn’t drunk, he hadn’t consumed any obscure Makehu drogae, so what on Vyn was happening to him? A thought manifested on the bottom of Jespar’s mind, but it vanished before he could— Or wanted to? —grasp it. “The fever,” he said. “That godsdamned fever.” Wiping blood and sweat from his chin, he went back inside. When his hand touched the door handle, Jespar froze. Inside, over the sounds of the crowd and the music, people were shouting at each other, and judging by the tone of their voices, it was about more than just a spilled bowl of rice wine. There was a thump, and one of the voices ceased. Jespar entered. Three men dressed in peasant’s clothes were gathered around a table at the far end of the room. Between them sat a woman and a scrawny man, whom one of the peasants, unusually tall, held by the back of his hair, the man’s face pushed into a bowl of stew. For some reason, Jespar recognized the tall peasant not by his chalk white skin and hair or his pointed ears but rather by the weapon strapped onto his back: a double-bladed polearm. The White Twins. Twin, that was. The Aeterna’s sister was nowhere to be seen. By now, the drummer and the lyrist had stopped playing, and all eyes were on the scene unfolding before them. The woman looked horrified, but sat still as a sculpture, her eyes bloodshot and sheening. “— doesn’t anyone help us? Saaras’Jodule, someone.” Just like the man’s, her clothes were to the peasants’ garb what diamonds were to pebbles: fine leather, silk, jewelry. Moneyed aristocracy. “Good question,” the White Brother said, letting go of the nobleman’s hair. His head flopped into the bowl, tipping it over and spilling stew all over the table and his tunic. The White Brother fixed his red eyes into the crowd. “Why, indeed, don’t you help them?” There was silence. “Why?” Again, no answer. Jespar flicked a glance at his group. Kawu sat still, watching with apprehension. Lysia’s lips were a white line. Agaam seemed as controlled as always, though Jespar imagined a trace of grim alertness in his face. “That’s right,” the White Brother said, turning back to the woman. His In?l was perfect, without the trace of an accent. “No one’s helping you because no one here gives a shit. Must feel strange, huh? To be on the receiving end of the whip for a change?” The woman stared at him. “Please,” she said. “Please don’t do this. We’ll give you whatever you want.” A grin split the White Brother’s face. “Words… You still think they can save you. Well, I get it, it’s what you’re used to after all. Words are what your lies are made of, words are what you use to control us, words are the clay you form your stories with, words are what we suck up like toddlers do the milk from their mothers’ teat.” He turned his face back to the crowd. “The Big Dream,” he said, voice raised. “That’s their favorite story, you know? ‘We’re the architects of our own fortune,’ ‘chances, not obstacles,’ and so on and so on, the fairy tale that all of us, regardless of where we come from, can one day afford our own house in the Jade District if only we work hard enough.” He sighed, gaze drifting off into middle distance. “Ah, yuz… the Big Dream. What a nice story, isn’t it? Uplifting, you might say. Empowering.” His eyes snapped back. “Pity that the storytellers always forget to point out the problem.” He grabbed the woman by her topknot, yanking her face up so she was forced to look at him. She gasped, then broke into a sob. “The dream is rotten . ” A long pause. “Imagine a baker. Like most people, he’s a Big Dreamer, and he has his own bakery in the Stone District. Nothing remarkable, good, honest work. In one day, he can bake fifty loaves, enough for him to feed himself and his family and not to be what we all fear to become: coinless.” He held up his index finger. “But,” he continued, “the people like his loaves so much that, one day out of two, he finds himself running out of loaves by midday and customers leave disappointed. He doesn’t want that, so what does he do? Right: He hires two helpers so he can produce one-hundred and fifty loaves a day. “This works out well until, one day, the baker has a realization: Even with the helpers, selling the loaves at the price he currently does only brings him a bit more coin than it costs him to produce them. He has already raised the prices to a point where raising them any more would scare his customers off. In other words: he is trapped.” The White Brother took a step forward, palms up. “But then the scales fall from his eyes. Why doesn’t he simply pay his helpers a little less? Yuz, they might quit, but, let’s be honest, there are hundreds, thousands of hard-working Kiléans on the streets who would jump at the chance, aren’t there? So, one day, he breaks the bad news, and his helpers accept it. With a regretful but triumphant smile, the baker counts his earnings three months later and finds that cutting the wages brought him enough profit to open a second bakery across town within a year, if he puts it on the side and cuts some more expenses— cheaper grain, maybe; who’ll notice the difference? And why not let his new helpers work for an hour longer each day?” Once again, the White Brother let his eyes drift across the room. This time they passed Jespar, but if the Aeterna recognized him, he didn’t show it. “Doesn’t sound so bad, does it? No, of course not, because you all think that you could be the baker in that story. And, yuz, who knows, maybe you could, but no matter how you look at it, one truth will never change: We can’t all be bakers. If we were, where would be the helpers?” He paused, letting his words take effect. “The dream…” he said. “is rotten. Its very nature is rooted in exploitation, greed, and inequality, and there’s only room for so many Big Dreamers in each telling of the story. We’re the helpers, we’re the coinless kazuums they look down on, we’re the have-nots. And trust me, my friends, they know it. There they sit in their palaces, doing nothing, while we bake their bread for them, fourteen hours a day, breaking our backs, working our hands bloody and still earning just enough to keep our children from starving! We’re not people to them, we’re material, but in their eyes, we deserve it because we’re responsible for our own misery, because we just didn’t dream big enough, because we’re too lazy, too weak, too dumb! But are we, really? What about the man forced to spend all the money he earns on caring for his sick mother? What about the woman who loses everything in a hurricane and is too old to start over? What about the miner who toiled for years only to lose his legs in a rockslide, what about the feebleminded, the disabled? Godsdammit, what about those who fate or chance simply didn’t favor? ‘Coinless,’ the leeches say, ‘lazy,’ they say, not worthy of a life in dignity!” The White Brother turned back to the woman, eyes seeping with hate. “Isn’t that right? That’s what you think when you sit in your manor that you built on our backs, drink the wine you tapped from our veins, chew the meat you ripped from our bones, eat the fat you sucked from our marrow! And then you laugh because we, the helpers, the proles, the ‘have-nots’ are too stupid to even realize it!” When the woman didn’t answer, he smashed his fist down on the table. “I asked you a fucking question!” The woman jerked. “You… you don’t even know us,” she finally managed. A mirthless smile split the White Brother’s lips. “Vaalos, remind me. Who are they?” One of the other peasants spoke up, a bearded man with pockmarked skin. “Dijaam and Katros Vel’Doran. Owners of the biggest armory in the archipelago, which supplies the Blue Guards.” “Why, would you look at that,” the White Brother said, leaning in on the woman. “You really dreamed big, didn’t you? How foolish of you to come here without a proper escort.” “We never did any harm, Ma’sao,” the woman said. “Never. We never exploited anybody.” “Do you know what my sister did to the last leech she got her hands on? She cut off his eyelids so that he couldn’t choose to be blind whenever he wanted to. I must admit, I like the idea. Brutal, but poetic.” The White Brother let go of her head, and the woman sunk down into her chair with a sob. She buried her face in her arms. Do something, a voice within Jespar said. Another one replied: Are you crazy? He’d seen how the White Brother could fight. Even without his sister, there was no chance Jespar could stand his ground against him in one-on-one combat, much less against all three of them. The first voice said, He’s going to mutilate her. Not your battle, the other retorted. Not your battle. In the end, the White Brother made the decision when he broke into a wide grin. “Well, guess what, today’s your lucky day. I know that you and your husband are indeed among the better leeches out there, if such a thing even exists, so I merely want you to pass on a message.” He put his hand on the noblewoman’s shoulder and leaned closer, like someone consoling a friend, the tips of his long white hair brushing the top of the woman’s head. “Could you kindly do that for me?” The noblewoman muttered a reply. “Good. I want you to go home and tell each of your slave-driving friends that the stupid have-nots have finally woken up and that they are godsdamned angry. Tell them that we’re on the cusp of a new order, and that no one, not even the First Magnate and his army of blue clowns is going to stop us. Tell them to pack whatever they can and flee, because once the revolution starts, there will be no more mercy for the likes of you. “Tell them we’re going to start a fire.” He straightened his back, drew a knife, and cut the fat purse from the woman’s husband’s belt, then he held out his hand to her. “Please?” Fingers trembling, the woman handed over her purse. To the innkeeper, the White Brother said, “Their cargo and horses are yours to keep, but give them mules in exchange. They have to get to the city somehow.” “… Yuz. Of course, Ma’sao.” Smiling, the White Brother turned back to the woman. “What is it? Are you going to offer us a cup of rice wine next, or are you going to grab your leech husband and get the fuck out of here?” Mumbling something under her breath, she heaved herself out of her chair, grabbed her husband under the armpits and dragged him out of the tavern. Minutes went by until the door finally fell shut behind them. Everyone turned to the White Brother, who had been watching the process without blinking. He tossed the two purses to the maid with the chestnut hair, who managed to catch one of them. The other one hit the counter, sending a shower of coins clattering across the grease-stained old floorboards. “Free meals and drinks for everyone,” the White Brother said. Then, to the crowd: “I’m counting on you.” With that, the Scythes left. The silence in the tavern stretched on a minute longer, as if the Aeterna’s presence had left an echo that needed to fade first before normalcy could reinstate itself. Then a woman cheered. Someone else joined in, and soon, half the tavern roared. Arms crossed, Jespar looked over to his companions. Lysia watched the hubbub with a wary frown, Kawu sat hunch-backed, arms folded around his chest as if to shield himself from cold. Jespar returned to the table, where they finished their drinks, paid for their food, and left.
#chapter Twelve - When All This Is Over THEY RODE THROUGH THE AFTERNOON HEAT, following a path winding along the eastern coast. To their left, the jungle extended inland in garish colors, backdropped by Mount T K?ara and its waveform ridges; to their right, waves crashed against the sunbaked cliffs. Mosquitoes stirred in the heat, circling Jespar, waiting for an unwary moment. “May I ask you something, Agaam?” Jespar asked after a period of riding in silence. The old servant turned his head. “Ma’sao?” “What are your thoughts on what that Aeterna said? You know, the leeches, the helpers, the dreamers?” “What does it matter, ma’sao?” “I’m just curious. You’ve served him for decades, so you must have an opinion.” Which you’re most likely not going to tell me. To Jespar’s surprise, Agaam gave him a hollow smile. “It’s a story.” Lysia pulled up her horse, falling into a canter beside Jespar. “What do you mean by that?” “I mean,” Agaam said, “that both the coalition and the White Twins use only parts of the truth and reassemble them into a story that serves their purpose. Every moneyed aristocrat or Coalition member knows there’s injustice in the system, but they ignore it, and the Twins do the same thing. Certainly, they are correct to point out that there is limited room for ‘big dreamers’ in Kilé, but at the same time, they ignore that the idea of complete ‘equality’ as they evangelize it, has always been problematic, to say the least—ever since we civilized races came into existence, it has been in our nature to struggle and compete. Not to mention that the Light-Born would never accept a reign of the Scythe if their coup, riot, or whatever they envision to take control were to work. Of course, they tell their followers none of this because they, too, sell a story.” Jespar, who had expected a terse, noncommittal answer, found himself short of words. “If both ideas are unjust,” Lysia asked, “then what’s the answer?” After a moment’s consideration Agaam replied, “I don’t know, Ma’sae. But I believe this country has seen enough suffering and the way to make it better shouldn’t be through violence, as the Scythe envisions it.” They crossed a small bridge over a river from the mountains, the dusk sun creating diamond-like reflections in the water. Jespar was ready to let the conversation rest when Kawu spoke up behind them. “Whatever that Aeterna said—he doesn’t mean it.” All eyes fell on him. “How so?” Jespar asked. Lowering his gaze, Kawu continued, “Everything about him is a lie, and most likely his twin sister is no different. He uses all the right words, but he doesn’t mean them, he claims to be a savior but doesn’t care about the people because his soul is ultimately empty.” “I don’t follow,” Lysia said. “It’s hard to explain. In Makehu, we have a word for people like him: sawahe, which I suppose could be translated as ‘soul-dead.’ About one in ten thousand children is born this way, and their minds function differently from ours—they don’t feel compassion, they don’t take pleasure in the things normal people do, and their tuewas are black voids. They crave to inflict suffering, you could say, the same way we crave food or drink.” Jespar said, “That sounds… grim. How do you know the Twins are like that?” Shortly, Kawu seemed uncertain. A green bird with a red beak swooped past them and disappeared in the foliage. “Because my uncle was sawahe. And the way that Aeterna talked, acted, and that look in his eyes… it was my uncle all over again.” “So you’re saying the White Twins are impostors?” Lysia asked. “At least the man, yuz.” “Huh. Then why did they form the Scythe? Because they want, what, a giant bloodbath?” Kawu considered. At last, he said, “It’s possible.”
--- After one more hour of leisurely canter along the coast, the path branched off left into the jungle and toward a gentle slope that marked the beginning of the long ascent to Mount Ka?ra, a reclining, hump-backed giant whose highest ridges disappeared in violet clouds. As afternoon slowly turned into dusk, Jespar’s fever made a brief reappearance, but it abated after Lysia gave him three more pellets. In the jungle, the path got wilder, with storm-felled trees and virulently growing ferns with dagger-shaped leaves obstructing the path. They’d met the last traveler two hours ago, and he’d greeted him with a wary, curious tip of the hat. In the evening redness, they set up camp in a clearing near the road, the citronella infusion they had put on their skin at Agaam’s behest their only protection against the ravenous mosquitoes and bloodbugs, big, bulbous insects you had to pluck off your skin once they had landed. Near the clearing, a creek meandered through the boscage, and Lysia, Jespar, and Kawu used the last light of the day to wash the sweat and grime off, the sun an incandescent, inflamed eye between the peaks of Mount Ka?ra. Freshly washed but the sweat already forming anew, they returned to camp, where a fire glowed against the blue of the night. The old servant greeted them with a smile and nodded to a pot simmering over the logs, filled with a spicy-smelling stew. Using a machete, he opened a coconut for each of them and they ate under sparse conversation. While Agaam and Kawu excused themselves after dinner, Lysia and Jespar talked a little longer before curling up in a spot in the shade to sleep. Or trying to. Jespar was restless. The comfort he felt near Lysia last night wouldn’t settle in, and his mind raced around the White Brother, his speech, and Oonai’s fever. At one point, his thoughts drifted off to his youth, the incident, the numbness that had followed, that day he’d come into the room and seen the bloody sheets. Even stranger was that it took him the utmost effort to stop the images, and even when he opened his eyes an echo remained, almost as if it had just happened— not twelve years ago, in another life, to another person that he’d left behind upon boarding that ship. After what must have been an hour of shifting around, he got up, stretched his legs, and drank some water. Agaam sat leaning against a tree trunk, hands folded in his lap, eyes closed, though Jespar couldn’t help but feel he was awake. Jespar went through his belt pouch, found the vial with the pellets Lysia had given him, took two, and lay back down. Sleep came at once. Jespar had always considered his dreams to be vivid, but this night proved him wrong. When he awoke in the courtroom, he didn’t just see the sunlight falling through the arched windows, he felt it singe his skin. When the Corpse passed his judgment, he didn’t just see his decaying mouth, but also the sinewy strands of flesh caught in the spaces between his teeth and the red tint of his saliva. When they flayed him, he didn’t just feel the knives tearing off his skin but cutting deep into his soul. Coward. He awoke with a gasp. Sweat drenched him, his breath came in fits, his heart hammered against the inside of his chest like a frenzied animal trying to break its cage. “I’m awake,” he tried to say, but before his mouth could form the words, the fever flared up, sending him back onto the grass. Lysia mumbled something in her sleep. Lysia? He stared at the body in his arms. Bulky. Soft. Gray robes, reeking of feces, urine, rot. Though deep down something in him screamed, a paralyzing calm took hold of him. No. This didn’t make any sense—the Corpse couldn’t be here, wasn’t here, was a phantasm, the afterthought of the nightmare. He was still dreaming, that was the only explanation. Just like he had been last night in the ziggurat. Or was he? “I’m awake,” Jespar said. “I’m awake.” Nothing changed. The Corpse lay there, soft and foul and boneless like rotten fruit, unmoving. Holding his breath, Jespar withdrew his arms from around the Corpse, every muscle taut, every synapse ready to fire should the creature suddenly jolt awake, turn to face him, that look of contempt and shame and disgust in his eyes that— Focus. Fucking focus. Jespar slid back and back, ignoring the pain in his shoulder wound, back, moving faster the farther he got. Only when he had gotten five arm-lengths between them, he scrambled to his feet and ran. He had almost reached the border of the forest when he stopped and looked back, for one single moment convinced he’d see Lysia lying there, the way it had been, should be— was, because none of this could be happening. The Corpse was still there, the campfire embers backdropping him like a foreboding halo. Agaam leaned against the trunk, hands folded across his chest. Lysia was gone. Jespar spun around and ran. Only when his lungs burned and his feet hurt from the many cuts and stings in his soles did he stop. The jungle surrounded him, pitch-black except for what little moonlight fell through the canopy. “Fool,” he said, his breath fast and shallow. Had he really just run from some hallucination? It had been a hallucination, that much was certain—a tenacious one, fair enough, but still. Dizziness flooded him and he grabbed for support, found a branch, but jerked his hand back when something stung him upon contact. “Godsdamned fool.” What was more likely to kill him? Some poisonous rainforest animal biting or stinging his naked feet or another patch of exposed skin, or a ghost from a nightmare that didn’t even exist? He rubbed his eyes with the heels of his palms. The river. The best way to get back had to be the river. He would find it, then follow it upstream to where they’d taken a bath—there was a rock jutting over the river, shaped like a finger—and take the way back to camp from there. Closing his eyes, he listened. There it was, faint, far, but still: the sound of water. “He wasn’t there,” he said into the humid night. “He wasn’t there.” Several stings, cuts, and mosquito bites later, Jespar arrived at the river. The forest was still a shapeless mass of black and green under the sphere of the moon, the height of which suggested it’d be a long time until sunrise. With a sigh, he sank on his haunches by the riverbank and drank some water, the Corpse’s stench still in his nostrils. Then he continued upstream. When he arrived at the finger-shaped rock, a voice ripped him from his thoughts. “Dal’Varek?” He spun around. Someone sat cross-legged at the ledge of the rock, back straight, hands folded in his lap. “Kawu?” Kawu squinted, as if convincing himself Jespar wasn’t a mirage. “How… what are you doing here?” Jespar started to speak but broke off. I saw a ghost? He walked over to Kawu. The canopy was sparser near the river, allowing slivers of moonlight to fall in. “I couldn’t sleep, that godsdamned fever is back. And you? I didn’t know you went all the way out here.” “Oh, I just… I like the sound of the water. It helps me rest.” “Huh,” Jespar said for the lack of a better answer. “Okay. Do you mind if I sit for a moment? I could use some company.” Kawu looked at him as though he didn’t understand the question. Then he said, “Of course.” Jespar sat beside him, hanging his legs from the ledge. Grass covered the rock up to the edge, warm and wet under Jespar’s palms, droplets of water sprayed at the soles of his feet. Kawu neither turned his head to face him nor scooted over. After it became clear Kawu wouldn’t start the conversation, Jespar did. “So,” he said, “I actually meant to ask you earlier, but I never got around to it: Ma’saa Oonai said that dreamwalkers never truly sleep the way we do. She said that you’re always aware when you’re dreaming, just like we were back in Oonai’s nightmare. Is that true?” “Yuz.” “What’s that like?” Kawu glanced at him. In the dark, his eyes were a deep green, the color of some plant that only grew at the bottom of the ocean. “Just imagine there’s another world that you can enter at your own will. It feels as real as this place, but you’re the god of that world and you can shape it at your will… create people and creatures with not so much as a thought or fly like a bird over the landscapes your mind created.” “That sounds intriguing.” Kawu smiled faintly. “I felt the same way when I was a child.” “But not anymore?” He shook his head. “It’s different now. Back then, I used to think that tuewa, the other world, was real, but then, when I was thirteen, my mother told me it wasn’t. All those people, all those ‘friends’ I had made in that other world didn’t exist. That just…” “Crushed you?” “I suppose. I realized I was the king of a world that didn’t exist.” He looked off. “These days, visiting tuewa is mostly a necessity for keeping sane. I don’t do much while I’m there, only rest my mind for the four hours required to keep myself from going mad.” He added something under his breath, but the rush of the river drowned his words. “I didn’t catch that.” “Oh, it’s… never mind.” “…Okay.” Jespar shifted, drawing his right leg up and lacing his fingers across the knee. An animal, some kind of squirrel, hopped up to the riverbank to their feet, noticed them, then rushed back into the forest. “So,” Jespar said, “how do your dreams look like, then? Nowadays.” “An ocean.” “An ocean?” “Yuz. A bit like the In-Between, but it’s not frozen and the sky is clear and the sun setting. It’s just water, as far as the eye can see.” “Interesting. But you could make it anything you like, right? A desert, a city, a forest?” “I could.” “Then why an ocean?” Kawu uncrossed his legs, slid up to the ledge, and let his legs hang down. “It’s just how I like it. I suppose you could say there’s something… calming about that vastness. It’s just quiet, myself and no one and nothing else.” Sounds lonely, Jespar thought. “I see.” They sat still, watching the water rush by, a breeze on their skin. The memory of what had happened was still fresh in Jespar’s mind but out here, it lost some of its horror. His mind drifted to Lysia. Had she realized he was missing by now? I should go back, he thought, but for some reason the idea of walking back to the camp and lying back down beside Lysia again unsettled him. Liar. It terrified him. A quiver went into his stomach and the weight in his neck returned. He glanced at Kawu, the profile of his face backdropped by the moonlight the river reflected, his black hair slightly disheveled. He was about to speak when the headache hit. Jespar winced, shut his eyes, bit his tongue, a blue veil raging on the insides of his eyelids. When the pain lessened and he opened his eyes again, Kawu studied him, his face clouded. “I’m okay,” Jespar said. He forced a smile. “Really, I am, it’s just that fever I’ve been—” “What happened tonight?” Kawu asked. “What really happened?” Jespar blinked. “I don’t know what you mean.” “Dal’Varek… please.” Jespar, he thought. I’m Jespar. Then he told him. About his encounter with the Corpse in the bath, about his lingering unease despite Lysia’s assurance that it was just an ordinary fever, about his hallucination at the campfire. When he was done, the concern in Kawu’s eyes had been replaced by something else: Fear. “I’m a fool.” Though Jespar knew what would follow next, had known since awaking from Oonai’s dreamworld, he asked, “Why?” “Because I should have known. The dream-eater infected you.” Silence stretched out between them. “No,” Jespar said. “That’s not possible.” The heavy-hearted look Kawu gave in place of an answer was what finally broke through the walls of denial. “But—” Jespar’s voice broke. “How?” Kawu exhaled, drawing his knees to his chest and wrapping his arms around them. “I don’t know. As I said, all I know about dream-eaters comes from my mother, and she never told me about this… or did she? Kweh, I don’t remember, I just—” He fell silent. Jespar began to say something, but his mind was blank. Infected. His skin crawled, a million cold, slimy centipedes crawling over his body, headed for his eyes and ears and nostrils and mouth, for an opening into his skull. His wound itched and pulsed and burned under its bandage as if… Infected. He pressed his eyes shut, jerked his head as if to shake off the thought. “I don’t understand,” Jespar managed at last. “I mean, we were in a dream, right? We were in a dream.” “We were.” “Then how the hell is this possible? How can something… something that I didn’t physically get in contact with infect me? This is nonsense.” He made a sound that was supposed to be laughter but came out as a croak. “This is nonsense.” “I’m afraid not. See, dream-eaters, they are… different. When normal beings dream, we shift our minds between planes, between akhara and tuewa. Dream-eaters don’t, they exist in both worlds at the same time because they have both a physical and an ethereal body. So, if a dream-eater lays an egg in the real world…” “…One hatches in tuewa, ” Jespar said, voice flat. Kawu nodded. “And it must work the other way around too. The moment the dream-eater, its ethereal body, touched you, your consciousnesses connected, and it must have laid an egg in your dreaming self’s brain. Which then also formed in the real world.” “…Shit.” The image of an egg appeared behind his eyes, sitting inside the tissue of his brain, red and pulsating, a tiny insectoid shape twitching and writhing behind the translucent membrane. His voice fell. “Holy shit.” As if to mock him, the headache flared up again, quick and violent. Jespar winced and pressed the heels of his palms against his forehead until the pain let off. “Okay,” he said at last. “So the same thing that happened to Oonai is going to happen to me. That’s the long and short of it, right?” Kawu’s eyes were still fixed on the ground. “Only if we don’t cure you.” “But how? We can cure Oonai by finding the imprinted and getting him to release the bug. I understand that, but how do we release one that hasn’t even been imprinted on someone?” He forced himself to say it: “How do we release mine?” The following quiet was tormenting, like a man on the scaffold counting the seconds until the guillotine falls. “I don’t know,” Kawu said at last. “I wish I did, but I don’t. As I said, all my knowledge of dream-eaters comes from my mother, and even she thought I’d never require it.” “There has to be a way,” Jespar said. “Just think. Please.” Kawu ran both hands through his hair, lacing them behind his neck, staring into the jungle. “Maybe the broodmother, Oonai’s dream-eater, is the imprinted of yours. Maybe if we kill her it will purge her offspring from your brain too.” “Maybe,” Jespar said. “ Maybe . ” Jespar’s head swam. “Can’t you just enter my tuewa the way you entered Oonai’s and deal with the parasite there?” “How, by killing it? Even if that were possible, you know what happens if a dream-eater dies while in someone’s brain: It releases a toxin that kills the host.” “But it has only been two days, right? What if it’s still, I don’t know… an egg?” “Even if is, how do you know this makes killing it any less dangerous? Do you really want to take the risk?” Jespar studied Kawu, then let out a long, weary breath. “So that’s it? I’m going to continue losing my mind and then fall into a coma unless we miraculously find the assassin?” Kawu opened his mouth to speak, but then something flickered across his face. “Look at me. And hold still.” Hesitating, Jespar complied. Kawu put both his thumbs on the center of Jespar’s forehead, his other fingers splayed out and their tips touching Jespar’s temples. Then he closed his eyes. Warmth rushed into Jespar’s head, his mind, an exhale of summer sweeping through a cave of ice. Jespar’s headache ceased, the light-headedness disappeared. The world snapped back into focus. Kawu studied him, his fingertips still on Jespar’s forehead. They were dry and warm. “How do you feel?” “…Better,” Jespar said. “Good, actually.” “Really?” “Yes. How on Vyn did you do that? I didn’t know you were a light mage.” “I’m not,” he said. “I merely restored your focus. It’s something I do all the time for my siblings and my father to protect them from my mother’s seizures. It anchors your mind to akhara. ” Kawu withdrew his hands. “I had no idea if this would work on you but seems like it did. I believe the dream-eater takes over its host by gradually pulling his mind into tuewa, even while he’s awake, that’s why you’ve been having those hallucinations. I restored your grip on the real world, so to speak.” “Does that mean…?” “You’re not cured, no, I only eased the symptoms. I’ll have to keep refocusing you until we’ve dealt with Oonai’s dream-eater.” “…I see. Well, thank you.” “It’s the least I can do.” Jespar looked off into the jungle, still dark as a funeral veil. Then a strange calm settled in him, optimism and acceptance in equal parts. He knew the feeling: the cards were dealt, the rules explained. All he could do now was play, ignoring the sword at his throat. “Well,” Jespar said, “how goes the saying? If you’re chin-up in shit, don’t let your head hang down.” Kawu arched his eyebrows. “It’s a joke.” Another second passed until the corners of Kawu’s mouth lifted. “Ah. I understand.” Against all odds, Jespar’s mood lightened. He picked up a pebble and threw it into the river. It disappeared with a light splash. And now? He should go back, he needed the sleep, and, if Lysia or Agaam had noticed his going missing, they’d be worried. Still, something kept him where he was. “Why are you smiling?” Kawu asked. “Am I?” “Yuz.” “I don’t know. Maybe because, ever since I came here, I seem to have gotten into the habit of relying on other people to save my ass.” “You have?” “Oh, yes. Before we found you on Yuva, Lysia helped me get rid of something I caught in an inn.” “Caught” is a gallant way of putting it, he thought. “Now you’re here, saving me from… well, from this. Frankly, I’d be a liar if I said this wasn’t terrifying, and you’re making it a lot more bearable.” Kawu smiled. “I’m just glad I can help.” “That’s big of you.” When Kawu lowered his eyes at the compliment, a thought crossed Jespar’s mind. “That… bug. It’s not infectious, is it?” “No,” he said. “At least not here in akhara. The parasite doesn’t leave the host’s body until… you know.” Parasite. The word echoed. “Okay. Good to know.” They sat for another minute or two, Jespar picking pebbles from the rock and throwing them into the river. After a while, Kawu spoke up. “May I ask you something?” “Sure.” “That Corpse from your dreams… he represents someone who used to be close to you, doesn’t he?” The question took Jespar by surprise, but, somehow, the negative emotions that usually came with the topic stayed away. Maybe Kawu’s “refocusing” was responsible for it. Maybe it was the fact that Jespar simply liked him. “My father.” “I thought so.” “Yeah?” “Yuz.” Kawu stretched out his legs and moved them, curled and uncurled his toes, probably because they had gone asleep. “In my experience, there’s a certain something about people who lost one or both of their parents. A sort of… how should I say? A rootlessness.” Jespar frowned. “Really.” “I didn’t mean to offend you. I merely wanted to—” “You didn’t offend me,” Jespar said. “It’s just that I couldn’t be happier that my father is gone. It was probably the best thing that could have happened to me.” To us. “…Why?” “Because he was a self-righteous prick.” There was no emotion in Jespar’s voice. “See, my father was a judge, one of the thirteen that, together, formed the tribunal of my country. The court of law.” “Like the Coalition’s House of Justice?” “I guess. The thing about my father was that, for him, life was all about his sacred principles, one in particular: ‘Justice knows no compromise.’” An odd feeling settled on Jespar’s skin as he said the words, like wearing the clothes of an old cadaver. “That’s a good principle,” Kawu said. “Most people think that way, yeah. What they don’t understand is that for my father, it was never about actual justice or the well-being of people, but about confirming to himself what a flawless person, what a paragon of virtue he really was. It’s hard to explain—if you had known him you’d understand what I mean. My brothers always said he was different before my mother died during my birth, but I wouldn’t know: He’d always give me that reproachful look as if I had committed some terrible crime and barely spoke to me, and, when he did, it was always only about who would succeed him, about responsibility, honor, and manhood, and, of course, about justice.” Jespar shook his head. “For him, this was all that ever mattered, and, ultimately, he gave it his all: his own life and that of his family.” “Your family is dead?” “Most of them, yes. It’s a long story and I don’t want to bore you, so I’ll give you the short version. If you want, that is.” “…I do.” “Well, okay. One day, back when I was sixteen, my father was faced with the choice to either send a criminal to the gallows or let him run free with a fine to be paid to the victims’ families. He also knew this man was the son of a powerful crime lord, notorious for his vengefulness, especially when his family was concerned.” “What had this man done? The crime lord’s son?” “He murdered someone…. two women. No question, he was a beast of a person that would have been better off dead, but that’s not the point. The point is that my father, well aware of the crime lord’s reputation, decided to turn the trial into the biggest spectacle since the Apotheosis of the Light-Born. He was the only one of the thirteen judges voting for the gallows, and he shouted it from the rooftops. Under his eye, no one would escape justice, no matter the title. All hail Damean Dal’Varek the righteous, the epitome of justice.” “And you believe he should have let the man run free?” “I believe,” Jespar said, “that had he wanted the man to die, there would have been smarter ways to do it. Poison, an accident… The Tribunal had the means, and it had done so before if an official execution wasn’t in the cards for some reason. But that wasn’t an option for my father, of course, he just had to have it his way. So when the judges returned to the courtroom to announce their vote, he proclaimed in that authoritative voice of his that he, unlike the other twelve judges, believed the murderer should go to the gallows and he’d do all in his power to get him there, even if he got away this time. Of course, the crowd went mad.” “But the murderer went free.” “Of course he did—that’s how the system works. Which didn’t stop the criminal’s father from teaching that annoying Judge Dal’Varek a lesson.” “What did he do?” The last his of inner resistance welled up. When he’d told Lysia the same story, he’d left it vague—particularly the part that followed. “As a kid,” Jespar said, “I had a habit of sneaking out of our manor at night to explore the premises, a couple of times a week. Our governess gave me hell for it whenever she found out, but I didn’t care—I loved the freedom of roaming around in the night, albeit it just in the vicinity of our house. There was this one spot I went to each time, a kind of cave. It had this one cavern shaped like a cauldron, all overgrown and open at the top, with moonlight falling in. I could sit there for hours, just looking at the sky, with that sense of… vastness all around me. I just loved it.” And so did she. He chuckled, but it sounded nervous. “Gods, sounds crazy, doesn’t it? A kid sneaking out all on his own, spending the night in some cave.” It hadn’t been a real question, but Kawu took it as one. “It might to most people, but I understand it. It’s not so different from the place I go to when I dream. Remember?” “That ocean at sunset.” “Yuz. Sometimes the world can get a little overwhelming, so we find ourselves spaces to get away from it all. Sanctuaries.” Jespar studied Kawu—the soft contour of his jaw, his high, arched eyebrows like brushstrokes with blank ink. Only now did he notice a slight discoloration just beneath the lobe of his right ear, where his skin was lighter. Becoming aware of Jespar’s attention, both Kawu and Jespar averted their eyes. “Yeah,” Jespar said. “A sanctuary.” Tucking up one knee, he leaned back, the grass damp under his palms. “Anyway. The night of the ‘incident,’ I had gone out to explore, and when I returned in the early morning, I found our manor in flames, my father, my three older brothers, and our six servants dead and mounted to the walls. For the servants, the assassins had sufficed with slitting their throats, while they had flayed my brothers and my father and placed their skin at their feet.” “By the gods. I’m… I’m so sorry.” “If the gods cared, they kept it to themselves.” Though his voice was calm, the line of his jaw showed under his skin and his fingers dug into the ground. “I know I should be angry at the attackers, and, in a way, I am. But to tell you the truth, if anyone is to blame for this, it’s my father.” “Because of his verdict?” “Because he willfully placed his ego over the lives of his family. He knew the verdict might cost him and us our lives, he knew the criminal’s father practically had to retaliate to protect his reputation, and yet he did it. And guess what, after it happened, they all celebrated him as the tragic hero, put up a statue in the Tribunal’s atrium, said that the world would be a better place if there were more people like him. Would it, though? Would the world really be a better place if everybody chose the satisfaction of their own ego over the people who trusted them? No. My father was a self-absorbed, cruel narcissist, and eleven innocent lives paid the price for it. And even now, in death, he won’t leave me alone. He just won’t.” Kawu eyed him quietly, the sounds of the jungle and the passing water all that marred the silence. “Have you ever wondered if perhaps you get this nightmare because your father wants something from you?” “My father is dead,” Jespar said. “He doesn’t want anything.” “I meant symbolically. I don’t know, maybe there’s something you need to do in order to stop the nightmares and close that chapter of your past.” “Oh, trust me, I closed it long ago.” It came out harsher than intended. “But thank you for caring,” he added, meaning it, but in a tone that made clear he didn’t want to pursue the conversation. Kawu didn’t seem to mind, and a long silence followed. When he spoke again, something about his expression had changed, like hard clay softened by rainfall. “You know, I’m an egotist too.” “Huh?” “I’m an egotist too. Me being here… it’s pure selfishness.” Jespar tilted his head. “Didn’t you come here because you want to allow your family and your people a better life?” Kawu gave him a hollow smile. “That’s only part of the reason.” “Okay, yeah, you want a share of the riches yourself. Who wouldn’t?” “It’s not about that.” “What then?” Kawu sighed then turned to face Jespar. “I wanted to get away from it all. From my father, from my mother, from my siblings, from everything… no more screams from my mother in the middle of the night, no more tears from Ekha and Guwi because they had to go to bed with empty stomachs again, no more carrying my father up the slope to our house because he’s too proud again to admit he’s a cripple and tried to go into town all by himself. I’m so tired of it, Dal’Varek, so tired of working all around the clock just so we don’t starve, so tired of giving that lonely, sad old man I work for the smiles that keep him thinking I see him as more than just my employer. I’m tired of always having to be the ‘brave one’ because I’m the only one in my family still able to be that person.” His eyes shone, but there were no tears. Jespar felt the urge to reach out to him, to comfort him, but he didn’t move.
　　“And do you know the worst of it? I thought I’d feel guilty about turning my back on them the moment I boarded that ship of yours, but the truth is I’m enjoying it. Despite all that’s happened, despite what we’re doing, I enjoy being away, I enjoy not having to think about them. All this…”
　　He made a vague hand gesture. “It’s just an excuse.” He flicked Jespar a brief glance, and it seemed as if he wanted to add something. Then he shook his head. “I’m not brave, Dal’Varek, I’m the opposite. I’m a coward, I’m weak, and I’m selfish.”
　　Only a couple of seconds passed before Kawu’s cheeks reddened. He dropped his gaze.
　　“Kweh, I’m… I’m so sorry. I shouldn’t have…”
　　Jespar put his hand on Kawu’s. “It’s all right. Really.”
　　At first, Kawu tensed, but kept his hand where it was.
　　“You know, it’s funny,” Jespar said.
　　“What?”
　　“How most people always have such skewed perceptions of themselves. You’re not a coward, Kawu, you’re not weak, and you’re not selfish. At the risk of sounding dramatic, you’re probably one of the bravest people I know.”
　　“Please, don’t… you don’t need to say this.”
　　“I’m saying it because it’s true. Look, even if part of your motivation for taking this job was to get a break from it all, so what? Everybody would feel the same in your position. And when all this is over, you’ll not only have played a role in preventing a civil war but will return to your family a rich man. Do you understand? Your siblings will never go to bed hungry again, you can buy a big house for all of you, and even hire a medicus, a light mage, or a Starling tinkerer to help out your father.”
　　“But—”
　　“No, Kawu, results matter, not intentions. I’ll say it again, who cares why you saved your family if you did save them? The gods? Some vague, omniscient entity that judges people by their motivations and not by what comes of them? Highly doubtful if you ask me. The only person turning this into a problem is you.”
　　“But you just told me that the only reason your family is dead is because of your father’s egotism.”
　　“No,” Jespar said, “they are dead because my father put his intentions before the results. To him, getting his stupid way was more important than the cost of it. That’s selfishness, Kawu, not you enjoying a respite from something that shouldn’t have been your responsibility in the first place. Just… don’t feel guilty for being human. There’s no shame in putting yourself first for a change, especially not if no one suffers from it.”
　　For a while, Kawu said nothing. Then he turned his hand palm up so that their fingers interlaced. A prickle wandered up Jespar’s arm, the knowledge of the parasite in his brain pushed far into the recesses of his mind. “Thank you, Dal’Varek. For saying this.”
　　Jespar grinned. “You just saved my sanity, so a bit of readjusting of your perspective is the least I can do. Now, can I ask you a favor? It’s something I’ve been meaning to ask you for a long time, but I was never sure how you’d respond to it.”
　　Deliberately or subconsciously, Kawu’s grip on Jespar’s hand tightened. “What?”
　　“Will you finally start calling me Jespar?”
　　Kawu looked at Jespar, eyes slightly widened. Then a smile split his lips, the brightest one Jespar had yet seen him wear. “All right,” he said, “Jespar.” He said the name slowly and deliberately, as if pronouncing a foreign word. “Jespar.”
　　“That’s my name.”
　　Grinning, Jespar looked off again. A sanctuary. Somehow, they’d managed to together push all their worries away, had created their own little bubble of safety, out here in the moonlit jungle at the foot of Mount Ka?ra.
　　“Jespar?” Kawu said.
　　“Hm?”
　　“If selfishness is choosing your own ambitions over results, then you were wrong: I am selfish. Not because of my family, but because of something else.”
　　Jespar said nothing, just looked at Kawu.
　　“I—” Kawu began but broke off with a nervous chuckle. “Kweh, this is absurd. This isn’t the time nor the place.”
　　“Tell me.”
　　The uncertainty on Kawu’s face remained a breath longer then it crumbled. “The priestess, Varroy,” he said. “I think I know how she feels about you, and I know you feel for her. And I believe she’s good for you.”
　　Jespar listened, his mouth dry.
　　You promised her.
　　You promised.
　　“Still… this?” Kawu continued, glancing at their locked hands. “I… I like it. And I also like how you look at me sometimes, like the things you say, like how we… I don’t know, how we simply understand each other and how you don’t feel ‘it.’ I like how you treat me as if I were normal.”
　　He paused, took a breath. “I’ve never felt this way before, and I know I shouldn’t, because I don’t want to endanger the mission by driving a wedge between you two. I know Varroy doesn’t like me very much because she, like everyone else, feels my gift, but I also know she’s a good woman and you’re important to her. I just… I don’t know what to do.” He glanced up but looked away when their eyes met. “By the gods, I’m sorry. You must have a million things on your mind, and here I am bothering you with this nonsen—”
　　Jespar leaned over and kissed him. At first, Kawu froze, then, gingerly, he kissed back. Jespar cupped his neck, pulled him closer, kissed him deeper, their tongues searching, touching, both demanding, both reluctant. When Jespar withdrew, there was a glazed look in Kawu’s eyes but a smile on his lips.
　　The spell broke.
　　Releasing each others’ hands, they sat side by side until Jespar broke the silence. “I shouldn’t have done that. I’m sorry.”
　　“I…”
　　“I’ll talk to her,” Jespar said. “Okay? I’ll talk to Lysia.”
　　“You… will?”
　　“Yeah. You’re right, she and I have something going, but I don’t think it’s that important to her anyway. When it first happened, she even said she wasn’t looking for anything serious.”
　　“So she doesn’t want marriage?”
　　Jespar smiled. “Is that so hard to believe?”
　　“Oh. Well, I… guess your people do things differently.”
　　“Some do.”
　　A grasshopper landed on Kawu’s lap, wiggled its feelers, then sprang away.
　　“I’ll talk to her,” Jespar repeated. “First thing in the morning.”
　　“You don’t have to.”
　　Jespar turned to face Kawu. He looked strangely helpless in the blanched moonlight, that sullen sense of maturity, far too much for his age, gone and replaced by an almost adolescent shyness.
　　“I want to, Kawu. I—” He faltered, not knowing how to finish the sentence. “This feels right to me too.”
　　Again Kawu’s smile resurfaced. Jespar took Kawu’s hand again. “I think this much is okay.”
　　Kawu first hesitated then slid his fingers back between Jespar’s. They remained so for some heartbeats. Then Jespar reclined, gently pulling Kawu with him so that they lay on their backs, the night sky a dome far above them, like an upturned sea of ink-black water populated by thousands of luminescent, frozen creatures too strange for man to fathom.
　　Lysia.
　　When he’d made her that promise in the ziggurat, he’d meant it. Now, all that remained when he thought of her was the image of the Corpse, his threadbare, dirt- and piss-stained robes, the boneless, soft feel of his body, like mushrooms shrunken and made mushy by the humid heat.
　　A hallucination, Jespar thought, but it changed nothing. Whatever he’d felt for Lysia, his father, a dead man from a dream, had found it and killed it. He had become her. She had become him.
　　Tomorrow. He’d tell her his feelings had changed, tell her about the kiss and apologize, and she’d understand.
　　Wasn’t it all, as Kawu had said, absurd anyway?
　　Here he lay, just having learned he had a dream-eater’s egg in his brain and the fate of a country on their shoulders yet pondering about the resolution of a love affair. Or maybe, he thought, that is precisely the point. Anything is better to worry about than your own impeding madness.
　　“Kawu?”
　　Kawu kept his eyes on the sky. “Yuz?”
　　“I’d like to ask you for a favor.”
　　“Yuz?”
　　“Please don’t tell Lysia or Agaam about my… illness. I know it’s irrational, but I don’t want them to know until it’s absolutely necessary.”
　　Jespar expected protest, or at least a question. Instead, Kawu said, “All right. As long as you regularly let me perform the refocusing.”
　　“I’d be a fool not to. Thank you.”
　　Their eyes locked again, and Jespar felt an urge to hold him, kiss him. He didn’t. They looked back at the stars, where the moon lazily sunk west. Jespar’s mind was at ease, thinking nothing, just existing, his limbs growing heavy with the sleep slowly closing his wings over him like some great, benevolent avian specter.
　　“Jespar?”
　　“Hm?”
　　“When all this is over, can I come with you?”
　　Opening a drowsy eye, Jespar glanced at Kawu. “You mean—”
　　“Just for a couple of moons,” Kawu said. “You’ve said it yourself, haven’t you? When all this is over, I’ll be rich. I could hire someone to look after my family while I’m gone, I’d get them a beautiful place to live on another island, away from the fog, maybe on Viyuuo.” He spoke faster, his voice lighter. “I’d send my father to the best medicus, and I’d hire a teacher for Ekha and Guwi so they can work for the Coalition when they’re older. I mean, they’ll probably be grateful for a couple of moons without their big brother always watching over their shoulders and reprimanding them. I really think this could work—we could simply see where our travels take us.” He hesitated. “Unless you don’t want to, of course.”
　　“I’d love that.”
　　There was a short pause. “When all this is over then?”
　　Smiling, Jespar closed his eyes. “When all this is over.”
#chapter Thirteen - Masks
　　They stayed on the finger-shaped rock until dawn, hands locked and slipping in and out of a peaceful slumber. Only when the morning insects began to chirp did a deep sense T of dread resurface in Jespar and slowly crumble the quiet calm he’d been feeling.
　　Infected.
　　“…No,” Jespar muttered. Kawu gave a sleepy mumble. “No.”
　　Jespar reached for his pipe then realized he’d left it at camp. After a moment’s consideration he slipped his hand out of Kawu’s, got to his feet, and stripped off his shirt.
　　Kawu sat up beside him, eyes bleary and a cowlick on the side of his head. “Jespar…?”
　　Jespar flicked him a smile. “Just getting a cooling.”
　　He dived head first into the river, the blue enfolding him and rinsing off the sweat of the night.
　　He stood under water for as long as he could, and when he resurfaced, the sleepiness was gone and the dread was back at the bottom of his mind where he wanted it. He began to swim with light breast strokes, counterbalancing the gentle current that had carried him slightly away from the rock where Kawu stood, squinting in his direction with worry all over his face.
　　A grin tugged at the corners of Jespar’s mouth. “Come on in!”
　　Kawu dithered for a breath or two but then stripped off his tunic and followed his example, diving into the water with surprising agility. He swam over to Jespar, stopping just an arm-length away from him, and Jespar had to suppress the urge to laugh as he once more realized the absurdity of it all, him splashing about in a river and acting like a lovestruck boy while not only the fate of an entire country but his own survival rested on his shoulders.
　　“Great, isn’t it?”
　　Smiling, Kawu nodded.
　　Jespar dived under and let himself sink all the way down to the riverbed, where he sat cross-legged, feeling the water on his skin and watching shoals of tiny, colorful fish pass him by.
　　When he broke the surface, Kawu was still where he was, watching him with crinkling eyes.
　　Though the sun hadn’t risen by the time they returned to the camp, the sky was light enough for them to find their way back with ease. Halfway there, they heard Lysia’s voice cutting through the rainforest and calling Jespar’s name. They met her and Agaam halfway, and when Lysia noticed them, she stopped abruptly.
　　“Jespar.”
　　“As I told you,” Agaam said. “He’s all right.”
　　“Looks like it,” Lysia said, her eyes wandering from Jespar to Kawu and back to Jespar.
　　Kawu’s cheeks flushed. “Where were you? We were worried.”
　　“I, uhm, went for a swim. We did.”
　　“Must have been a long one. We were waiting for over an hour until we started looking.”
　　“Sorry,” Jespar said. “I should have told you.” He hesitated then added: “Actually, do you mind if we talk?”
　　Kawu and Agaam went ahead to the camp to saddle the horses while Lysia and Jespar stayed behind. Lysia listened quietly while Jespar talked, and when he was done, she nodded and said,
　　“Okay.”
　　“Okay?”
　　“Yeah,” Lysia said. “Thanks for telling me, and thanks for being upfront about the kiss. I appreciate that.”
　　“So… you don’t mind?”
　　Lysia smiled sourly. “Well, I’m not going to do somersaults and throw confetti to mark the occasion, but yeah, it’s all right. I mean, what else can I do anyway? You made up your mind.
　　Not to mention that there’s not much one can respond to ‘I had a nightmare in which you turned into a corpse,’ is there?”
　　The weight materialized in the back of Jespar’s neck again. He wanted to leave, but forced himself to stay. “I know how it sounds, that’s really how it happened. I… I have no idea why—”
　　Liar—“but it’s as if elements of my dreams have started leaking into reality. Kawu did something that should help me with that, though, so hopefully it won’t happen again.”
　　“Hopefully,” Lysia said. There was no sarcasm in her voice.
　　Jespar raised his hands in a gesture of surrender. “Look, Lysia, I know I messed up. I shouldn’t have done what I did, not after promising you I wouldn’t, but it just…”
　　Lysia held up a hand. “I told you, it’s all right. Now, do you mind if we postpone this until after the mission? We have a civil war to prevent and a life to save.”
　　Two lives, Jespar thought. He said, “Fair enough.”
　　They returned to the clearing in silence, and glancing at Lysia as they walked, Jespar briefly wondered whether he had made the right decision. At camp, he told Kawu about the conversation. Like Lysia, he listened silently, hands folded at his waist and his eyes downcast.
　　“I shouldn’t have interfered,” Kawu said when he was done. “I didn’t mean to hurt her.”
　　“If anyone hurt her, it was me. Also, I don’t think Lysia is the kind of woman bothered by this kind of thing too much. Her mind is on the mission.”
　　Kawu gave him a grateful smile. It was a good smile, one that Jespar hoped to see on him more often. “I see. When all this is over then.”
　　“When all this is over.”
　　They broke fast, and before they left, Kawu refocused Jespar once more to protect against the influence of the dream-eater. Then they applied some of Lysia’s sun paste and set out for Ka?ra Manor—and answers.
　　Unlike Mount Uunil, which was a single, massive, steep chunk of green shooting toward the sky, Mount Ka?ra encompassed four smaller, flatter mountains surrounded by a diaspora of hills and slopes, all covered by dense jungle. As Ka?ra Manor was situated on the tallest of the four peaks, they had to skirt the outer mountains first to get farther inland, which meant hours and hours of uphill ride through the jungle. It didn’t help that the day turned into one of the hottest yet, and though the jungle canopy provided some shadow the sticky humidity made up for that advantage tenfold. Soon, Jespar felt as if they were slogging through the maw of some giant amphibian.
　　Four hours in, with the noon heat approaching fast and Jespar’s chest and armpits itching maddeningly from the accumulating sweat, the rainforest finally thinned out and opened into a rocky overlook. A vast dell unfolded beneath it, nestled between the mountain they’d been climbing and two other peaks, one of which must be Mount Ka?ra. On a precipice a third of the way up stood the palace.
　　Somehow, the word “manor” had made Jespar think of something like the house he’d grown up in: pitched, slated roof; arched windows; maybe three stories. It wasn’t. Atop that precipice sat another ziggurat with its stacked tiers of white stone, only this one had but six stories instead of twenty. Both enthralled and estranged by the view, Jespar shook his head. The cost of supplying a place like this so far from the next city alone must have been enough to motivate a hundred more peasants to join the ranks of the Scythe, not to mention the staff of servants and guards.
　　A handful of smaller buildings clustered around the manor, probably the servants’ quarters, and a crescent shaped wall spanned around the entire side facing the dell. The property surrounding it featured a sprawling, colorful orchard and what seemed to be a hedge maze.
　　Dipped in the light of the setting sun, there was an unreal quality to the place, like a Fata morgana spawned by the mind of a famished traveler.
　　“I guess that’s it,” Jespar said. He wiped sweat off his chin, only to feel it form anew an instant later.
　　“Yuz, Dal’Varek,” Agaam said. He spoke flatly, and there was a distant look in his eyes.
　　“Ka?ra Manor.”
　　It took them another five hours to cross the dell and climb the narrow path that spiraled up the precipice. By the time they approached the gate, a gentle rain had begun to fall, the first time since Jespar’s arrival in Kilé. The sunset light tinged the drizzle crimson, like liquid oozing from some blood-drenched organ.
　　Agaam jerked up a hand.
　　“Wait.”
　　“What’s wrong?” Lysia asked while Agaam dismounted. She’d spoken little throughout the day and had spent most of the time looking off into the jungle.
　　Agaam nodded at the gate, an arch of wrought iron embedded in the wall. It stood open.
　　Jespar squinted ahead, but from the distance, nothing seemed amiss.
　　Except, he realized, that there’s no one there.
　　Lysia dismounted, and Kawu and Jespar followed her example.
　　“You should stay here,” Lysia told Agaam. “I don’t like this.”
　　“Neither do I.” Agaam drew a curved, sheathed blade around twice the size of Jespar’s daggers from his saddlebag, ignoring the group’s surprised looks. “Let’s leave our horses here and move. Boy, you’re coming along too.”
　　Jespar flicked Kawu a worried glance. “He should stay… it’s too dangerous.”
　　“Not any more dangerous than out here when night falls and the predators come out.”
　　As if that settled the matter, Agaam crossed to the gate. After a brief hesitation, they followed him.
　　They came across the first corpse in the orchard. A gravel path wound its way from the gate to the ziggurat entrance, meandering through a carefully crafted composition of palms, other trees, bushes, and flowerbeds. The body was that of a man, short and wiry, balding but with a ponytail.
　　He knelt slumped before a square fountain around a statue of Oonai, his head resting on the rim of the basin. Dried blood on the stone tinged the water a pale red. Kawu covered his mouth, uttering something in Makehu. Jespar swallowed in a dry throat.
　　On the coast, Jespar had seen Kiléan fishermen kill living squid they had fished by smashing them repeatedly against a rock in order to burst all of their nine brains. Whoever had killed the servant must have done something similar. His head was caved in, battered into an unrecognizable pulp.
　　“Hell,” Jespar muttered.
　　Agaam sank on his haunches and eased the dead man onto his back, exposing the full extent of the injury. While Lysia paled, Kawu gagged but managed to keep the bile in.
　　“You knew him?” Lysia asked Agaam.
　　The old servant nodded. “That’s Ejkaan, head servant of Mount Ka?ra for the past ten years.”
　　His voice sounded even flatter than before. He stood. “The murderers might still be on the premises. Come.”
　　They crossed the orchard, following Agaam’s lead and always staying in the cover of the trees. For some reason, Jespar’s sudden trust in a man whose expertise presumably lay in organizing servants and serving breakfast to the First Magnate had not once struck him as odd, and Lysia seemed to feel the same—almost as if the part of their brain responsible for critical thinking had been subdued.
　　Four more corpses marked the way to the entrance, two Blue Guards lying face down in the gravel of one of the clearings that interspersed the orchard at regular intervals, the other two a woman and a boy Agaam identified as the cook and her son. They sat propped against the trunk of a giant fig tree, the boy’s head resting against his mother’s shoulder, his throat cut, her neck snapped to a bizarre angle. Backdropped by the nocturnal garden and drenched in the last slivers of sunlight, they looked like the motif of some morbid, yet beautiful painting.
　　Lysia stared at them with glassy eyes. “Who on Vyn would do this?”
　　Jespar averted his eyes. “Someone who doesn’t want to leave any witnesses.”
　　When they arrived at the bottom of the staircase that led up to the first level of the manor, Agaam had drawn his blade from its sheath. It turned out to be a kris, a dagger shaped like a slithering snake, the blade the shimmering turquoise of nuvium. Jespar and Lysia had readied their weapons as well, while Kawu stuck close to Jespar’s heels, his posture upright but his breath coming at short intervals.
　　A few steps from the portal, Agaam raised his hand again and closed his good eye. For a breath, the hair on Jespar’s arm stood up as a peculiar sense of presence passed him by, as if an invisible entity had rushed past him and into the manor.
　　Agaam turned to face them. “The lobby is clear.”
　　With a doubtful glance on their faces, they followed him inside, but Jespar halted when he noticed Kawu still stood motionless at the bottom of the stairs, eyes transfixed on the floor.
　　“Kawu?”
　　“…So much suffering.“
　　“Huh?”
　　His gaze met Jespar’s, his eyes glassy. “I’m sorry, it’s just… never mind. Let us go.”
　　Agaam and Lysia awaited them in the lobby, a chamber with a high ceiling, the walls lit with flaming sconces, the floor a mosaic of blue and gold. Several corpses cluttered the ground, some servants, some guards. An imperial staircase faced the entrance at the far end of the room, its two mirrored treads arching around a fountain and leading to the upper floor. A statue of Jaaros Oonai stood in the center of the fountain basin, dressed in flowing robes and wearing his seven-horned crown, face turned skyward and palms raised.
　　Lysia held up a hand. “Do you hear that?”
　　A faint mix of voices wafted through the room, seemingly originating from somewhere on the upper floor. Agaam gestured to the staircase. Carefully, they crossed the room and climbed the stairs, holding their breaths, placing each step with care. The voices were louder on the second floor. Jespar let his gaze wander across the room, over the luxurious furniture, the paintings on the walls, the busts, and stopped at a small corridor to their left that appeared to be where the voices came from. They followed it, the voices growing louder the farther they got. They belonged to two women and a man, and while one of the women cried and had the typical Kiléan inflection, the other two were perfectly calm. Jespar didn’t recognize the accent.
　　After a turn left, the corridor ended in a large door that stood ajar. Corpses fronted it, a man and a young woman, the carpet sucking up their blood like parched soil did the first rain after a drought.
　　Signaling the others to wait, Agaam snuck to the door, stepping over the man’s body.
　　Somehow, he managed to do all that without a single sound, as though his clothes had decided not to rustle at his behest. He peeked through the crack then motioned Jespar over.
　　The room behind the door was small and cramped, walled by bookshelves. An ornamented desk stood in the center, facing the entrance, a row of windows with iron rods woven into floral patterns for grates behind it. Before the desk knelt a young woman with short, black hair and a white tunic and linen pants smeared by blood. Two people loomed over her, their backs to the door.
　　“…nothing!” the girl sobbed. “Saaras’Jodule, I told you!”
　　“And I,” the woman said, “don’t believe you.”
　　Before the girl had a chance to reply, the woman slapped her face, sending her flat on the tiles.
　　Then the woman squatted down before her. Like her companion, a brute of a man, she wore a angular armor made of dark leather, and wore a hood. A dagger twice the size of Jespar’s hung from her belt.
　　“You want to know what I think? I think you’re holding back out of fear of what your master will do if you tell us what we want to know.”
　　“Please…” the girl sobbed. “Please.”
　　The woman sighed. “So stubborn. All right… where do we start, I wonder? Pulling out the fingernails, maybe? Conservative, yes, but works more often than you’d think. What do you think, Cvek?”
　　The man mumbled something Jespar didn’t catch.
　　“Hm. Fair point.”
　　She yanked up the girl’s head by her hair. Jespar thought she’d break her neck, but then she ran her other hand down the girl’s face instead. It took Jespar a moment to realize that the woman had claws attached to her glove, leaving a trail of bloody ravines in the girl’s skin. She screamed.
　　Agaam’s nostrils twitched. Again, a shiver ran down Jespar’s arms, as if he’d been brushed by a current of electricity. The old servant looked first at him then Lysia, and ran his index finger across his throat.
　　Only hours ago, Jespar might have questioned the old servant’s orders. Now, almost as if he’d followed him into battle for years, Jespar just nodded and readied his daggers, assuming a steady position.
　　Kawu sobbed.
　　The hooded woman dropped the girl and shot to her feet, whirling around to face the door. The bulky man drew a two-handed sword from his back, smooth and effortless as if it were a twig.
　　Jespar kicked open the door.
　　He’d hoped his fast reaction would at least startle the attackers, but it didn’t. Before he knew it, the bulky man came for him, bringing down his sword in a powerful overhead swing. Jespar’s reflexes kicked in milliseconds before the blade reached his skull. He dodged back, feeling the momentum of the split air in his face.
　　Holy shit.
　　In the instant between his dodge and the bulky man realizing he missed, Jespar noticed something odd about his opponent’s face—a human face, human skin, but oddly motionless.
　　Clouded by battle fervor, Jespar couldn’t make sense of it.
　　Lysia darted past him, going for the hooded woman who simultaneously lunged at Jespar, her dagger outstretched. Lysia averted the blow by bringing her baton down on the woman’s arm, but while the impact should have had enough force to shatter her bones, it merely stopped the thrust.
　　The bulky man swung again. Jespar sidestepped, sunk his right dagger into the man’s side, but like Lysia’s attack it had almost no effect. Instead, the man smashed his knee into Jespar’s guts, driving the air from his lungs and sending him reeling. His sight blackened, stars dancing behind his eyelids. Jespar fought for balance, fell, his head coming down hard on the stone floor.
　　Gasping for air, he tried to get up, saw Agaam standing in the door frame, his eyes fixed on Jespar. Somewhere next to him, Lysia uttered a cry.
　　The bulky man now stood over him, his sword raised to deliver the killing blow. Though his instinct screamed for him to get up, to dodge, to survive, Jespar couldn’t help but stare at the face under the hood and finally understood why it looked so strange—it was a face, yes, real skin, but it wasn’t the man’s own but that of a corpse, sewn onto a mask.
　　The blade came down.
#chapter Fourteen - Overgrowth
　　The blow never came. His sword pointed at Jespar’s chest, the assassin stood over him.
　　Two dark pools focused him from between the eye slits of the assassin’s skin mask, T moving, but as inanimate as the dead face he wore.
　　His eyes glassed over.
　　For a heartbeat, the assassin didn’t move. Then he flipped his sword around and drove the tip into his throat. It was a perfectly executed motion—surgical precision, with just the right amount of pressure so the blade neither stopped at the skin nor yanked through his neck. It simply went in one end and out the other. Briefly, he just stood there, blood trickling from the wound, running down the hilt of the sword, and dripping onto Jespar’s trousers. Then he fell over backward. The sword pushed out of his neck upon impact, releasing a gush of blood.
　　Jespar remained where he was, staring at the giant’s body at his feet. The blood boiled in his veins and bile tickled at his throat.
　　What the hell?
　　Scooping up his daggers from the floor, Jespar scrambled to his feet and floundered away from the corpse, his blades pointed at it as if the man’s suicide had been part of some bizarre feint. Only when the man remained dead, Jespar’s breathing calmed. As if awaking from a dream, he looked around.
　　Lysia sat slumped against one of the bookshelves, one blood-stained hand across her stomach, her hair in tangles and her baton some arm-lengths from her on the ground. The woman with the claw glove lay face-down before her, torso on Lysia’s knees and her face resting on her lap in some grotesque parody of maternal consolation. She was as dead as her companion .
　　What the hell.
　　Whoever those two had been, neither Jespar nor Lysia had stood a sliver of a chance against them. They’d just been too fast, too strong, too tough—machines trained for killing. What on the face of Vyn had just happened?
　　“It’s over,” Agaam said from behind them.
　　Jespar turned around. “I—” He broke off. “You did this?”
　　Agaam merely gave a nod in response, as if no more explanation was necessary. “Where’s the servant? The one they were torturing?”
　　With a trance-like expression, Lysia tipped her chin at the enormous desk before the window front. Shallow breaths and a soft whimper came from behind the desk. “Over there.” She tucked up her knees, pushing the assassin’s body off her with her right foot in the process, then shakily got up, holding onto the bookshelf for support.
　　“Hold on,” Jespar said. “Not that I’m complaining, but what was that? Did you make that guy kill himself?”
　　“Not just him,” Lysia said. “That woman stuck her claws right up her own jaw.”
　　Agaam gave them an almost annoyed glance, as if their questions were unreasonable.
　　“Psionics.” He crossed to the desk. “I guided their hands, if you will. It took me a lot longer to get into their minds than expected... otherwise I would have never let the situation get so precarious.”
　　Psionics. The magic school of mind control, illusions, psychokinesis, the school that counted as the second hardest to master among all five, and that was forbidden anywhere in the Civilized World except for in the magic guilds of Qyra.
　　“Who are you, Agaam?” Jespar said from a dry throat, following the old servant around the desk.
　　Agaam sank to his haunches in front of the servant. She was shaking all over, sobbing uncontrollably, her eyes fixed on some point on the ceiling. If she was aware of their presence, she didn’t show it.
　　“I’m just what you think I am,” Agaam said. “A servant. But let us have this conversation later.”
　　Though he phrased it as a request, his words carried the same air of command they had back in the orchard, their tone cutting right into some primordial part of Jespar’s brain. Jespar fought it briefly then he sighed and let the matter rest. Agaam was right. Now wasn’t the time.
　　“She’s experiencing battle shock,” Lysia said, walking up beside them.
　　“Indeed,” Agaam said. “I will handle this. Dal’Varek, would you go look for the dreamwalker? Ma’sao Nākhani?”
　　Kawu.
　　Jespar turned, finding the corridor empty. His stomach curled. “Where did he go?”
　　“He ran off during the fight,” Agaam said, putting his hands on the woman’s forehead. Her skin was tanned and weather-beaten, the complexion of someone who had spent many hours outside. With Agaam’s touch, her sobbing calmed a little. “Panic, I presume. Just go look for him; he shouldn’t be far.”
　　Lysia knelt beside Agaam. She had two parallel cuts on her underarm, but that seemed the extent of her injures. “What if there are more of those assassins around? Whoever they are?”
　　“They are Petrified,” Agaam said. “Hired killers from your homeland, Varroy, the best in the world.”
　　“… Those were Petrified?”
　　“Yuz, I fought against them once before. But those two were the only ones here in the manor, I can sense it. Now, please, Ma’sao Dal’Varek, find Nākhani, and we’ll take care of the woman in the meantime. She might have the answers we’re looking for.”
　　Jespar went back down into the lobby, ignoring the pain in his shoulder wound from Yuva—
　　when the assassin had pushed him over, he’d fallen right on the bandage.
　　Now that the danger was gone, walking through the silent manor was haunting, as if there was still a glimmer of conscience left in the eyes of the dead the assassins had left behind and as if those eyes watched Jespar with sorrow, envy, or even spite as he passed by, he who lived while they had died in this senseless butchery whose purpose they probably hadn’t known and never would.
　　In the lobby, Jespar leaned over the balustrade of the gallery and looked for Kawu. He wasn’t there. Jespar called for him.
　　No reaction.
　　He was about to head down the stairs when he noticed a toppled vase in front of a corridor across from him. He followed it, arriving at a spiral staircase that appeared to connect all six stories of the manor. Following a hunch, Jespar went up to the third floor and crossed a dining chamber, a library, and an indoor garden. There were six more corpses, four guards and two more servants, both of the latter women in their twenties.
　　He found Kawu in a sleeping chamber, leaning against the banister on its balcony and looking down over the orchard and the hedge maze beneath. Crickets and katydids chirped into the starlit night.
　　“Kawu?”
　　Kawu spun around, jerking up his arms as if shielding himself from a blow. When he recognized Jespar, he relaxed. “Gods… Jespar. You’re alive?”
　　Jespar approached him, his boots spattering softly in the puddles the afternoon rain had left on the balcony. “I guess. Unless undead look a lot better than they used to.”
　　Kawu lowered his eyes. “I—I’m sorry. When the fight started, I was sure those murderers would kill you and Varroy both, and I panicked.”
　　Jespar stopped a step from Kawu. “They would have killed us if it hadn’t been for Agaam.”
　　Kawu didn’t seem surprised. “Agaam.”
　　“Yeah, he saved us. He’s more than just a servant.”
　　“I’ve had my suspicions.” Kawu exhaled. “Jespar… I’m so sorry I ran. But when it happened, I just, I don’t know, I lost it.” He bit his lip, eyes downcast. “Gods, I’m such a coward. I left you there to die.”
　　Jespar took Kawu in his arms. At first, Kawu tensed—then, breath by breath, his muscles relaxed and he settled into the embrace, slipping his arms around Jespar’s waist and resting his face against his chest. They held each other for what must have been a minute; then, Jespar let go. He tried to smile. “Those were two world-class assassins… I’m glad you ran.”
　　Kawu didn’t look up. “Okay.”
　　“Also, the manor is clear now, at least according to Agaam. Everything’s all right.”
　　Kawu sighed and turned his gaze back to the landscape stretching out beyond the banister.
　　“Not for the people they killed. Gods, Jespar, how does someone become like that?”
　　“Like what?”
　　“Well, you said you believe that whoever sent those assassins was trying to protect a secret, didn’t you? Assuming you’re right, how does a person get from being a child with a mother and father to someone who accepts the death of so many innocents just to get his will? I mean… how does one become so detached? Are some people just ‘evil’ to start with or do they become this way?”
　　“… Huh. Interesting.”
　　“What?”
　　“Lysia asked the same thing, not too long ago.”
　　“And what did you tell her?”
　　“That I think it’s a matter of perspective. The longer we live, the more we create some kind of narrative for our lives, like a lens through which we perceive the world… and some of those lenses are pretty distorted and messed-up, I guess.”
　　“Lenses that say it’s okay to kill people if it serves your ends.”
　　“Apparently. Then again, I might be wrong. Maybe some people just start bad.”
　　Kawu thought on this for a while. “I see.”
　　Jespar took Kawu’s hand and pressed it lightly. “Let’s just go back downstairs, okay? We saved the woman they were interrogating, and Agaam thinks she can give us some an—”
　　Blue fog fell over his eyes, numbing, dizzying, an invisible hand trying to yank its consciousness out of his skull. Jespar gasped, grabbed the banister with both hands—it must have been the banister, he couldn’t see—fought the hand, fought the fog. For several heartbeats, the struggle went on, then the fog disappeared and Jespar became aware of the sharp, cold fire in his forehead and the nausea at the back of his throat. He shut his eyes, clenched his teeth.
　　Someone, it must have been Kawu, supported him by his shoulder, but he barely felt the touch.
　　At last, the pain let up, leaving Jespar disoriented and his eyes burning, as if he’d just awoken from a twelve-hour sleep.
　　He tried to say something, but only a croak came out.
　　“The fever,” Kawu said.
　　Jespar nodded weakly.
　　Kawu’s face darkened.
　　“Hold still.”
　　He placed his fingertips against Jespar’s forehead, sending a rush of warmth through his head.
　　What remained of the pain faded, together with the dizziness.
　　Jespar drew a long breath. “Thanks,” Jespar said. “That was… it was never that strong before.”
　　Kawu studied him, then looked away. It might have been the light, but he seemed paler than he had just a moment before. Sweat beaded on his forehead.
　　“It’ll be all right,” Jespar said. “As long as you keep refocusing me, I’ll hold out until we—”
　　“It shouldn’t have worn off already. Normally, a refocusing lasts at least two full days, and I did yours no more than thirteen hours ago.”
　　A trail of cold ran down Jespar’s neck. “Maybe something interfered with your last refocusing? The heat, maybe, or the exhaustion?”
　　“No.”
　　“Then… why didn’t it work?”
　　“It did work, Jespar, just not nearly as well as it should have. Maybe it… oh, kweh. What a cursed mess.”
　　“‘Maybe it…’ what?”
　　“I don’t know.”
　　“Kawu, talk to me. Please.”
　　Kawu sighed, ran a hand through his hair. “I think the dream-eater is gaining strength because it’s getting closer to hatching. That’s why the fever attack was so strong and why the refocusing wasn’t as effective.”
　　Jespar blinked. “… Are you sure?”
　　Kawu’s lips pressed into a line. “No, Jespar, I’m not… I’m not sure about anything with this mess. What I know, though, is that we can’t take the risk. From here on in, I’ll refocus you every four hours, and will stay with you at all times to react in case you get another attack. There’s no way to know for sure, but I believe those hallucinations you have are always preceded by a fever attack—you had one right after we woke up from Oonai’s tuewa, then the hallucination the same night in the bathtub. The same yesterday, a fever attack at the crossroads tavern, an hallucination some hours later while you were asleep. It’s almost as if… I don’t know, as if those fever attacks punch holes in your waking mind through which the dream-eater sends elements of your dreams into reality.” His frown deepened. “Or maybe it’s the other way around and he’s trying to send your waking mind into your tuewa instead, little by little.”
　　Infected.
　　A sour taste rose in Jespar’s throat. He swallowed it down. “In other words, if it weren’t for the refocusings, I’d be seeing ghosts right now?”
　　“Your mind would project more and more elements of your dreams into reality, yuz.”
　　Looking away, Jespar made a sound that was half scoff and half laugh. He closed his eyes, massaged his temples.
　　“Okay, but as long as you’re near to perform the refocusings, we’re fine, right? All we need to do is find Oonai’s killer as fast as we can.”
　　Kawu only nodded.
　　“Well, that’s something. We can do this, I’m sure… we’ll be fine.” He’d hoped the last sentence would sound optimistic, but there was a desperate edge to it that only made it worse.
　　Infected.
　　“I’ll do all I can,” Kawu said. “I promise. But you have to tell the others about it, they need to know what’s going on.”
　　Jespar felt himself tense at the idea, but, this time, he didn’t argue. “Okay, I’ll… I’ll tell them.
　　As soon as I get the chance.”
　　“Good.”
　　Jespar exhaled, and rubbed the bridge of his nose. Everything around him felt heavy, sticky, revolting. The stars were the glowing eggs of spiders, ready to pop and spill their brood over the world beneath, the crickets chirping the sing-song of an insectoid god, the film of sweat on his skin some parasite’s slimy excretion.
　　Kawu was right: What a mess.
　　What a godsdamned fucking mess.
　　He said, “We should go.”
---
　　When they returned to the study, Lysia had just finished dragging the assassins’ bodies out of the room, hoisting them next to the corpses of the servants, leaning with their backs against the wall beside the door. The male assassin’s mask had fallen off, revealing a nondescript, angled face, hair and beard closely shaved. With his eyes closed, nothing about it suggested the cruelty they’d shown. Petrified, Jespar thought. He’d heard the stories, about their rigorous training that started in childhood, where they were systematically traumatized to kill off their empathy, about that ceramic cheek that released a lethal poison if bit on hard enough to prevent them from talking if they were ever captured. He’d heard about their absurd rates that, according to rumor, was all that secretly kept the barren country of Mel?y from falling into poverty.
　　Inside the somberly lit room, Agaam sat on the edge of the desk, the short-haired servant on a chair in front of him. They talked in a hushed tone, the woman’s eyes fixed on Agaam’s. If she noticed Jespar and Kawu out in the hallway, she didn’t show it.
　　Lysia looked up. “There you are… we were getting worried.” She studied Kawu. “Are you all right?”
　　“Yuz . I got…” He broke off. “Scared.”
　　Lysia flicked him an empty smile—the first one she’d given him, Jespar realized. “Only a fool wouldn’t have.” To Jespar, she said, “Agaam managed to calm the woman with some kind of hypnosis, and I think she’s willing to talk. We were just waiting for you to come back. Ready?”
　　I better be. My fucking life depends on it.
　　“Yeah.”
　　The woman’s eyes darted up when they approached, then widened with fear, every muscle stiffened like an animal poised for flight. Grey showed at her temples, her skin marked by lines that clustered around the eyes, the witnesses of a face that laughed a lot. Or used to.
　　Agaam said something to the woman, speaking under his breath, and she relaxed and settled back into her chair.
　　“They’re friends,” Agaam said. “They saved you.”
　　The woman gave a weak nod that Jespar returned, attempting a reassuring smile. They pulled up chairs in a half-circle around the desk and sat. An interval of silence followed, milky blue moonlight illuminating the papers and books cluttering the mahogany desk. A toppled-over glass of ink had spilled over a stack of blank parchment.
　　Agaam leaned forward, elbows resting on his knees. “Very well, Uula. I know how difficult this must be for you, but I need you to focus. What happened here?”
　　Uula looked at Agaam, her eyes two clouded mirrors. Then, she drew a breath and started to talk.
　　The day had started out as a normal morning. As always during the periods where neither Master Oonai nor any of his guests were there, only a fraction of the manor’s usual staff were present, particularly among the guards. With the onset of the rainy season, there was lots of work to be done. The windows had to be secured against the storm, barrels put up to catch the rain.
　　There had been a fire in the storage chamber and the damage hadn’t yet been repaired. Uula, who was the secretary responsible for the paperwork required to keep Ka?ra Manor running, had been in her quarters on the fourth floor when she heard noises from outside. She went down into the lobby and was on the gallery when the Petrified stepped through the door.
　　“Vuran, the gardener’s apprentice welcomed them.” Her voice was strangely flat and emotionless, like a historian reciting an event from the past. “He… he wasn’t thinking anything, he had no idea what they’d done out there, to Ejkaan, to the guards, to everyone, so he just raised his hand to greet them and asked them their business, but before he even finished the sentence that woman raised her claw and… and…”
　　“I’m sorry,” Agaam said.
　　Uula didn’t react.
　　“What happened next?” Agaam asked.
　　“… They killed them,” she said. “Without batting an eyelash, one after the other. When they were done, they were coming for the stairs, and that’s when I saw Jun?, and that village girl who just started working for us, in the corridor, waving me over. I ran to them and we fled in here to hide.” She made a joyless sound, half chuckle, half moan, that made the hair at the back of Jespar’s neck stand up. “Saaras’Jodule, we hid behind a desk. Can you believe it? We were like children playing hide and seek, hiding behind a piece of furniture as if that would change anything. The girl cried, and I comforted her, telling her everything was going to be all right, though I knew it wouldn’t. Five minutes later, those monsters came in and killed her and Jun? like… like it was nothing.”
　　Silence filled the room. Jespar felt himself holding his breath. Lysia’s eyes were fixed on the floor as if she were staring at some hypnotic pattern. Moisture gleamed in Kawu’s eyes.
　　Agaam adjusted his eyepatch. “And then they questioned you.”
　　Uula nodded. She looked out the window, where stars shone through the torn and scattered clouds.
　　“Why?” Agaam asked. “Why did they do this, and what were they hoping to find here? Do you have any idea?”
　　Not turning to face them, Uula said, “Oh, yuz… I do. They wanted to kill all witnesses and destroy the evidence.”
　　“Evidence of what?” Lysia asked.
　　“The plan. They must have been told Oonai left something in written form, and they thought if anyone knew, it was me. Which was nonsense, of course—I wasn’t even supposed to know about the plan at all, so how would I know if Oonai left any evidence?”
　　There was a long pause.
　　“What plan?” Jespar asked.
　　Uula looked up, her bloodshot eyes locking with his. Then, she again gave her bizarre chuckle.
　　“I’d tell you, but I just remembered that I can’t. You know why? Because if I do, Oonai will throw me into the dungeons and my daughters right along with me.”
　　“What? Why?”
　　“Because the contract she signed when she began to work here binds her to silence,” Agaam said. “We have a similar one for the servants in the First Ziggurat. Even the tiniest breach of it yields severe repercussions from the Coalition, some of which affect her relatives too.”
　　Jespar remembered Enkshi’s words: We only hire people with a lot to lose.
　　“Ma’saa, ” Agaam said, “I’m Xeelo Agaam, head servant of Ma’sao Oonai. And we’re acting under the authority of Ma’saa Nayima Oonai. You can tell us.”
　　Uula blinked. “… You’re Xeelo Agaam?”
　　Agaam nodded.
　　“How… how do I know?”
　　Agaam hesitated then produced a sigil ring from his pocket. It was made of gold, holding a skystone scintillating in the matted colors of a rainbow and fashioned into the Swords and Scarab crest of the Blue Islands Coalition. Uula leaned over, scrutinizing it carefully.
　　“I see. Are the rumors about you true? That you’re—”
　　“Please tell us what you know,” Agaam said. “What plan were you talking about?”
　　Uula studied him a breath longer then softly shook her head. “I’m not allowed to tell, Ma’sao Agaam, not even you… The contract is clear. Nothing Oonai says or does must leave the walls of the manor, and not even we servants are permitted to talk about it among each other.” Her face seemed more composed now, her voice firmer. Whether this was due to whatever psionic spell Agaam had cast on her or simply her brain’s survival mechanism restoring order, Jespar couldn’t say.
　　“Look,” Jespar said, “if Oonai were here, he’d want you to tell us. As I said, we’re acting under his wife’s command.”
　　Uula gave him an empty smile. “His wife doesn’t know half of what her husband does when he’s away. Even if he had told her about that plan of his, she would have just ignored it like she’s been ignoring how her husband has been cheating on her for the last eight years. No, I’ll say it one more time: By law, I’m not allowed to tell anyone except for Oonai himself.”
　　Lysia started to reply, but Uula raised a hand.
　　“But,” she said, “maybe we can come to an agreement.”
　　Agaam’s face remained as still as a mask. “An agreement.”
　　“Not money, Xeelo Agaam… I couldn’t care less. What I want is a way out of this country, once and for all.”
　　“You want to leave Kilé?” Lysia asked.
　　Uula looked at her.
　　“Yes, ma’saa, I want to leave. Is that so hard to fathom? Vuuran, Jun?, Ejkaan, that girl from the village… they’re all dead, everyone, and why? Because of this greedy old fool. I’m done with this, I’m done with Fortune Road, done with the Big Dream, done with these coinless lies.
　　If we’re the greatest country in the Civilized World, then this world is godsdamned rotten.” A tear trickled down her cheek. She wiped it away with a scoff. “So, yuz, Xeelo Agaam, I will tell you everything, under the condition that you secure me and my daughters passage to Qyra and promise that the coalition lets us go.”
　　“Very well,” Agaam said. “We have a bargain.”
　　“I want it on paper, with the sigil of the coalition.”
　　“We don’t have the time for this and I don’t have the authority to write a contract that overrules one issued by Oonai, so you’ll just have to trust me.”
　　The wariness on Uula’s face remained. Agaam sighed, ran a hand through his beard. “Believe me, ma’saa—I’ve done many wrongs in my life, but I’ve never broken my word. Never.”
　　Uula held his gaze a moment longer. Then she licked her thumb and rubbed a spot of dried blood from her chin.
　　“Very well. But we’ll speak elsewhere.”
　　She led them into the observatory, situated in the topmost tier of the ziggurat. It was a hexagonal room with a window on each wall and a vaulted ceiling held by tapered pillars. A telescope stood on a narrow pedestal in the center, gazing into the night through a circular opening in the roof. A stone stairway circled around the pedestal and up onto the platform from which the telescope could be operated. Shelves, tables, and odd metalwork lined the walls. From astrology to alchemy, Oonai was a man of many interests.
　　Uula went to a desk at the far side of the room, so big it spanned the entire length of the wall, cluttered with books, scrolls, and strange-looking tools and instruments, some of which had an almost occult air to them. Uula half leaned, half sat on the edge, arms folded across her chest.
　　Her gaze wandered to a telescope, and another tear went down her cheek, at odds with her rigid expression—it was as if the part of her mind responsible for all the panic, terror, and grief she should have normally felt was sealed off somehow, to allow for survival. Jespar, Agaam, Lysia, and Kawu stood in front of her, and when a minute had passed and Uula was still staring at the telescope, Jespar crossed his arms and began drumming his fingers against his biceps.
　　Then Uula’s eyes focused on Agaam. “Oonai has been meeting with someone in secret all throughout Rain last year, and this Drought.”
　　“His affairs,” Lysia said. “We know that.”
　　Uula frowned. “There wasn’t anything secret about his affairs. No, I’m talking about someone else. Oonai has been holding meetings with Third Magnate Vel’Nyx.”
　　There was a pause before Agaam answered. “Did you say Vel’Nyx?”
　　“Third Magnate E?de Vel’Nyx, yuz. She and Oonai were working on a scheme to overthrow the Blue Island Coalition and they called it Plan Overgrowth.”
